Arkansas, session 2025, SB320.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Construction and legislative intent.
It is the intent of the General Assembly that:
(1) The enactment and adoption of this act shall not expressly
or impliedly repeal an act passed during the regular session of the Ninety-
Fifth General Assembly;
(2) To the extent that a conflict exists between an act of the
regular session of the Ninety-Fifth General Assembly and this act, the act of
the regular session of the Ninety-Fifth General Assembly shall be treated as
a subsequent act passed by the General Assembly for the purposes of:
(A) Giving the act of the regular session of the Ninety-
Fifth General Assembly its full force and effect; and
(B) Amending or repealing the appropriate parts of the
Arkansas Code of 1987; and
(3) This act shall make only technical, not substantive, changes
to the Arkansas Code of 1987.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 9, Chapter 27, Subchapter 3, is
*LJH010*
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
repealed.
Subchapter 3 — Arkansas Juvenile Code

9-27-301. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Arkansas
Juvenile Code of 1989”.

9-27-302. Purposes — Construction.
This subchapter shall be liberally construed to the end that its
purposes may be carried out:
(1) To assure that all juveniles brought to the attention of the
courts receive the guidance, care, and control, preferably in each juvenile's
own home when the juvenile's health and safety are not at risk, that will
best serve the emotional, mental, and physical welfare of the juvenile and
the best interest of the state;
(2)(A) To preserve and strengthen the juvenile's family ties
when it is in the best interest of the juvenile;
(B) To protect a juvenile by considering the juvenile's
health and safety as the paramount concerns in determining whether or not to
remove the juvenile from the custody of his or her parents or custodians,
removing the juvenile only when the safety and protection of the public
cannot adequately be safeguarded without such removal;
(C) When a juvenile is removed from his or her own family,
to secure for him or her custody, care, and discipline with primary emphasis
on ensuring the health and safety of the juvenile while in the out-of-home
placement; and
(D) To assure, in all cases in which a juvenile must be
permanently removed from the custody of his or her parents, that the juvenile
be placed in an approved family home and be made a member of the family by
adoption;
(3) To protect society more effectively by substituting for
retributive punishment, whenever possible, methods of offender rehabilitation
and rehabilitative restitution, recognizing that the application of sanctions
that are consistent with the seriousness of the offense is appropriate in all
cases; and
(4) To provide means through which the provisions of this
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
subchapter are executed and enforced and in which the parties are assured a
fair hearing and their constitutional and other legal rights recognized and
enforced.

9-27-303. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Abandoned infant” means a juvenile less than nine (9)
months of age whose parent, guardian, or custodian left the child alone or in
the possession of another person without identifying information or with an
expression of intent by words, actions, or omissions not to return for the
infant;
(2)(A) “Abandonment” means:
(i) The failure of the parent to provide reasonable
support for a juvenile and to maintain regular contact with a juvenile
through statement or contact when the failure is accompanied by an intention
on the part of the parent to permit the condition to continue for an
indefinite period in the future;
(ii) The failure of a parent to support or maintain
regular contact with a child without just cause; or
(iii) An articulated intent to forego parental
responsibility.
(B) “Abandonment” does not include a situation in which a
child has disrupted his or her adoption and the adoptive parent has exhausted
the available resources;
(3)(A) “Abuse” means any of the following acts or omissions by a
parent, guardian, custodian, foster parent, person eighteen (18) years of age
or older living in the home with a child, whether related or unrelated to the
child, or any person who is entrusted with the juvenile's care by a parent,
guardian, custodian, or foster parent, including, but not limited to, an
agent or employee of a public or private residential home, childcare
facility, public or private school, or any person legally responsible for the
juvenile's welfare:
(i) Extreme or repeated cruelty to a juvenile;
(ii) Engaging in conduct creating a realistic and
serious threat of death, permanent or temporary disfigurement, or impairment
of any bodily organ;
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(iii) Injury to a juvenile's intellectual, emotional,
or psychological development as evidenced by observable and substantial
impairment of the juvenile's ability to function within the juvenile's normal
range of performance and behavior;
(iv) Any injury that is at variance with the history
given;
(v) Any nonaccidental physical injury;
(vi) Any of the following intentional or knowing
acts, with physical injury and without justifiable cause:
(a) Throwing, kicking, burning, biting, or
cutting a child;
(b) Striking a child with a closed fist;
(c) Shaking a child; or
(d) Striking a child on the face;
(vii) Any of the following intentional or knowing
acts, with or without physical injury:
(a) Striking a child six (6) years of age or
younger on the face or head;
(b) Shaking a child three (3) years of age or
younger;
(c) Interfering with a child's breathing;
(d) Urinating or defecating on a child;
(e) Pinching, biting, or striking a child in
the genital area;
(f) Tying a child to a fixed or heavy object
or binding or tying a child's limbs together;
(g) Giving a child or permitting a child to
consume or inhale a poisonous or noxious substance not prescribed by a
physician that has the capacity to interfere with normal physiological
functions;
(h) Giving a child or permitting a child to
consume or inhale a substance not prescribed by a physician that has the
capacity to alter the mood of the child, including, but not limited to, the
following:
(1) Marijuana;
(2) Alcohol, excluding alcohol given to
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
a child during a recognized and established religious ceremony or service;
(3) Narcotics; or
(4) Over-the-counter drugs if a person
purposely administers an overdose to a child or purposely gives an
inappropriate over-the-counter drug to a child and the child is detrimentally
impacted by the overdose or over-the-counter drug;
(i) Exposing a child to chemicals that have
the capacity to interfere with normal physiological functions, including, but
not limited to, chemicals used or generated during the manufacturing of
methamphetamine; or
(j) Subjecting a child to Munchausen syndrome
by proxy, also known as “factitious illness by proxy”, when reported and
confirmed by medical personnel or a medical facility; or
(viii) Recruiting, harboring, transporting, or
obtaining a child for labor or services, through force, fraud, or coercion
for the purpose of subjection to involuntary servitude, peonage, debt
bondage, or slavery.
(B)(i) The list in subdivision (3)(A) of this section is
illustrative of unreasonable action and is not intended to be exclusive.
(ii) No unreasonable action shall be construed to
permit a finding of abuse without having established the elements of abuse.
(C)(i) “Abuse” shall not include:
(a) Physical discipline of a child when it is
reasonable and moderate and is inflicted by a parent or guardian for purposes
of restraining or correcting the child; or
(b) Instances when a child suffers transient
pain or minor temporary marks as the result of a reasonable restraint if:
(1) The person exercising the restraint
is an employee of a residential childcare facility licensed or exempted from
licensure under the Child Welfare Agency Licensing Act, § 9-28-401 et seq.;
(2) The person exercising the restraint
is acting in his or her official capacity while on duty at a residential
childcare facility or the residential childcare facility is exempt from
licensure under the Child Welfare Agency Licensing Act, § 9-28-401 et seq.;
(3) The agency has policies and
procedures regarding restraints;
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(4) Other alternatives do not exist to
control the child except for a restraint;
(5) The child is in danger of hurting
himself or herself or others;
(6) The person exercising the restraint
has been trained in properly restraining children, de-escalation, and
conflict resolution techniques; and
(7) The restraint is:
(A) For a reasonable period of
time; and
(B) In conformity with training
and agency policy and procedures.
(ii) Reasonable and moderate physical discipline
inflicted by a parent or guardian shall not include any act that is likely to
cause and that does cause injury more serious than transient pain or minor
temporary marks.
(iii) The age, size, and condition of the child and
the location of the injury and the frequency or recurrence of injuries shall
be considered when determining whether the physical discipline is reasonable
or moderate;
(4) “Adjudication hearing” means a hearing to determine whether
the allegations in a petition are substantiated by the proof;
(5) “Adult sentence” means punishment authorized by the Arkansas
Criminal Code, § 5-1-101 et seq., subject to the limitations in § 9-27-507,
for the act or acts for which the juvenile was adjudicated delinquent as an
extended juvenile jurisdiction offender;
(6) “Aggravated circumstances” means:
(A) A child has been abandoned, chronically abused,
subjected to extreme or repeated cruelty, sexually abused, sexually
exploited, or a determination has been or is made by a judge that there is
little likelihood that services to the family will result in successful
reunification;
(B) A child has been removed from the custody of the
parent or guardian and placed in foster care or in the custody of another
person three (3) or more times in the last fifteen (15) months; or
(C) A child or a sibling has been neglected or abused such
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
that the abuse or neglect could endanger the life of the child;
(7) “Attorney ad litem” means an attorney appointed to represent
the best interest of a juvenile;
(8) “Caretaker” means a parent, guardian, custodian, foster
parent, significant other of the child's parent, or any person fourteen (14)
years of age or older who is entrusted with a child's care by a parent,
guardian, custodian, or foster parent, including, but not limited to, an
agent or employee of a public or private residential home, childcare
facility, public or private school, or any person responsible for a child's
welfare;
(9) “Case plan” means a document setting forth the plan for
services for a juvenile and his or her family, as described in § 9-27-402;
(10)(A) “Cash assistance” means short-term financial
assistance.
(B) “Cash assistance” does not include:
(i) Long-term financial assistance or financial
assistance that is the equivalent of the board payment, adoption subsidy, or
guardianship subsidy; or
(ii) Financial assistance for car insurance;
(11) “Commitment” means an order of the court that places a
juvenile in the physical custody of the Division of Youth Services for
placement in a youth services facility;
(12) “Court” means the juvenile division of circuit court;
(13) “Court-appointed special advocate” means a volunteer
appointed by the court to advocate for the best interest of juveniles in
dependency-neglect proceedings;
(14)(A) “Custodian” means a person other than a parent or
legal guardian who stands in loco parentis to the juvenile or a person,
agency, or institution to whom a court of competent jurisdiction has given
custody of a juvenile by court order.
(B) For the purposes of who has a right to counsel under §
9-27-316(h), “custodian” includes a person to whom a court of competent
jurisdiction has given custody, including a legal guardian;
(15) “Delinquent juvenile” means:
(A) A juvenile ten (10) years old or older who:
(i) Has committed an act other than a traffic
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
offense or game and fish violation that, if the act had been committed by an
adult, would subject the adult to prosecution for a felony, misdemeanor, or
violation under the applicable criminal laws of this state;
(ii) Has violated § 5-73-119; or
(iii) Has violated § 5-71-217(d)(2), cyberbullying of
a school employee; or
(B) Any juvenile charged with capital murder, § 5-10-101,
or murder in the first degree, § 5-10-102, subject to extended juvenile
jurisdiction;
(16) “Dependent juvenile” means:
(A)(i) A child whose parent or guardian is incarcerated
and the parent or guardian has no appropriate relative or friend willing or
able to provide care for the child.
(ii) If the reason for the incarceration is related
to the health, safety, or welfare of the child, the child is not a dependent
juvenile but may be dependent-neglected;
(B) A child whose parent or guardian is incapacitated,
whether temporarily or permanently, so that the parent or guardian cannot
provide care for the juvenile and the parent or guardian has no appropriate
relative or friend willing or able to provide care for the child;
(C) A child whose custodial parent dies and no appropriate
relative or friend is willing or able to provide care for the child;
(D) A child who is an infant relinquished to the custody
of the Department of Human Services for the sole purpose of adoption;
(E) A safe haven baby, § 9-34-201 et seq.;
(F) A child who has disrupted his or her adoption, and the
adoptive parents have exhausted resources available to them; or
(G)(i) A child who has been a victim of human trafficking.
(ii) If the parent knew or should have known the
child was a victim of human trafficking, the child is not a dependent
juvenile but may be dependent-neglected;
(17)(A) “Dependent-neglected juvenile” means any juvenile
who is at substantial risk of serious harm as a result of the following acts
or omissions to the juvenile, a sibling, or another juvenile:
(i) Abandonment;
(ii) Abuse;
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(iii) Sexual abuse;
(iv) Sexual exploitation;
(v) Neglect;
(vi) Parental unfitness; or
(vii) Being present in a dwelling or structure during
the manufacturing of methamphetamine with the knowledge of his or her parent,
guardian, or custodian.
(B) “Dependent-neglected juvenile” includes dependent
juveniles;
(18) “Detention” means the temporary care of a juvenile in a
physically restricting facility other than a jail or lock-up used for the
detention of adults prior to an adjudication hearing for delinquency or
pending commitment pursuant to an adjudication of delinquency;
(19) “Detention hearing” means a hearing held to determine
whether a juvenile accused or adjudicated of committing a delinquent act or
acts should be released or held prior to adjudication or disposition;
(20) “Deviant sexual activity” means any act of sexual
gratification involving:
(A) Penetration, however slight, of the anus or mouth of
one (1) person by the penis of another person; or
(B) Penetration, however slight, of the labia majora or
anus of one (1) person by any body member or foreign instrument manipulated
by another person;
(21) “Disposition hearing” means a hearing held following an
adjudication hearing to determine what action will be taken in delinquency,
family in need of services, or dependency-neglect cases;
(22) “Extended juvenile jurisdiction offender” means a juvenile
designated to be subject to juvenile disposition and an adult sentence
imposed by the court;
(23) “Family in need of services” means any family whose juvenile
evidences behavior that includes, but is not limited to, the following:
(A) Being habitually and without justification absent from
school while subject to compulsory school attendance;
(B) Being habitually disobedient to the reasonable and
lawful commands of his or her parent, guardian, or custodian; or
(C) Having absented himself or herself from the juvenile's
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
home without sufficient cause, permission, or justification;
(24)(A) “Family services” means relevant services provided
to a juvenile or his or her family, including, but not limited to:
(i) Child care;
(ii) Homemaker services;
(iii) Crisis counseling;
(iv) Cash assistance;
(v) Transportation;
(vi) Family therapy;
(vii) Physical, psychiatric, or psychological
evaluation;
(viii) Counseling;
(ix) Treatment; or
(x) Post-adoptive services.
(B) Family services are provided in order to:
(i) Prevent a juvenile from being removed from a
parent, guardian, or custodian;
(ii) Reunite the juvenile with the parent, guardian,
or custodian from whom the juvenile has been removed;
(iii) Implement a permanent plan of adoption or
guardianship for a juvenile in a dependency-neglect case; or
(iv) Rehabilitate a juvenile in a delinquency or
family in need of services case;
(25) “Fast track” means that reunification services will not be
provided or will be terminated before twelve (12) months of services;
(26)(A) “Fictive kin” means a person selected by the
Division of Children and Family Services who:
(i) Is not related to a child by blood or marriage;
and
(ii) Has a strong, positive, and emotional tie or
role in the:
(a) Child's life; or
(b) Child's parent's life if the child is an
infant.
(B) The Director of the Division of Children and Family
Services or his or her designee shall approve a fictive kin for an infant;
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(27)(A) “Forcible compulsion” means physical force,
intimidation, or a threat, express or implied, of death, physical injury to,
rape, sexual abuse, or kidnapping of any person.
(B) If the act was committed against the will of the
juvenile, then forcible compulsion has been used.
(C) The age, developmental stage, and stature of the
victim and the relationship of the victim to the assailant, as well as the
threat of deprivation of affection, rights, and privileges from the victim by
the assailant shall be considered in weighing the sufficiency of the evidence
to prove compulsion;
(28) “Guardian” means any person, agency, or institution, as
defined by § 28-65-101 et seq., whom a court of competent jurisdiction has so
appointed;
(29)(A) “Home study” means a written report that is
obtained after an investigation of a home by the department or other
appropriate persons or agencies and that shall conform to rules established
by the department.
(B)(i) An in-state home study, excluding the results of a
criminal records check, shall be completed and presented to the requesting
court within thirty (30) working days of the receipt of the request for the
home study.
(ii) The results of the criminal records check shall
be provided to the court as soon as they are received.
(iii) The circuit clerk of the county court shall:
(a) Keep a record of the national fingerprint-
based criminal background checks performed by the Federal Bureau of
Investigation for the court;
(b) Permit only the court and the employees of
the clerk's office with an official reason to view the information in the
national fingerprint-based criminal background check;
(c) Not permit anyone to obtain a copy of the
national fingerprint-based criminal background check; and
(d) Permit a person specifically ordered by
the court to view the information in the national fingerprint-based criminal
background check.
(iv)(a) The department shall share the
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
information obtained from the criminal records check and the national
fingerprint-based criminal background checks only with employees of the
department who have an official business reason to see the information.
(b) Unless specifically ordered to do so by
the court, the department shall not share the information obtained from the
criminal records check and the national fingerprint-based criminal background
checks with persons not employed by the department.
(C)(i) The department may obtain a criminal background
check on any person in the household sixteen (16) years of age and older,
including a fingerprint-based check of national crime information databases.
(ii) Upon request, local law enforcement shall
provide the department with criminal background information on any person in
the household sixteen (16) years of age and older;
(30) “Imminent harm” means an act of harm that is a danger:
(A) To the physical, mental, or emotional health of a
juvenile;
(B) That is constrained by time; and
(C) That may only be prevented by immediate intervention
by a court;
(31) “Indecent exposure” means the exposure by a person of the
person's sexual organs for the purpose of arousing or gratifying the sexual
desire of the person or any other person, under circumstances in which the
person knows the conduct is likely to cause affront or alarm;
(32) “Independence” means a permanency planning hearing
disposition known as “Another Planned Permanent Living Arrangement (APPLA)”
for the juvenile who will not be reunited with his or her family and because
another permanent plan is not in the juvenile's best interest;
(33) “Juvenile” means an individual who is:
(A) From birth to eighteen (18) years of age, whether
married or single; or
(B) Adjudicated delinquent, a juvenile member of a family
in need of services, or dependent or dependent-neglected by the juvenile
division of circuit court prior to eighteen (18) years of age and for whom
the juvenile division of circuit court retains jurisdiction;
(34) “Juvenile detention facility” means any facility for the
temporary care of juveniles alleged to be delinquent or adjudicated
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
delinquent and awaiting disposition, who require secure custody in a
physically restricting facility designed and operated with all entrances and
exits under the exclusive control of the facility's staff, so that a juvenile
may not leave the facility unsupervised or without permission;
(35) “Law enforcement officer” means any public servant vested by
law with a duty to maintain public order or to make arrests for offenses;
(36) “Miranda rights” means the requirement set out in Miranda v.
Arizona, 384 U.S. 436 (1966), for law enforcement officers to clearly inform
an accused, including a juvenile taken into custody for a delinquent act or a
criminal offense, that the juvenile has the right to remain silent, that
anything the juvenile says will be used against him or her in court, that the
juvenile has the right to consult with a lawyer and to have the lawyer with
him or her during interrogation, and that, if the juvenile is indigent, a
lawyer will be appointed to represent him or her;
(37)(A) “Neglect” means those acts or omissions of a
parent, guardian, custodian, foster parent, or any person who is entrusted
with the juvenile's care by a parent, custodian, guardian, or foster parent,
including, but not limited to, an agent or employee of a public or private
residential home, childcare facility, public or private school, or any person
legally responsible under state law for the juvenile's welfare, that
constitute:
(i) Failure or refusal to prevent the abuse of the
juvenile when the person knows or has reasonable cause to know the juvenile
is or has been abused;
(ii) Failure or refusal to provide the necessary
food, clothing, shelter, or medical treatment necessary for the juvenile's
well-being, except when the failure or refusal is caused primarily by the
financial inability of the person legally responsible and no services for
relief have been offered;
(iii) Failure to take reasonable action to protect
the juvenile from abandonment, abuse, sexual abuse, sexual exploitation, or
neglect when the existence of this condition was known or should have been
known, and, if for abuse or neglect, the failure to take reasonable action to
protect the juvenile causes the juvenile serious bodily injury;
(iv) Failure or irremediable inability to provide for
the essential and necessary physical, mental, or emotional needs of the
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
juvenile, including failure to provide a shelter that does not pose a risk to
the health or safety of the juvenile;
(v) Failure to provide for the juvenile's care and
maintenance, proper or necessary support, or medical, surgical, or other
necessary care;
(vi) Failure, although able, to assume responsibility
for the care and custody of the juvenile or to participate in a plan to
assume the responsibility;
(vii) Failure to appropriately supervise the juvenile
that results in the juvenile's being left alone:
(a) At an inappropriate age, creating a
dangerous situation; or
(b) In inappropriate circumstances, creating a
dangerous situation;
(viii) Failure to appropriately supervise the
juvenile that results in the juvenile being placed in inappropriate
circumstances, creating a dangerous situation; or
(ix)(a) Failure to ensure a child between six
(6) years of age and seventeen (17) years of age is enrolled in school or is
being legally home-schooled; or
(b) As a result of an act or omission by the
parent, custodian, or guardian of a child, the child is habitually and
without justification absent from school.
(B)(i) “Neglect” shall also include:
(a) Causing a child to be born with an illegal
substance present in the child's bodily fluids or bodily substances as a
result of the pregnant mother's knowingly using an illegal substance before
the birth of the child; or
(b) At the time of the birth of a child, the
presence of an illegal substance in the mother's bodily fluids or bodily
substances as a result of the pregnant mother's knowingly using an illegal
substance before the birth of the child.
(ii) For the purposes of this subdivision (37)(B),
“illegal substance” means a drug that is prohibited to be used or possessed
without a prescription under the Arkansas Criminal Code, § 5-1-101 et seq.
(iii) A test of the child's bodily fluids or bodily
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
substances may be used as evidence to establish neglect under subdivision
(37)(B)(i)(a) of this section.
(iv) A test of the mother's bodily fluids or bodily
substances or the child's bodily fluids or bodily substances may be used as
evidence to establish neglect under subdivision (37)(B)(i)(b) of this
section;
(38)(A) “Notice of hearing” means a notice that describes
the nature of the hearing, the time, date, and place of hearing, the right to
be present, heard, and represented by counsel, and instructions on how to
apply to the court for appointment of counsel, if indigent, or a uniform
notice as developed and prescribed by the Supreme Court.
(B) The notice of hearing shall be served in the manner
provided for service under the Arkansas Rules of Civil Procedure;
(39) “Order to appear” means an order issued by the court
directing a person who may be subject to the court's jurisdiction to appear
before the court at a date and time as set forth in the order;
(40)(A) “Out-of-home placement” means:
(i) Placement in a home or facility other than
placement in a youth services center, a detention facility, or the home of a
parent or guardian of the juvenile; or
(ii) Placement in the home of an individual other
than a parent or guardian, not including any placement when the court has
ordered that the placement be made permanent and ordered that no further
reunification services or six-month reviews are required.
(B) “Out-of-home placement” shall not include placement in
a youth services center or detention facility as a result of a finding of
delinquency;
(41) “Parent” means:
(A) A biological mother;
(B) An adoptive parent; or
(C) A man:
(i) To whom the biological mother was married at the
time of conception or birth;
(ii) Who has signed an acknowledgment of paternity
pursuant to § 9-10-120;
(iii) Who has been found by a court of competent
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
jurisdiction to be the biological father of the juvenile or to have otherwise
established paternity; or
(iv) Who is listed as the parent on the birth
certificate of the child;
(42) “Paternity hearing” means a legal proceeding to determine
the biological father of a juvenile;
(43) “Permanent custody” means custody that is transferred to a
person as a permanency disposition in a juvenile case and the case is closed;
(44) “Pornography” means:
(A) Pictures, movies, and videos lacking serious literary,
artistic, political, or scientific value that when taken as a whole and
applying contemporary community standards would appear to the average person
to appeal to the prurient interest;
(B) Material that depicts sexual conduct in a patently
offensive manner lacking serious literary, artistic, political, or scientific
value; or
(C) Obscene or licentious material;
(45)(A) “Predisposition report” means a report concerning
the juvenile, the family of the juvenile, all possible disposition
alternatives, the location of the school in which the juvenile is or was last
enrolled, whether the juvenile has been tested for or has been found to have
any disability, the name of the juvenile's attorney and, if appointed by the
court, the date of the appointment, any participation by the juvenile or his
or her family in counseling services previously or currently being provided
in conjunction with adjudication of the juvenile, and any other matters
relevant to the efforts to provide treatment to the juvenile or the need for
treatment of the juvenile or the family.
(B) The predisposition report shall include a home study
of any out-of-home placement that may be part of the disposition;
(46) “Prosecuting attorney” means an attorney who is elected as
district prosecuting attorney, the duly appointed deputy prosecuting
attorney, or any city prosecuting attorney;
(47) “Protection plan” means a written plan developed by the
department in conjunction with the family and support network to protect the
juvenile from harm and which allows the juvenile to remain safely in the
home;
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(48) “Putative father” means any man not deemed or adjudicated
under the laws of the jurisdiction of the United States to be the biological
father of a juvenile who claims to be or is alleged to be the biological
father of the juvenile;
(49)(A)(i) “Reasonable efforts” means efforts to preserve
the family before the placement of a child in foster care to prevent the need
for removing the child from his or her home and efforts to reunify a family
made after a child is placed out of his or her home to make it possible for
him or her to safely return home.
(ii) Reasonable efforts shall also be made to obtain
permanency for a child who has been in an out-of-home placement for more than
twelve (12) months or for fifteen (15) of the previous twenty-two (22)
months.
(iii) In determining whether or not to remove a child
from a home or return a child back to a home, the child's health and safety
shall be the paramount concern.
(iv) The department or other appropriate agency shall
exercise reasonable diligence and care to utilize all available services
related to meeting the needs of the juvenile and the family.
(v)(a) “Reasonable efforts” include efforts to
involve an incarcerated parent.
(b) The department shall:
(1) Involve an incarcerated parent in
case planning;
(2) Monitor compliance with services
offered by the Division of Correction to the extent permitted by federal law;
and
(3) Offer visitation in accordance with
the policies of the Division of Correction if visitation is appropriate and
in the best interest of the child.
(B) The juvenile division of circuit court may deem that
reasonable efforts have been made when the court has found that the first
contact by the department occurred during an emergency in which the child
could not safely remain at home, even with reasonable services being
provided.
(C) Reasonable efforts to reunite a child with his or her
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
parent or parents shall not be required in all cases. Specifically,
reunification shall not be required if a court of competent jurisdiction,
including the juvenile division of circuit court, has determined by clear and
convincing evidence that the parent has:
(i) Subjected the child to aggravated circumstances;
(ii) Committed murder of any child;
(iii) Committed manslaughter of any child;
(iv) Aided or abetted, attempted, conspired, or
solicited to commit the murder or the manslaughter;
(v) Committed a felony battery that results in
serious bodily injury to any child;
(vi) Had the parental rights involuntarily terminated
as to a sibling of the child;
(vii) Abandoned an infant as defined in subdivision
(1) of this section; or
(viii) Registered with a sex offender registry under
the Adam Walsh Child Protection and Safety Act of 2006, Pub. L. No. 109-248.
(D) Reasonable efforts to place a child for adoption or
with a legal guardian or permanent custodian may be made concurrently with
reasonable efforts to reunite a child with his or her family;
(50) “Residence” means:
(A) The place where the juvenile is domiciled; or
(B) The permanent place of abode where the juvenile spends
an aggregate of more than six (6) months of the year;
(51)(A) “Restitution” means actual economic loss sustained
by an individual or entity as a proximate result of the delinquent acts of a
juvenile.
(B) Such economic loss shall include, but not be limited
to, medical expenses, funeral expenses, expenses incurred for counseling
services, lost wages, and expenses for repair or replacement of property;
(52) “Safety plan” means a plan ordered by the court to be
developed for an adjudicated delinquent sex offender under § 9-27-356 who is
at moderate or high risk of reoffending for the purposes of § 9-27-309;
(53) “Sexual abuse” means:
(A) By a person fourteen (14) years of age or older to a
person younger than eighteen (18) years of age:
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(i) Sexual intercourse, deviant sexual activity, or
sexual contact by forcible compulsion;
(ii) Attempted sexual intercourse, attempted deviant
sexual activity, or attempted sexual contact by forcible compulsion;
(iii) Indecent exposure; or
(iv) Forcing the watching of pornography or live
sexual activity;
(B) By a person eighteen (18) years of age or older to a
person who is younger than fifteen (15) years of age and is not his or her
spouse:
(i) Sexual intercourse, deviant sexual activity, or
sexual contact;
(ii) Attempted sexual intercourse, attempted deviant
sexual activity, or attempted sexual contact; or
(iii) Solicitation of sexual intercourse,
solicitation of deviant sexual activity, or solicitation of sexual contact;
(C) By a person twenty (20) years of age or older to a
person who is younger than sixteen (16) years of age who is not his or her
spouse:
(i) Sexual intercourse, deviant sexual activity, or
sexual contact;
(ii) Attempted sexual intercourse, attempted deviant
sexual activity, or attempted sexual contact; or
(iii) Solicitation of sexual intercourse,
solicitation of deviant sexual activity, or solicitation of sexual contact;
(D) By a caretaker to a person younger than eighteen (18)
years of age:
(i) Sexual intercourse, deviant sexual activity, or
sexual contact;
(ii) Attempted sexual intercourse, attempted deviant
sexual activity, or attempted sexual contact;
(iii) Forcing or encouraging the watching of
pornography;
(iv) Forcing, permitting, or encouraging the watching
of live sexual activity;
(v) Forcing listening to a phone sex line;
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(vi) An act of voyeurism; or
(vii) Solicitation of sexual intercourse, deviant
sexual activity, or sexual contact;
(E) By a person younger than fourteen (14) years of age to
a person younger than eighteen (18) years of age:
(i) Sexual intercourse, deviant sexual activity, or
sexual contact by forcible compulsion; or
(ii) Attempted sexual intercourse, attempted deviant
sexual activity, or attempted sexual contact by forcible compulsion;
(F) By a person eighteen (18) years of age or older to a
person who is younger than eighteen (18) years of age, the recruiting,
harboring, transporting, obtaining, patronizing, or soliciting of a child for
the purpose of a commercial sex act; and
(G) Grooming, by a:
(i) Person eighteen (18) years of age or older to a
person not his or her spouse who is younger than fourteen (14) years of age;
or
(ii) Caretaker to a person younger than fourteen (14)
years of age;
(54)(A) “Sexual contact” means any act of sexual
gratification involving:
(i) Touching, directly or through clothing, of the
sex organs, buttocks, or anus of a juvenile or the breast of a female
juvenile;
(ii) Encouraging the juvenile to touch the offender
in a sexual manner; or
(iii) Requesting the offender to touch the juvenile
in a sexual manner.
(B) Evidence of sexual gratification may be inferred from
the attendant circumstances surrounding the investigation of the specific
complaint of child maltreatment.
(C) This subdivision (54) shall not permit normal,
affectionate hugging to be construed as sexual contact;
(55) “Sexual exploitation” includes:
(A) Allowing, permitting, or encouraging participation or
depiction of the juvenile in:
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(i) Prostitution;
(ii) Obscene photographing; or
(iii) Obscene filming; and
(B) Obscenely depicting, obscenely posing, or obscenely
posturing a juvenile for any use or purpose;
(56) “Shelter care” means the temporary care of a juvenile in
physically unrestricting facilities under an order for placement pending or
under an adjudication of dependency-neglect or family in need of services;
(57) “Significant other” means a person:
(A) With whom the parent shares a household; or
(B) Who has a relationship with the parent that results in
the person acting in loco parentis with respect to the parent's child or
children, regardless of living arrangements;
(58) “Temporary custody” means custody that is transferred to a
person during the pendency of the juvenile court case when services are being
provided to achieve the goal of the case plan;
(59) “Trial placement” means that custody of the juvenile remains
with the department, but the juvenile is returned to the home of a parent or
the person from whom custody was removed for a period not to exceed sixty
(60) days;
(60) “UCCJEA” means the Uniform Child-Custody Jurisdiction and
Enforcement Act, § 9-19-101 et seq.;
(61) “UIFSA” means the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act, §
9-17-101 et seq.;
(62) “Victim” means any person or entity entitled to restitution
as defined in subdivision (51) of this section as the result of a delinquent
act committed by a juvenile adjudicated delinquent;
(63) “Victim of human trafficking” means a child who has been
subjected to trafficking of persons as defined in § 5-18-103;
(64)(A) “Voyeurism” means looking for the purpose of
sexual arousal or gratification into a private location or place in which a
juvenile may reasonably be expected to be nude or partially nude.
(B) This definition does not apply to delinquency actions;
(65) “Youth services center” means a youth services facility
operated by the state or a contract provider;
(66) “Youth services facility” means a facility operated by the
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
state or its designee for the care of juveniles who have been adjudicated
delinquent or convicted of a crime and who require secure custody in either a
physically restrictive facility or a staff-secured facility operated so that
a juvenile may not leave the facility unsupervised or without supervision;
and
(67)(A) “Grooming” means to knowingly disseminate to a
child thirteen (13) years of age or younger with or without consideration a
visual or print medium depicting sexually explicit content with the purpose
to entice, induce, or groom the child to engage in the following with a
person:
(i) Sexual intercourse;
(ii) Sexually explicit conduct; or
(iii) Deviant sexual activity.
(B) As used in subdivision (67)(A) of this section,
“disseminate” means to allow to view, expose, furnish, present, sell, or
otherwise distribute, including on an electronic device or virtual platform,
and is not limited to an act that takes place in the physical presence of a
child.
(C) It is an affirmative defense to an allegation of
grooming that the actor is not more than three (3) years older than the
victim.

9-27-304. Provisions supplemental.
(a) Unless this subchapter otherwise provides, nothing in this
subchapter shall be construed to be in conflict with, to repeal, or to
prevent proceedings under any act or statute of this state that may otherwise
define any specific act of any person as a crime or misdemeanor, which act
might also constitute contributing to the delinquency or dependency of a
juvenile, or to prevent or to interfere with proceedings under any such acts.
(b) Nor shall this subchapter be construed to be inconsistent with or
to repeal any act providing for the support by parents of their minor
children, the taking of indecent liberties with, or selling liquor, tobacco,
or firearms to children, or permitting them in prohibited places. Nothing in
any such act or similar acts shall be construed to be inconsistent with or
repeal this subchapter or prevent proceedings under this subchapter.

03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
9-27-305. Applicability.
Any juvenile within this state may be subjected to the care, custody,
control, and jurisdiction of the circuit court.

9-27-306. Jurisdiction.
(a)(1) The circuit court shall have exclusive original jurisdiction of
and shall be the sole court for the following proceedings governed by this
subchapter, including without limitation:
(A)(i) Proceedings in which a juvenile is alleged to be
delinquent as defined in this subchapter, including juveniles ten (10) to
eighteen (18) years of age.
(ii) The court may retain jurisdiction of a juvenile
delinquent up to twenty-one (21) years of age if the juvenile committed the
delinquent act before reaching eighteen (18) years of age;
(B) Proceedings in which a juvenile is alleged to be
dependent or dependent-neglected from birth to eighteen (18) years of age,
except for the following:
(i)(a) A juvenile who has been adjudicated dependent
or dependent-neglected before eighteen (18) years of age may request the
court to continue jurisdiction over the juvenile until twenty-one (21) years
of age so long as the juvenile is:
(1) Completing secondary education or a
program leading to an equivalent credential;
(2) Enrolled in an institution providing
postsecondary or vocational education;
(3) Participating in a program or
activity designed to promote or remove barriers to employment;
(4) Employed for at least eighty (80)
hours per month; or
(5) Incapable of completing school or
work requirements due to a documented medical condition.
(b) The court shall retain jurisdiction only
if the juvenile meets the requirements of subdivision (a)(1)(B)(i)(a) of this
section or has a viable plan to meet the requirements.
(c) The court shall discontinue jurisdiction
only after a hearing to determine whether:
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(1) The juvenile:
(A) Knowingly and voluntarily is
requesting to leave care;
(B) Has failed to meet the
requirements of subdivision (a)(1)(B)(i)(a) of this section; or
(C) Does not have a viable plan to
meet the requirements; and
(2) The Department of Human Services has
fully complied with §§ 9-27-363 and 9-28-114; or
(ii) A juvenile may contact his or her attorney ad
litem to petition the court to return to the court's jurisdiction if the
juvenile:
(a) Was adjudicated dependent or dependent-
neglected;
(b) Was in foster care at eighteen (18) years
of age; and
(c) Left foster care but desires to submit to
the jurisdiction of the court before reaching twenty-one (21) years of age to
benefit from extended foster care;
(C) Proceedings in which emergency custody or a seventy-
two-hour hold has been taken on a juvenile under § 9-27-313 or the Child
Maltreatment Act, § 12-18-101 et seq.;
(D) Proceedings in which a family is alleged to be in need
of services as defined by this subchapter, which shall include juveniles from
birth to eighteen (18) years of age, except for the following:
(i) A juvenile whose family has been adjudicated as
a family in need of services and who is in foster care before eighteen (18)
years of age may request that the court continue jurisdiction until twenty-
one (21) years of age if the requirements in subdivision (a)(1)(B)(i)(a) of
this section are met;
(ii) The court shall retain jurisdiction only if the
juvenile meets or has a viable plan to meet the requirements in subdivision
(a)(1)(B)(i)(a) of this section; or
(iii) The court shall discontinue jurisdiction upon
request of the juvenile or when the juvenile completes or is discontinued
from the requirements to receive independent living services;
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(E) Proceedings for termination of parental rights for a
juvenile under this subchapter;
(F) Proceedings in which custody of a juvenile is
transferred to the department;
(G) Proceedings for which a juvenile is alleged to be an
extended juvenile jurisdiction offender under § 9-27-501 et seq.;
(H) Proceedings for which a juvenile is transferred to the
juvenile division of circuit court from the criminal division of circuit
court under § 9-27-318;
(I) Custodial placement proceedings filed by the
department; and
(J) Proceedings in dependency-neglect or family in need of
services matters to set aside an order of permanent custody upon the
disruption of the placement.
(2) A juvenile shall not under any circumstance remain under the
court's jurisdiction past twenty-one (21) years of age.
(3)(A) When the department exercises custody of a juvenile under
the Child Maltreatment Act, § 12-18-101 et seq., files a petition for an ex
parte emergency order, or files a petition for dependency-neglect concerning
that juvenile, before or subsequent to the other legal proceeding, a party to
that petition may file a motion to transfer any other legal proceeding
concerning the juvenile to the court hearing the dependency-neglect petition.
(B) Upon the filing of a motion, the other legal
proceeding shall be transferred to the court hearing the dependency-neglect
case.
(4) The court shall retain jurisdiction to issue orders of
adoption, interlocutory or final, if a juvenile is placed outside the State
of Arkansas.
(b) The assignment of cases to the juvenile division of the circuit
court shall be as described by the Supreme Court in Administrative Order
Number 14, originally issued April 6, 2001.
(c)(1) The circuit court shall have concurrent jurisdiction with the
district court over juvenile curfew violations.
(2) For juvenile curfew violations, the prosecutor may file a
family in need of services petition in circuit court or a citation in
district court.
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(d) The circuit court shall have jurisdiction to hear proceedings
commenced in any court of this state or court of comparable jurisdiction of
another state that are transferred to it under the Uniform Child-Custody
Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act, § 9-19-101 et seq.
(e) Regardless of funding, a juvenile will be allowed to return to
foster care if:
(1) Evidence is presented to the circuit court that the
department failed to comply with §§ 9-27-363 and 9-28-114 or if there is
evidence that the juvenile was coerced by an employee or agent of the
department to leave foster care; or
(2) The juvenile submits a request to reenter foster care in
writing or verbally to the department.
(f) If a juvenile over eighteen (18) years of age who is allowed to
reenter extended foster care fails to be engaged in or have a viable plan to
meet the requirements in subdivision (a)(1)(B)(i)(a) of this section or have
a viable plan to meet the requirements of subdivision (a)(1)(B)(i)(a) of this
section for more than sixty (60) days, the department may:
(1) File a motion to terminate the jurisdiction of the court and
discharge the juvenile from foster care; or
(2) Provide notice to the juvenile not under the jurisdiction of
the court that his or her case will be closed and discharge the juvenile from
foster care.

9-27-307. Venue.
(a)(1)(A) Except as set forth in subdivisions (a)(2)-(4) of this
section, a proceeding under this subchapter shall be commenced in the circuit
court of the county in which the juvenile resides.
(B)(i) No dependency-neglect proceeding shall be dismissed
if a proceeding is filed in the incorrect county.
(ii) If the proceeding is filed in the incorrect
county, then the dependency-neglect proceeding shall be transferred to the
proper county upon discovery of the proper county of residence of the
juvenile.
(2) Proceedings may be commenced in the county where the alleged
act or omission occurred in any of the following:
(A) Nonsupport after establishment of paternity;
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(B) Delinquency; or
(C) Dependency-neglect.
(3) Proceedings under the Uniform Child-Custody Jurisdiction and
Enforcement Act, § 9-19-101 et seq., shall be commenced in the court provided
by the Uniform Child-Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act, § 9-19-101 et
seq.
(4) Adoptions and guardianships may be filed in a juvenile court
that has previously asserted continuing jurisdiction of the juvenile.
(5) Juvenile proceedings shall comply with § 16-13-210, except
detention hearings under § 9-27-326 and probable cause hearings under § 9-27-
315.
(b)(1)(A) Following adjudication, the court may on its own motion or
on motion of any party transfer the case to the county of the juvenile's
residence when the provisions of the Uniform Child-Custody Jurisdiction and
Enforcement Act, § 9-19-101 et seq., do not apply.
(B) An adult or family member who files a family in need
of services petition shall file a motion to transfer if the adult or family
member:
(i) Receives information indicating that the
juvenile involved in the family in need of services case has relocated to a
county in another judicial district; and
(ii) Knows the address of the juvenile in the county
to which the juvenile has relocated.
(2) The court shall not transfer any case to another judicial
district prior to adjudication, excluding matters filed in the incorrect
venue, or any case in which a petition to terminate parental rights has been
filed unless the court has taken final action on the petition.
(c)(1) Prior to transferring a case to another venue, the court shall
contact the judge in the other venue to confirm that the judge in the other
venue will accept the transfer.
(2)(A) Upon confirmation that the judge will accept the transfer
of venue, the transferring judge shall enter the transfer order. The transfer
order shall:
(i) Indicate that the judge has accepted the
transfer;
(ii) State the location of the court in the new
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
venue; and
(iii) Set the time and date of the next hearing.
(B) The transfer order shall be:
(i) Provided to all parties and attorneys to the
case; and
(ii) Transmitted immediately to the judge accepting
the transfer.
(3) The transferring court shall also ensure that all court
records are copied and sent to the judge in the new venue.

9-27-308. Personnel — Duties.
(a) Intake Officers.
(1) The judge or judges of the circuit court designated to hear
juvenile cases in their district plan under Supreme Court Administrative
Order Number 14, originally issued April 6, 2001, shall designate no fewer
than one (1) person in his or her judicial district as intake officer for the
court.
(2)(A) An intake officer shall have the following duties:
(i) To receive and investigate complaints and
charges that a juvenile is delinquent or dependent-neglected, or that a
family is in need of services;
(ii) To make appropriate referrals to other public or
private agencies of the community if their assistance appears to be needed or
desired; and
(iii) To perform all other functions assigned to him
or her by this subchapter, by rules promulgated pursuant thereto, or by order
of the court.
(B) Any of the foregoing functions may be performed in
another state if authorized by a court of this state and permitted by the
laws of the other state.
(3) If the intake officer has reasonable cause to suspect that a
juvenile has been subjected to child maltreatment as defined in § 12-18-103,
the intake officer shall immediately notify the central intake of the
Department of Human Services.
(b) Probation Officers.
(1) The judge or judges of the circuit court designated to hear
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
juvenile cases in their district plan under Supreme Court Administrative
Order Number 14, originally issued April 6, 2001, shall designate no fewer
than one (1) person in his or her judicial district as probation officer.
(2) A probation officer shall have the following duties:
(A) To make appropriate investigations and reports when
required to do so by any provision of this subchapter or the rules
promulgated pursuant thereto or by order of the court;
(B) To aid and counsel juveniles and their families when
required to do so by order of the court;
(C) To perform all other appropriate functions assigned to
him or her by this subchapter or the rules promulgated pursuant thereto or by
order of the court; and
(D) To give appropriate aid and assistance to the court
when requested to do so by the judge.

9-27-309. Confidentiality of records — Definition.
(a) All records may be closed and confidential within the discretion
of the circuit court, except:
(1) Adoption records, including any part of a dependency-neglect
record that includes adoption records, shall be closed and confidential as
provided in the Revised Uniform Adoption Act, § 9-9-201 et seq.;
(2) Records of delinquency adjudications for which a juvenile
could have been tried as an adult shall be made available to prosecuting
attorneys for use at sentencing if the juvenile is subsequently tried as an
adult or to determine if the juvenile should be tried as an adult; and
(3) The Administrative Office of the Courts shall provide the
Arkansas Crime Information Center with records of delinquency adjudications
for a juvenile adjudicated delinquent for an offense for which juvenile
fingerprints shall be taken under § 9-27-320.
(b)(1)(A) Records of delinquency adjudications for a felony involving
violence as defined under § 5-4-501 shall be kept for ten (10) years after
the last adjudication of delinquency or the date of a plea of guilty or nolo
contendere or a finding of guilt as an adult.
(B) Thereafter they may be expunged.
(2) The court may expunge other juvenile records at any time and
shall expunge all the records of a juvenile upon his or her twenty-first
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
birthday, in other types of delinquency, dependency-neglect, or families in
need of services cases.
(3) For purposes of this section, “expunge” means to destroy.
(c) Records of juveniles who are designated as extended juvenile
jurisdiction offenders shall be kept for ten (10) years after the last
adjudication of delinquency, date of plea of guilty or nolo contendere, or
finding of guilt as an adult or until the juvenile's twenty-first birthday,
whichever is longer.
(d)(1) If an adult criminal sentence is imposed on an extended
juvenile jurisdiction offender, the record of that case shall be considered
an adult criminal record.
(2)(A) The court shall enter an order transferring the juvenile
record to the clerk who is the custodian of adult criminal records.
(B) The clerk shall assign a criminal docket number and
shall maintain the file as if the case had originated as a criminal case.
(e) This section does not apply to nor restrict the use or publication
of statistics, data, or other materials that summarize or refer to any
records, reports, statements, notes, or other information in the aggregate
and that do not refer to or disclose the identity of any juvenile defendant
in any proceeding when used only for the purpose of research and study.
(f) This subchapter does not preclude prosecuting attorneys or the
court from providing information, upon written request, concerning the
disposition of a juvenile who has been adjudicated delinquent to:
(1) The victim or his or her next of kin; or
(2) The school superintendent of the school district or the
designee of the school superintendent of the school district to which the
juvenile transfers, in which the juvenile is enrolled, or from which the
juvenile receives services.
(g) The prosecuting attorney shall notify the school superintendent or
the designee of the school superintendent of the school district to which the
juvenile transfers, in which the juvenile is enrolled, or from which the
juvenile receives services if the juvenile is adjudicated delinquent for:
(1) An offense for which the juvenile could have been charged as
an adult;
(2) An offense involving a deadly weapon under § 5-1-102;
(3) Kidnapping under § 5-11-102;
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(4) Battery in the first degree under § 5-13-201;
(5) Sexual indecency with a child under § 5-14-110;
(6) First, second, third, or fourth degree sexual assault under
§§ 5-14-124 — 5-14-127; or
(7) The unlawful possession of a handgun under § 5-73-119.
(h) Information provided pursuant to subsections (f) and (g) of this
section shall not be released in violation of any state or federal law
protecting the privacy of the juvenile.
(i)(1) If a juvenile is arrested for unlawful possession of a firearm
under § 5-73-119, an offense involving a deadly weapon under § 5-1-102, or
battery in the first degree under § 5-13-201, the arresting agency shall
orally notify the superintendent or the designee of the superintendent of the
school district to which the juvenile transfers, in which the juvenile is
enrolled, or from which the juvenile receives services of the offense for
which the juvenile was arrested or detained within twenty-four (24) hours of
the arrest or detention or before the next school day, whichever is earlier.
(2)(A) The superintendent of the school district to which the
juvenile transfers, in which the juvenile is enrolled, or from which the
juvenile receives services shall then immediately notify:
(i) The principal of the school;
(ii) The resource officer of the school; and
(iii) Any other school official with a legitimate
educational interest in the juvenile.
(B) The arrest information shall:
(i) Be treated as confidential information; and
(ii) Not be disclosed by the superintendent or the
designee of the superintendent to any person other than a person listed in
subdivision (i)(2)(A) of this section.
(C) A person listed in subdivision (i)(2)(A) of this
section who is notified of the arrest or detention of a juvenile by the
superintendent or the designee of the superintendent shall maintain the
confidentiality of the information he or she receives.
(3) The arrest information shall be used by the school only for
the limited purpose of obtaining services for the juvenile or to ensure
school safety.
(j) Records of the arrest of a juvenile, the detention of a juvenile,
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
proceedings under this subchapter, and the records of an investigation that
is conducted when the alleged offender is an adult and relates to an offense
that occurred when the alleged offender was a juvenile shall be confidential
and shall not be subject to disclosure under the Freedom of Information Act
of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq., unless:
(1) Authorized by a written order of the juvenile division of
circuit court;
(2) The arrest or the proceedings under this subchapter result
in the juvenile's being formally charged in the criminal division of circuit
court for a felony; or
(3) As allowed under this section or § 9-27-320.
(k) Information regarding the arrest or detention of a juvenile and
related proceedings under this subchapter shall be confidential unless the
exchange of information is:
(1) For the purpose of obtaining services for the juvenile, to
ensure school safety, or to ensure public safety;
(2) Reasonably necessary to achieve one (1) or more purposes;
and
(3) Under a written order by the circuit court.
(l)(1) The information may be given only to the following persons:
(A) A school counselor;
(B) A juvenile court probation officer or caseworker;
(C) A law enforcement officer;
(D) A spiritual representative designated by the juvenile
or his or her parents or legal guardian;
(E) A Department of Human Services caseworker;
(F) A community-based provider designated by the court,
the school, or the parent or legal guardian of the juvenile;
(G) A Department of Health representative;
(H) The juvenile's attorney ad litem or other court-
appointed special advocate; or
(I)(i) A school superintendent or the designee of the
superintendent of the school district to which the juvenile transfers, in
which the juvenile is enrolled, or from which the juvenile receives services.
(ii) A school superintendent or the designee of the
superintendent of the school district in which the juvenile is enrolled or
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
from which the juvenile receives services shall immediately notify the
following persons of information he or she obtains under subsection (k) of
this section:
(a) The principal of the school;
(b) The resource officer of the school; and
(c) Any other school official with a
legitimate educational interest in the juvenile.
(2) The persons listed in subdivision (l)(1) of this section may
meet to exchange information, to discuss options for assistance to the
juvenile, to develop and implement a plan of action to assist the juvenile,
to ensure school safety, and to ensure public safety.
(3) The juvenile and his or her parent or legal guardian shall
be notified within a reasonable time before a meeting and may attend any
meeting of the persons referred to in subdivision (l)(1) of this section when
three (3) or more individuals meet to discuss assistance for the juvenile or
protection of the public due to the juvenile's behavior.
(4) Medical records, psychiatric records, psychological records,
and related information shall remain confidential unless the juvenile's
parent or legal guardian waives confidentiality in writing specifically
describing the records to be disclosed between the persons listed in
subdivision (l)(1) of this section and the purpose for the disclosure.
(5) Persons listed in subdivision (l)(1) of this section who
exchange any information referred to in this section may be held civilly
liable for disclosure of the information if the person does not comply with
limitations set forth in this section.
(m)(1) When a court orders that a juvenile have a safety plan that
restricts or requires supervised contact with another juvenile or juveniles
as it relates to student or school safety, the court shall direct that a copy
of the safety plan and a copy of the court order regarding the safety plan
concerning student or school safety be provided to the school superintendent
and principal of the school district to which the juvenile transfers, in
which the juvenile is enrolled, or from which the juvenile receives services.
(2) When a court order amends or removes any safety plan
outlined in subdivision (m)(1) of this section, the court shall direct that a
copy of the safety plan and a copy of the court order regarding the safety
plan, as it relates to student or school safety, be provided to the school
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
superintendent and principal of the school district to which the juvenile
transfers, in which the juvenile is enrolled, or from which the juvenile
receives services.
(3)(A) The superintendent or principal of the school district in
which the juvenile is enrolled or from which the juvenile receives services
shall provide verbal notification only to school officials who are necessary
to implement the safety plan as ordered by the court to ensure student
safety.
(B) This verbal notification may only be provided to
assistant principals, counselors, resource officers, and the school employees
who are primarily responsible for the supervision of the juvenile or
responsible for the learning environment of the juvenile in the school
district in which the juvenile is enrolled or from which the juvenile
receives services, and to bus drivers, if applicable.
(4) Any school officials that receive a court order and safety
plan or information concerning the court order and safety plan shall:
(A) Keep the information confidential and shall sign a
statement not to disclose the information concerning the court order and
safety plan that shall be kept by the superintendent or principal along with
the court order and safety plan;
(B) Keep the information confidential and shall not
disclose the information to any person not listed in subdivision (l)(1) of
this section;
(C) Include the information in the juvenile's permanent
educational records; and
(D)(i) Treat the information and documentation contained
in the court order as education records under the Family Educational Rights
and Privacy Act, 20 U.S.C. § 1232g.
(ii) A school official shall not release, disclose,
or make available the information and documentation contained in the court
order for inspection to any party except as permitted under the Family
Educational Rights and Privacy Act, 20 U.S.C. § 1232g.
(iii) However, the local education agency shall not
under any circumstance release, disclose, or make available for inspection to
the public, any college, university, institution of higher education,
vocational or trade school, or any past, present, or future employer of the
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
student the court order or safety plan portion of a student record.
(5) When a student attains an age that he or she is no longer
under the jurisdiction of the juvenile division of circuit court, the safety
plan and the order regarding the safety plan shall be removed from the
juvenile's permanent records at the local education agency and destroyed.

9-27-310. Commencement of proceedings.
(a) Proceedings shall be commenced by filing a petition with the
circuit clerk of the circuit court or by transfer by another court.
(b)(1) The prosecuting attorney shall have sole authority to file a
delinquency petition or petition for revocation of probation.
(2) Only a law enforcement officer, prosecuting attorney, the
Department of Human Services or its designee, or a dependency-neglect
attorney ad litem employed by or contracting with the Administrative Office
of the Courts may file a dependency-neglect petition seeking ex parte
emergency relief.
(3) Petitions for dependency-neglect or family in need of
services may be filed by:
(A) Any adult; or
(B) Any member ten (10) years of age or older of the
immediate family alleged to be in need of services.
(4) Petitions for paternity establishment may be filed by:
(A) The biological mother;
(B) A putative father;
(C) A juvenile; or
(D) The Office of Child Support Enforcement of the Revenue
Division of the Department of Finance and Administration.
(c) Concurrent with filing, a copy of any petition that requests that
the Department of Human Services take custody or provide family services
shall be mailed to the Secretary of the Department of Human Services and to
the attorney of the local Office of Chief Counsel of the Department of Human
Services by the petitioner.
(d)(1) A person may submit to the intake officer for investigation a
complaint of acts or omissions that if substantiated would constitute
delinquency.
(2) Upon substantiation, the intake officer may refer the matter
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
to the prosecuting attorney or an appropriate agency.
(e) No fees, including, but not limited to, fees for filings, copying,
or faxing, including petitions for adoption, petitions for guardianships,
summons, or subpoenas shall be charged or collected by the circuit clerk or
sheriff's office in cases brought in the circuit court under this subchapter
by a governmental entity or nonprofit corporation, including, but not limited
to, the prosecuting attorney, an attorney ad litem appointed in a dependency-
neglect case, or the Department of Human Services.
(f) If the circuit clerk's office has a fax machine, the circuit
clerk, in cases commenced in the circuit court under this subchapter by a
governmental entity or nonprofit corporation, including, but not limited to,
the prosecuting attorney, an attorney ad litem appointed in a dependency-
neglect case, or the Department of Human Services shall accept facsimile
transmissions of any papers filed under this subchapter as described in Rule
5 of the Arkansas Rules of Civil Procedure.
(g) An attorney ad litem appointed under § 12-18-1001(e) shall review
all relevant information from the juvenile proceeding regarding the child or
children for whom protective custody was taken and shall file any pleadings
that may be necessary to protect the health, safety, or welfare of the child
or children.

9-27-311. Required contents of petition.
(a) The petition shall set forth the following:
(1)(A) The name, address, gender, Social Security number, and
date of birth of each juvenile subject of the petition.
(B) A single petition for dependency-neglect or family in
need of services shall be filed that includes all siblings who are subjects
of the petition;
(2) The name and address of each of the parents or the surviving
parent of the juvenile or juveniles;
(3) The name and address of the person, agency, or institution
having custody of the juvenile or juveniles;
(4) The name and address of any other person, agency, or
institution having a claim to custody or guardianship of the juvenile or
juveniles;
(5) In a proceeding to establish paternity, the name and address
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
of both the putative father and the presumed legal father, if any;
(6) In a dependency-neglect proceeding, the name and address of
a putative parent, if any; and
(7) In a dependency-neglect proceeding:
(A) The name, address, gender, and date of birth of any
sibling of a juvenile named as respondent to the petition; and
(B) The name of each parent, guardian, or custodian of a
sibling of a juvenile named as respondent to the petition.
(b) If the name or address of anyone listed in subsection (a) of this
section is unknown or cannot be ascertained by the petitioner with reasonable
diligence, this shall be alleged in the petition and the petition shall not
be dismissed for insufficiency, but the court shall direct appropriate
measures to find and give notice to the persons.
(c)(1) All persons named in subdivisions (a)(1)-(3) of this section
shall be made defendants and served as required by this subchapter.
(2) However:
(A) In dependency-neglect petitions, the juvenile shall
have party status and be named in the petition as a respondent and shall be
served notice under § 9-27-312;
(B) In a dependency-neglect and termination of parental
rights petition, the putative parent shall be named as a party if the
petitioner alleges that the putative parent:
(i) May have a claim of paternity of a juvenile born
outside of marriage;
(ii) Has established significant contacts with the
juvenile, which may be demonstrated by a significant custodial, personal, or
financial relationship with the juvenile; or
(iii) Is listed on the Putative Father Registry;
(C) A putative parent who was not originally named as a
party to the dependency-neglect petition shall be added as a party if:
(i) Paternity is established and a court of
competent jurisdiction enters an order establishing paternity between the
juvenile and the putative parent; or
(ii) The court determines that the putative parent is
a parent as defined in § 9-27-303; and
(D) In a paternity action, the petitioner shall name as
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
defendants only the mother, the putative father, or the presumed legal
father, if any.
(d)(1)(A) The Department of Human Services shall make diligent efforts
to identify putative parents in a dependency-neglect proceeding.
(B) Diligent efforts shall include without limitation
checking the Putative Father Registry.
(2)(A)(i) A petitioner may name and serve a putative parent as a
party under § 9-27-312 in order to resolve the putative parent's status and
rights under § 9-27-325 or terminate the rights of the putative parent under
§ 9-27-341.
(ii) If the petitioner does not name and serve a
putative parent as a party in accordance with subdivision (d)(2)(A)(i) of
this section, the petitioner shall provide a putative parent with notice
under Rule 4 of the Arkansas Rules of Civil Procedure of a proceeding as soon
as the putative parent is identified.
(B) The notice shall include information about:
(i) The method of establishing paternity;
(ii) The right of the putative parent to prove
significant contacts; and
(iii) The right of the putative parent to be heard by
the court.
(C) The petitioner shall provide the notice to the court
and the parties to the case.
(D) After receiving the notice required under subdivision
(d)(2)(A)(ii) of this section, the putative parent has the burden of
establishing one (1) of the following:
(i) The putative parent has significant contacts
with the juvenile, which may be demonstrated by a significant custodial,
personal, or financial relationship with the juvenile; or
(ii) The putative parent is a parent as defined in §
9-27-303.
(E) If the putative parent, after receiving the notice
required under subdivision (d)(2)(A)(ii) of this section and being given an
opportunity to prove significant contacts with the juvenile, fails to
demonstrate significant contacts with the juvenile and the court finds that
the putative parent was given sufficient notice and an opportunity to be
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
heard, the court may:
(i) Order deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) testing to
determine whether the putative parent is the biological parent of the
juvenile;
(ii) Enter an order:
(a) Finding that the putative parent does not
have rights to the juvenile;
(b) Dismissing the putative parent from the
action; and
(c) Finding that no further notice is due to
the putative parent whose rights have not attached with regard to the
juvenile, including in the event of a filed petition for adoption; or
(iii) Enter an order providing that only a parent or
putative parent whose rights have attached to the juvenile shall be included
in a petition to terminate parental rights under § 9-27-341.
(e)(1) The petition shall set forth the following in plain and concise
words:
(A) The facts that, if proven, would bring the family or
juvenile within the court's jurisdiction;
(B) The section of this subchapter upon which jurisdiction
for the petition is based;
(C) The relief requested by the petitioner; and
(D) If a petition for delinquency proceedings, any and all
sections of the criminal laws allegedly violated.
(2)(A) The petition shall be supported by an affidavit of facts.
(B) A supporting affidavit of facts shall not be required
for delinquency, paternity, or termination of parental rights petitions.
(C) The supporting affidavit of facts shall include known
information regarding the fitness of the noncustodial parent to be considered
for custody, placement, or family time with the juvenile.
(D) If the petition for dependency-neglect is filed by the
department, the supporting affidavit of facts shall include a list of all
contact the department has had with the family before the filing of the
petition, including without limitation hotline calls accepted for
maltreatment, investigations, and open cases.

03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
9-27-312. Notification to defendants.
(a) In a delinquency and family-in-need-of-services case, a juvenile
defendant ten (10) years of age and above, any persons having care and
control of the juveniles, and all adult defendants shall be served with a
copy of the petition and either a notice of hearing or order to appear in the
manner provided by the Arkansas Rules of Civil Procedure.
(b) In a dependent-neglected case:
(1) A juvenile respondent shall be served with a copy of the
petition and all other pleadings by serving the juvenile's attorney ad litem
in accordance with Rule 5 of the Arkansas Rules of Civil Procedure; and
(2) Each adult defendant shall be served in the manner provided
in the Arkansas Rules of Civil Procedure with a copy of the petition and
either a notice of a hearing or an order to appear.

9-27-313. Taking into custody.
(a)(1) A juvenile only may be taken into custody without a warrant
before service upon him or her of a petition and notice of hearing or order
to appear as set out under § 9-27-312:
(A) Pursuant to an order of the circuit court under this
subchapter;
(B) By a law enforcement officer without a warrant under
circumstances as set forth in Rule 4.1 of the Arkansas Rules of Criminal
Procedure; or
(C) By a designated person under § 12-18-1001 et seq.
(2) When any juvenile is taken into custody without a warrant,
the officer taking the juvenile into custody shall immediately make every
effort possible to notify the custodial parent, guardian, or custodian of the
juvenile's location.
(b)(1) When any juvenile is taken into custody pursuant to a warrant,
the officer taking the juvenile into custody shall immediately take the
juvenile before the judge of the division of circuit court out of which the
warrant was issued and make every effort possible to notify the custodial
parent, guardian, or custodian of the juvenile's location.
(2) The judge shall decide whether the juvenile should be tried
as a delinquent or a criminal defendant pursuant to § 9-27-318.
(c) When a juvenile is taken into protective custody under § 12-18-
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
1001, the person exercising protective custody shall:
(1)(A) Notify the Department of Human Services and make every
effort possible to notify the custodial parent, guardian, or custodian of the
juvenile's location.
(B) The notification to the custodial parent, noncustodial
parent, guardian, or custodian of the juvenile shall be in writing and shall
include a notice:
(i) That the juvenile has been taken into foster
care;
(ii) Of the name, location, and phone number of the
person at the department whom the custodial parent, noncustodial parent,
guardian, or custodian of the juvenile can contact about the juvenile;
(iii) Of the rights of the juvenile and the rights of
the custodial parent, noncustodial parent, guardian, or custodian of the
juvenile to receive a copy of any petition filed under this subchapter;
(iv) Of the location and telephone number of the
court; and
(v) Of the procedure for obtaining a hearing; or
(2) Return the juvenile to his or her home.
(d)(1)(A) A law enforcement officer shall take a juvenile to
detention, immediately make every effort to notify the custodial parent,
guardian, or custodian of the juvenile's location, and notify the juvenile
intake officer within twenty-four (24) hours so that a petition may be filed
if a juvenile is taken into custody for:
(i) Unlawful possession of a handgun, § 5-73-
119(a)(1);
(ii) Possession of a handgun on school property, § 5-
73-119(b)(1);
(iii) Unlawful discharge of a firearm from a vehicle,
§ 5-74-107;
(iv) Any felony committed while armed with a firearm;
or
(v) Criminal use of prohibited weapons, § 5-73-104.
(B) The authority of a juvenile intake officer to make a
detention decision pursuant to § 9-27-322 shall not apply when a juvenile is
detained pursuant to subdivision (d)(1)(A) of this section.
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(C) A detention hearing shall be held by the court
pursuant to § 9-27-326 within seventy-two (72) hours after the juvenile is
taken into custody or if the seventy-two (72) hours ends on a Saturday,
Sunday, or holiday, on the next business day.
(2) If a juvenile is taken into custody for an act that would be
a felony if committed by an adult, other than a felony listed in subdivision
(d)(1)(A) of this section, the law enforcement officer shall immediately make
every effort possible to notify the custodial parent, guardian, or custodian
of the juvenile's location and may:
(A)(i) Take the juvenile to detention.
(ii) The intake officer shall be notified immediately
to make a detention decision pursuant to § 9-27-322 within twenty-four (24)
hours of the time the juvenile was first taken into custody, and the
prosecuting attorney shall be notified within twenty-four (24) hours.
(iii) If the juvenile remains in detention, a
detention hearing shall be held no later than seventy-two (72) hours after
the juvenile is taken into custody or if the seventy-two (72) hours ends on a
Saturday, Sunday, or holiday, on the next business day;
(B) Pursuant to the Arkansas Rules of Criminal Procedure,
issue a citation for the juvenile and his or her parents to appear for a
first appearance before the court and release the juvenile and within twenty-
four (24) hours notify the juvenile intake officer and the prosecuting
attorney so that a petition may be filed under this subchapter; or
(C) Return the juvenile to his or her home.
(3) If a juvenile is taken into custody for an act that would be
a misdemeanor if committed by an adult, the law enforcement officer shall
immediately make every effort possible to notify the custodial parent,
guardian, or custodian of the juvenile's location and may:
(A) Notify the juvenile intake officer, who shall make a
detention decision pursuant to § 9-27-322;
(B) Pursuant to the Arkansas Rules of Criminal Procedure,
issue a citation for the juvenile and his or her parents to appear for a
first appearance before the circuit court and release the juvenile and notify
the juvenile intake officer and the prosecuting attorney within twenty-four
(24) hours so that a petition may be filed under this subchapter; or
(C) Return the juvenile to his or her home.
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(4)(A) In all instances when a juvenile may be detained, the
juvenile may be held in a juvenile detention facility or a seventy-two-hour
holdover if a bed is available in the facility or holdover.
(B) If not, an adult jail or lock-up may be used, as
provided by § 9-27-336.
(5) In all instances when a juvenile may be detained, the intake
officer shall immediately make every effort possible to notify the juvenile's
custodial parent, guardian, or custodian.
(e) When a law enforcement officer takes custody of a juvenile under
this subchapter for reasons other than those specified in subsection (c) of
this section concerning dependent-neglected juveniles or subsection (d) of
this section concerning delinquency, he or she shall:
(1)(A)(i) Take the juvenile to shelter care, notify the
department and the intake officer of the court, and immediately make every
possible effort to notify the custodial parent, guardian, or custodian of the
juvenile's location.
(ii) The notification to parents shall be in writing
and shall include a notice of the location of the juvenile, of the juvenile's
and parents' rights to receive a copy of any petition filed under this
subchapter, of the location and telephone number of the court, and of the
procedure for obtaining a hearing.
(B)(i) In cases when the parent, guardian, or other person
contacted lives beyond a fifty-mile driving distance or lives out of state
and the juvenile has been absent from his or her home or domicile for more
than twenty-four (24) hours, the juvenile may be held in custody in a
juvenile detention facility for purposes of identification, processing, or
arranging for release or transfer to an alternative facility.
(ii) The holding shall be limited to the minimum time
necessary to complete these actions and shall not occur in any facility
utilized for incarceration of adults.
(iii) A juvenile held under this subdivision
(e)(1)(B) must be separated from detained juveniles charged or held for
delinquency.
(iv) A juvenile may not be held under this
subdivision (e)(1)(B) for more than six (6) hours if the parent, guardian, or
other person contacted lives in the state or twenty-four (24) hours,
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
excluding weekends and holidays, if the parent, guardian, or other person
contacted lives out of state; or
(2) Return the juvenile to his or her home.
(f) If no delinquency petition to adjudicate a juvenile taken into
custody is filed within twenty-four (24) hours after a detention hearing or
ninety-six (96) hours or, if the ninety-six (96) hours ends on a Saturday,
Sunday, or a holiday, at the close of the next business day, after an alleged
delinquent juvenile is taken into custody, whichever is sooner, the alleged
delinquent juvenile shall be discharged from custody, detention, or shelter
care.

9-27-314. Emergency orders.
(a)(1) In a case in which there is probable cause to believe that
immediate emergency custody is necessary to protect the health or physical
well-being of the juvenile from immediate danger or to prevent the juvenile's
removal from the state, the circuit court shall issue an ex parte order for
emergency custody to remove the juvenile from the custody of the parent,
guardian, or custodian and shall determine the appropriate plan for placement
of the juvenile.
(2)(A) In a case in which there is probable cause to believe
that an emergency order is necessary to protect the health or physical well-
being of the juvenile from immediate danger, the court shall issue an ex
parte order to provide specific appropriate safeguards for the protection of
the juvenile.
(B) Specific appropriate safeguards shall include without
limitation the authority of the circuit court to restrict a legal custodian
from:
(i) Having any contact with the juvenile; or
(ii) Removing a juvenile from a placement if the:
(a) Legal custodian placed or allowed the
juvenile to remain in that home for more than six (6) months; and
(b) Department of Human Services has no
immediate health or physical well-being concerns with the placement.
(3) In a case in which there is probable cause to believe that a
juvenile is a dependent juvenile as defined in this subchapter, the court
shall issue an ex parte order for emergency custody placing custody of the
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
dependent juvenile with the department.
(b) The emergency order shall include:
(1) Notice to all defendants and respondents named in the
petition of the right to a hearing and that a hearing will be held within
five (5) business days of the issuance of the ex parte order;
(2) Notice of a defendant's or respondent's right to be
represented by counsel;
(3)(A) Notice of a defendant's or respondent's right to obtain
appointed counsel, if eligible, and the procedure for obtaining appointed
counsel.
(B) A court shall:
(i) Appoint counsel for the parent or custodian from
whom legal custody was removed in the ex parte emergency order; and
(ii) Determine eligibility at the probable cause
hearing; and
(4) The address and telephone number of the circuit court and
the date and time of the probable cause hearing, if known.
(c)(1) Immediate notice of the emergency order shall be given by the
petitioner or by the circuit court to the:
(A) Custodial parent, noncustodial parent, guardian, or
custodian of the juvenile; and
(B) Attorney ad litem who represents the juvenile
respondent.
(2) The petitioner shall provide copies of any petition,
affidavit, or other pleading filed with or provided to the court in
conjunction with the emergency order to the provisionally appointed parent
counsel under § 9-27-316(h)(6)(B) before the probable cause hearing.
(3) All defendants shall be served with the emergency order
according to Rule 4 or Rule 5 of the Arkansas Rules of Civil Procedure or as
otherwise provided by the court.

9-27-315. Probable cause hearing.
(a)(1)(A) Following the issuance of an emergency order, the circuit
court shall hold a probable cause hearing within five (5) business days of
the issuance of the ex parte order to determine if probable cause to issue
the emergency order continues to exist.
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(B)(i) The hearing shall be limited to the purpose of
determining whether probable cause existed to protect the juvenile and to
determine whether probable cause still exists to protect the juvenile.
(ii) However, the issues as to custody and delivery
of services may be considered by the court and appropriate orders for custody
and delivery of services entered by the court.
(iii) If the defendant stipulates that probable cause
exists, the only evidence that is presented at the probable cause hearing
shall be:
(a) Evidence pertaining to family time; and
(b) Evidence pertaining to services delivered
to the family.
(iv) A parent shall not be compelled to testify under
any circumstances.
(v) For the sole purpose of the probable cause
hearing, the stipulation of a parent that probable cause exists shall also
serve as a stipulation to the introduction of the affidavit of the plaintiff.
(2)(A) All other issues, with the exception of custody and
services, shall be reserved for hearing by the court at the adjudication
hearing, which shall be a separate hearing conducted subsequent to the
probable cause hearing.
(B) By agreement of the parties and with the court's
approval, the adjudication hearing may be conducted at any time after the
probable cause hearing, subject to § 9-27-327(a)(2).
(b) The petitioner shall have the burden of proof by a preponderance
of evidence that probable cause exists for continuation of the emergency
order.
(c) If the court determines that the juvenile can safely be returned
to his or her home pending adjudication and it is in the best interest of the
juvenile, the court shall so order.
(d)(1) At the probable cause hearing, the court shall set the time and
date of the adjudication hearing.
(2) A written order shall be filed by the court or by a party or
party's attorney, as designated by the court, within thirty (30) days of the
date of the hearing or prior to the next hearing, whichever is sooner.
(e) All probable cause hearings are miscellaneous proceedings as
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
defined in Rule 1101(b)(3) of the Arkansas Rules of Evidence, and the rules
of evidence, including, but not limited to, the hearsay rule, Rule 802 of the
Arkansas Rules of Evidence, are not applicable.

9-27-316. Right to counsel.
(a)(1) In delinquency and family-in-need-of-services cases, a juvenile
and his or her parent, guardian, or custodian shall be advised by the law
enforcement official taking a juvenile into custody, by the intake officer at
the initial intake interview, and by the court at the juvenile's first
appearance before the circuit court that the juvenile has the right to be
represented at all stages of the proceedings by counsel.
(2) An extended juvenile jurisdiction offender shall have a
right to counsel at every stage of the proceedings, including all reviews.
(b)(1)(A) The inquiry concerning the ability of the juvenile to retain
counsel shall include a consideration of the juvenile's financial resources
and the financial resources of his or her family.
(B) However, the failure of the juvenile's family to
retain counsel for the juvenile shall not deprive the juvenile of the right
to appointed counsel if required under this section.
(2) After review by the court of an affidavit of financial means
completed and verified by the parent of the juvenile and a determination by
the court that the parent or juvenile has the ability to pay, the court may
order financially able juveniles, parents, guardians, or custodians to pay
all or part of reasonable attorney's fees and expenses for representation of
a juvenile.
(3) All moneys collected by the circuit clerk under this
subsection shall be retained by the clerk and deposited into a special fund
to be known as the “juvenile representation fund”.
(4) The court may direct that money from this fund be used in
providing counsel for juveniles under this section in delinquency or family-
in-need-of-services cases and indigent parents or guardians in dependency-
neglect cases as provided by subsection (h) of this section.
(5) Any money remaining in the fund at the end of the fiscal
year shall not revert to any other fund but shall carry over into the next
fiscal year in the juvenile representation fund.
(c) If counsel is not retained for the juvenile or it does not appear
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
that counsel will be retained, counsel shall be appointed to represent the
juvenile at all appearances before the court unless the right to counsel is
waived in writing as set forth in § 9-27-317.
(d) In a proceeding in which the judge determines that there is a
reasonable likelihood that the proceeding may result in the juvenile's
commitment to an institution in which the freedom of the juvenile would be
curtailed and counsel has not been retained for the juvenile, the court shall
appoint counsel for the juvenile.
(e) Appointment of counsel shall be made at a time sufficiently in
advance of the court appearance to allow adequate preparation by appointed
counsel and adequate consultation between the appointed counsel and the
client.
(f)(1) The court shall appoint an attorney ad litem who shall meet
standards and qualifications established by the Supreme Court to represent
the best interest of the juvenile when a dependency-neglect petition is filed
or when an emergency ex parte order is entered in a dependency-neglect case,
whichever occurs earlier.
(2) The court may appoint an attorney ad litem to represent the
best interest of a juvenile involved in any case before the court and shall
consider the juvenile's best interest in determining whether to appoint an
attorney ad litem.
(3) Each attorney ad litem shall:
(A) File written motions, responses, or objections at all
stages of the proceedings when necessary to protect the best interest of the
juvenile;
(B) Attend all hearings and participate in all telephone
conferences with the court unless excused by the court; and
(C) Present witnesses and exhibits when necessary to
protect the juvenile's best interest.
(4) An attorney ad litem shall be provided access to all records
relevant to the juvenile's case, including, but not limited to, school
records, medical records, all court records relating to the juvenile and his
or her family, and records, including those maintained electronically and in
the case management system, of the Department of Human Services relating to
the juvenile and his or her family to the extent permitted by federal law.
(5)(A) An attorney ad litem shall represent the best interest of
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
the juvenile.
(B) If the juvenile's wishes differ from the attorney's
determination of the juvenile's best interest, the attorney ad litem shall
communicate the juvenile's wishes to the court in addition to presenting his
or her determination of the juvenile's best interest.
(g)(1) The court may appoint a volunteer court-appointed special
advocate from a program that shall meet all state and national court-
appointed special advocate standards to advocate for the best interest of
juveniles in dependency-neglect proceedings.
(2) No court-appointed special advocate shall be assigned a case
before:
(A) Completing a training program in compliance with
National CASA/GAL Association for Children and state standards; and
(B) Being approved by the local court-appointed special
advocate program, which will include appropriate criminal background and
child abuse registry checks.
(3) Each court-appointed special advocate shall:
(A)(i) Investigate the case to which he or she is assigned
to provide independent factual information to the court through the attorney
ad litem, court testimony, or court reports.
(ii) The court-appointed special advocate may testify
if called as a witness.
(iii) When the court-appointed special advocate
prepares a written report for the court, the advocate shall provide all
parties or the attorney of record with a copy of the written report seven (7)
business days before the relevant hearing; and
(B) Monitor the case to which he or she is assigned to
ensure compliance with the court's orders.
(4) Upon presentation of an order of appointment, a court-
appointed special advocate shall be provided access to all records relevant
to the juvenile's case, including, but not limited to, school records,
medical records, all court records relating to the juvenile and his or her
family, and department records, including those maintained electronically and
in the Children's Reporting and Information System, to the extent permitted
by federal law.
(5) A court-appointed special advocate is not a party to the
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
case to which he or she is assigned and shall not call witnesses or examine
witnesses.
(6) A court-appointed special advocate shall not be liable for
damages for personal injury or property damage pursuant to the Arkansas
Volunteer Immunity Act, § 16-6-101 et seq.
(7) Except as provided in this subsection, a court-appointed
special advocate shall not disclose any confidential information or reports
to anyone except as ordered by the court or otherwise provided by law.
(h)(1)(A) All parents and custodians have a right to counsel in all
dependency-neglect proceedings.
(B) In all dependency-neglect proceedings that set out to
remove legal custody from a parent or custodian:
(i) The parent or custodian from whom custody was
removed shall have the right to be appointed counsel; and
(ii) The court may appoint an attorney to a:
(a)(1) Noncustodial parent if the court
determines that the noncustodial parent has demonstrated a significant
custodial relationship with the juvenile.
(2) A determination that the
noncustodial parent has demonstrated a significant custodial relationship
with the juvenile shall be made at the first appearance of the noncustodial
parent in the matter; or
(b)(1) Putative parent if the putative parent
has demonstrated significant contact with the juvenile and the court finds
the rights of the putative parent have attached.
(2) A determination on whether the
rights of the putative parent have attached shall be made at the first
appearance of the putative parent in the matter.
(3) Counsel shall not be appointed to a
putative parent if the:
(A) Court finds that the putative
parent has not demonstrated significant contact with the juvenile;
(B) Court finds that the rights of
the putative parent have not attached; or
(C) The putative parent does not
appear in the matter.
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(4) If a putative parent fails to
demonstrate significant contacts with the juvenile, the court shall inform
the putative parent on the following:
(A) How to be considered a parent
under the Arkansas Juvenile Code of 1989, § 9-27-301 et seq.;
(B) The eligibility requirements
for being appointed counsel; and
(C) The process for requesting the
appointment of counsel if the putative parent meets the eligibility
requirements for being appointed counsel.
(C) Counsel shall not be appointed to a party in a
dependency-neglect proceeding unless:
(i) The court finds that the parent, putative
parent, or custodian of the juvenile is indigent; and
(ii) Counsel is requested by the parent, putative
parent, or custodian of the juvenile after the parent, putative parent, or
custodian is informed of his or her right to be appointed counsel.
(D)(i) Parents, putative parents, and custodians shall be
advised in the dependency-neglect petition or the ex parte emergency order,
whichever is sooner, and at the first appearance before the court, of the
right to counsel and the right to appointed counsel, if eligible.
(ii) As required under § 9-27-314, a circuit court
shall appoint counsel in an ex parte emergency order and shall determine
eligibility at the commencement of the probable cause hearing.
(E) All parents shall have the right to be appointed
counsel in termination of parental rights hearings, and the court shall
appoint counsel if the court makes a finding that the parent is indigent and
counsel is requested by the parent.
(F) In a dependency-neglect proceeding naming a minor
parent as a defendant, the court shall appoint a qualified parent counsel for
the minor parent.
(2) If at the permanency planning hearing or at any time the
court establishes the goal of adoption and counsel has not yet been appointed
for a parent, the court shall appoint counsel to represent the parent as
provided by subdivision (h)(1)(E) of this section.
(3)(A) Except as otherwise provided by this chapter, putative
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
parents do not have a right to appointed counsel in dependency-neglect
proceedings.
(B) A putative parent may be appointed counsel for a
termination of parental rights proceeding if the court finds the following on
the record:
(i) The putative parent is indigent;
(ii) The putative parent has established significant
contacts with the juvenile so that putative rights attach;
(iii) Due process requires appointment of counsel for
a full and fair hearing for the putative parent in the termination hearing;
and
(iv) The putative parent requested counsel.
(4)(A) A putative parent has the burden to prove paternity and
significant contacts with the child.
(B) The court shall make the findings required in
subdivision (h)(3) of this section to determine whether a putative parent is
entitled to appointed counsel at the termination hearing.
(C)(i) The termination petition shall include the putative
parent as provided under § 9-27-311(c)(2)(B).
(ii) The court shall appoint counsel subject to
subdivision (h)(3) of this section for the putative parent at any time the
court establishes adoption as the case goal with a termination of parental
rights petition to be filed.
(5)(A) The court shall order financially able parents or
custodians to pay all or part of reasonable attorney's fees and expenses for
court-appointed representation after review by the court of an affidavit of
financial means completed and verified by the parent or custodian and a
determination by the court of an ability to pay.
(B)(i) All moneys collected by the clerk under this
subsection shall be retained by the clerk and deposited into a special fund
to be known as the “Juvenile Court Representation Fund”.
(ii) The court may direct that money from the fund be
used in providing counsel for indigent parents or custodians at the trial
level in dependency-neglect proceedings.
(iii) Upon a determination of indigency and a finding
by the court that the fund does not have sufficient funds to pay reasonable
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
attorney's fees and expenses incurred at the trial court level and state
funds have been exhausted, the court may order the county to pay these
reasonable fees and expenses until the state provides funding for counsel.
(6)(A) Appointment of counsel shall be made at a time
sufficiently in advance of the court appearance to allow adequate preparation
by appointed counsel and adequate consultation between the appointed counsel
and the client.
(B)(i) When the first appearance before the court is an
emergency hearing to remove custody under § 9-27-315, parents shall be
appointed a parent counsel in a timely manner for meaningful representation
until eligibility for appointed counsel is determined by the court under
subdivision (h)(1)(B) of this section.
(ii) If in the interest of time or availability of
qualified parent counsel it becomes necessary for a provisional parent
counsel or counsel other than the parent counsel originally appointed under
subdivision (h)(1)(B) of this section, a substitute parent counsel shall be
appointed.
(7) The attorney for the parent or custodian shall be provided
access to all records relevant to the juvenile's case, including without
limitation school records, medical records, all court records relating to the
juvenile and his or her family, and department records relating to the
juvenile and his or her family, including those maintained electronically and
in the Children's Reporting and Information System, to which the parent or
custodian is entitled under state and federal law.
(8)(A) In all cases where a court has determined that appointed
counsel for an indigent parent or custodian is necessary under this
subsection, the court shall appoint counsel in compliance with federal law
and Supreme Court Administrative Order No. 15.
(B) When a court orders payment of funds for parent
counsel on behalf of an indigent parent or custodian from a state contract,
the court shall make written findings in the appointment order in compliance
with this section.

9-27-317. Waiver of right to counsel — Detention of juvenile —
Questioning.
(a) Waiver of the right to counsel at a delinquency or family in need
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
of services hearing shall be accepted only upon a finding by the court from
clear and convincing evidence, after questioning the juvenile, that:
(1) The juvenile understands the full implications of the right
to counsel;
(2) The juvenile freely, voluntarily, and intelligently wishes
to waive the right to counsel; and
(3) The parent, guardian, custodian, or counsel for the juvenile
has agreed with the juvenile's decision to waive the right to counsel.
(b) The agreement of the parent, guardian, custodian, or attorney
shall be accepted by the court only if the court finds:
(1) That the person has freely, voluntarily, and intelligently
made the decision to agree with the juvenile's waiver of the right to
counsel;
(2) That the person has no interest adverse to the juvenile; and
(3) That the person has consulted with the juvenile in regard to
the juvenile's waiver of the right to counsel.
(c) In determining whether a juvenile's waiver of the right to counsel
at any stage of the proceeding was made freely, voluntarily, and
intelligently, the court shall consider all the circumstances of the waiver,
including:
(1) The juvenile's physical, mental, and emotional maturity;
(2) Whether the juvenile understood the consequences of the
waiver;
(3) In cases in which the custodial parent, guardian, or
custodian agreed with the juvenile's waiver of the right to counsel, whether
the parent, guardian, or custodian understood the consequences of the waiver;
(4) Whether the juvenile and his or her custodial parent,
guardian, or custodian were informed of the alleged delinquent act;
(5) Whether the waiver of the right to counsel was the result of
any coercion, force, or inducement;
(6) Whether the juvenile and his or her custodial parent,
guardian, or custodian had been advised of the juvenile's right to remain
silent and to the appointment of counsel and had waived such rights; and
(7) Whether the waiver was recorded in audio or video format and
the circumstances surrounding the availability or unavailability of the
recorded waiver.
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(d) No waiver of the right to counsel shall be accepted in any case in
which the parent, guardian, or custodian has filed a petition against the
juvenile, initiated the filing of a petition against the juvenile, or
requested the removal of the juvenile from the home.
(e) No waiver of the right to counsel shall be accepted in any case in
which counsel was appointed due to the likelihood of the juvenile's
commitment to an institution under § 9-27-316(d).
(f) No waiver of counsel shall be accepted when a juvenile has been
designated an extended juvenile jurisdiction offender.
(g) No waiver of the right to counsel shall be accepted when a
juvenile is in the custody of the Department of Human Services, including the
Division of Youth Services.
(h)(1) All waivers of the right to counsel, except those made in the
presence of the court pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, shall be in
writing and signed by the juvenile.
(2)(A) When a custodial parent, guardian, or custodian cannot be
located or is located and refuses to go to the place where the juvenile is
being held, counsel shall be appointed for the juvenile.
(B) Procedures shall then be the same as if the juvenile
had invoked counsel.
(i)(1)(A) Whenever a law enforcement officer has reasonable cause to
believe that any juvenile found at or near the scene of a felony is a witness
to the offense, he or she may stop that juvenile.
(B) After having identified himself or herself, the
officer must advise the juvenile of the purpose of the stopping and may then
demand of the juvenile his or her name, address, and any information the
juvenile may have regarding the offense.
(C) Such detention shall in all cases be reasonable and
shall not exceed fifteen (15) minutes, unless the juvenile shall refuse to
give this information, in which case the juvenile, if detained further, shall
immediately be brought before any judicial officer or prosecuting attorney to
be examined with reference to his or her name, address, or the information
the juvenile may have regarding the offense.
(2)(A) A law enforcement officer who takes a juvenile into
custody for a delinquent or criminal offense shall advise the juvenile of his
or her Miranda rights in the juvenile's own language.
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(B) A law enforcement officer shall not question a
juvenile who has been taken into custody for a delinquent act or criminal
offense until the law enforcement officer has advised the juvenile of his or
her rights pursuant to subdivision (i)(2)(C) of this section in the
juvenile's own language.
(C) A law enforcement officer shall not question a
juvenile who has been taken into custody for a delinquent act or criminal
offense if the juvenile has indicated in any manner that he or she:
(i) Does not wish to be questioned;
(ii) Wishes to speak with his or her custodial
parent, guardian, or custodian or to have that person present; or
(iii) Wishes to consult counsel before submitting to
any questioning.
(D) Any waiver of the right to counsel by a juvenile shall
conform to subsection (h) of this section.

9-27-318. Filing and transfer to criminal division of circuit court.
(a) The state may proceed with a case as a delinquency only when the
case involves a juvenile:
(1) Fifteen (15) years of age or younger when the alleged
delinquent act occurred, except as provided by subdivision (c)(2) of this
section; or
(2) Less than eighteen (18) years of age when he or she engages
in conduct that if committed by an adult would be any misdemeanor.
(b) The state may file a motion in the juvenile division of circuit
court to transfer a case to the criminal division of circuit court or to
designate a juvenile as an extended juvenile jurisdiction offender when a
case involves a juvenile:
(1) Fourteen (14) or fifteen (15) years old when he or she
engages in conduct that if committed by an adult would be:
(A) Murder in the second degree, § 5-10-103;
(B) Battery in the second degree in violation of § 5-13-
202(a)(2), (3), or (4);
(C) Possession of a handgun on school property, § 5-73-
119(b)(1)(A);
(D) Aggravated assault, § 5-13-204;
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(E) Unlawful discharge of a firearm from a vehicle, § 5-
74-107;
(F) Any felony committed while armed with a firearm;
(G) Soliciting a minor to join a criminal street gang, §
5-74-203;
(H) Criminal use of prohibited weapons, § 5-73-104;
(I) First degree escape, § 5-54-110;
(J) Second degree escape, § 5-54-111; or
(K) A felony attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
commit any of the following offenses:
(i) Capital murder, § 5-10-101;
(ii) Murder in the first degree, § 5-10-102;
(iii) Murder in the second degree, § 5-10-103;
(iv) Kidnapping, § 5-11-102;
(v) Aggravated robbery, § 5-12-103;
(vi) Rape, § 5-14-103;
(vii) Battery in the first degree, § 5-13-201;
(viii) First degree escape, § 5-54-110; and
(ix) Second degree escape, § 5-54-111;
(2) At least fourteen (14) years old when he or she engages in
conduct that constitutes a felony under § 5-73-119(a); or
(3) At least fourteen (14) years old when he or she engages in
conduct that, if committed by an adult, constitutes a felony and who has,
within the preceding two (2) years, three (3) times been adjudicated as a
delinquent juvenile for acts that would have constituted felonies if they had
been committed by an adult.
(c) A prosecuting attorney may charge a juvenile in either the
juvenile or criminal division of circuit court when a case involves a
juvenile:
(1) At least sixteen (16) years old when he or she engages in
conduct that, if committed by an adult, would be any felony; or
(2) Fourteen (14) or fifteen (15) years old when he or she
engages in conduct that, if committed by an adult, would be:
(A) Capital murder, § 5-10-101;
(B) Murder in the first degree, § 5-10-102;
(C) Kidnapping, § 5-11-102;
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(D) Aggravated robbery, § 5-12-103;
(E) Rape, § 5-14-103;
(F) Battery in the first degree, § 5-13-201; or
(G) Terroristic act, § 5-13-310.
(d) If a prosecuting attorney can file charges in the criminal
division of circuit court for an act allegedly committed by a juvenile, the
state may file any other criminal charges that arise out of the same act or
course of conduct in the same division of the circuit court case if, after a
hearing before the juvenile division of circuit court, a transfer is so
ordered.
(e) Upon the motion of the court or of any party, the judge of the
division of circuit court in which a delinquency petition or criminal charges
have been filed shall conduct a transfer hearing to determine whether to
transfer the case to another division of circuit court.
(f) The court shall conduct a transfer hearing within thirty (30) days
if the juvenile is detained and no longer than ninety (90) days from the date
of the motion to transfer the case.
(g) In the transfer hearing, the court shall consider all of the
following factors:
(1) The seriousness of the alleged offense and whether the
protection of society requires prosecution in the criminal division of
circuit court;
(2) Whether the alleged offense was committed in an aggressive,
violent, premeditated, or willful manner;
(3) Whether the offense was against a person or property, with
greater weight being given to offenses against persons, especially if
personal injury resulted;
(4) The culpability of the juvenile, including the level of
planning and participation in the alleged offense;
(5) The previous history of the juvenile, including whether the
juvenile had been adjudicated a juvenile offender and, if so, whether the
offenses were against persons or property, and any other previous history of
antisocial behavior or patterns of physical violence;
(6) The sophistication or maturity of the juvenile as determined
by consideration of the juvenile's home, environment, emotional attitude,
pattern of living, or desire to be treated as an adult;
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(7) Whether there are facilities or programs available to the
judge of the juvenile division of circuit court that are likely to
rehabilitate the juvenile before the expiration of the juvenile's twenty-
first birthday;
(8) Whether the juvenile acted alone or was part of a group in
the commission of the alleged offense;
(9) Written reports and other materials relating to the
juvenile's mental, physical, educational, and social history; and
(10) Any other factors deemed relevant by the judge.
(h)(1) The court shall make written findings on all of the factors set
forth in subsection (g) of this section.
(2) Upon a finding by clear and convincing evidence that a case
should be transferred to another division of circuit court, the judge shall
enter an order to that effect.
(i) Upon a finding by the criminal division of circuit court that a
juvenile fourteen (14) through seventeen (17) years of age and charged with
the crimes in subdivision (c)(2) of this section should be transferred to the
juvenile division of circuit court, the criminal division of circuit court
may enter an order to transfer as an extended juvenile jurisdiction case.
(j) If a juvenile fourteen (14) or fifteen (15) years of age is found
guilty in the criminal division of circuit court for an offense other than an
offense listed in subsection (b) or subdivision (c)(2) of this section, the
judge shall enter a juvenile delinquency disposition under § 9-27-330.
(k) If the case is transferred to another division, any bail or
appearance bond given for the appearance of the juvenile shall continue in
effect in the division to which the case is transferred.
(l) Any party may appeal from a transfer order.
(m) The circuit court may conduct a transfer hearing and an extended
juvenile jurisdiction hearing under § 9-27-503 at the same time.

9-27-319. Double jeopardy.
(a) No juvenile who has been subjected to an adjudication pursuant to
a petition alleging him or her to be delinquent shall be tried later under
criminal charges based upon facts alleged in the petition to find him or her
delinquent.
(b) No juvenile who has been tried for a violation of the criminal
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
laws of this state shall be later subjected to a delinquency proceeding
arising out of the facts that formed the basis of the criminal charges.

9-27-320. Fingerprinting or photographing.
(a)(1) When a juvenile is arrested for any offense that if committed
by an adult would constitute a Class Y, Class A, or Class B felony, the
juvenile shall be photographed and fingerprinted by the law enforcement
agency.
(2) In the case of an allegation of delinquency, a juvenile
shall not be photographed or fingerprinted under this subchapter by any law
enforcement agency unless he or she has been taken into custody for the
commission of an offense that, if committed by an adult, would constitute a
Class Y, Class A, or Class B felony.
(b)(1) Copies of a juvenile's fingerprints and photographs shall be
made available only to other law enforcement agencies, the Arkansas Crime
Information Center, prosecuting attorneys, and the juvenile division of
circuit court.
(2) Photographs and fingerprints of juveniles adjudicated
delinquent for offenses for which they could have been tried as adults shall
be made available to prosecuting attorneys and circuit courts for use at
sentencing in subsequent adult criminal proceedings against those same
individuals.
(3)(A) When a juvenile departs without authorization from a
youth services center or other facility operated by the Division of Youth
Services for the care of delinquent juveniles, if at the time of departure
the juvenile is committed or detained for an offense for which the juvenile
could have been tried as an adult, the Director of the Division of Youth
Services shall release to the general public the name, age, and description
of the juvenile and any other pertinent information the Director of the
Division of Youth Services deems necessary to aid in the apprehension of the
juvenile and to safeguard the public welfare.
(B) When a juvenile departs without authorization from the
Arkansas State Hospital, if at the time of departure the juvenile is
committed as a result of an acquittal on the grounds of mental disease or
defect for an offense for which the juvenile could have been tried as an
adult, the Director of the Division of Aging, Adult, and Behavioral Health
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
Services of the Department of Human Services shall release to the general
public the name, age, and description of the juvenile and any other pertinent
information the Director of the Division of Aging, Adult, and Behavioral
Health Services deems necessary to aid in the apprehension of the juvenile
and to safeguard the public welfare.
(C) When a juvenile departs without authorization from a
local juvenile detention facility, if at the time of departure the juvenile
is committed or detained for an offense for which the juvenile could have
been tried as an adult, the director of the juvenile detention facility shall
release to the general public the name, age, and description of the juvenile
and any other pertinent information the director of the juvenile detention
facility deems necessary to aid in the apprehension of the juvenile and to
safeguard the public welfare.
(c) Each law enforcement agency in the state shall keep a separate
file of photographs and fingerprints, it being the intention that the
photographs and fingerprints of juveniles not be kept in the same file with
those of adults.
(d) When a juvenile is adjudicated delinquent for an offense for which
the juvenile could be charged as an adult:
(1) The arresting law enforcement agency shall ensure that the
fingerprints and photograph of the juvenile have been properly taken and
submitted; and
(2) The court shall submit the adjudicated delinquent
information to the center.
(e) If the juvenile is found not to have committed the alleged
delinquent act, the court may order a law enforcement agency to return all
pictures and fingerprints to the circuit court and shall order the law
enforcement agency that took the juvenile into custody to mark the arrest
record with the notation “found not to have committed the alleged offense”.
(f) The center shall create a form to be used for the reporting and
expungement of juvenile information.
(g) If the juvenile is arrested for a Class Y, Class A, or Class B
felony but not charged, the prosecuting attorney shall submit the information
to the center and the arrest shall be removed from the center's records.

9-27-321. Statements not admissible.
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
Statements made by a juvenile to the intake officer or probation
officer during the intake process before a hearing on the merits of the
petition filed against the juvenile shall not be used or be admissible
against the juvenile at any stage of any proceedings in circuit court or in
any other court.

9-27-322. Release from custody.
(a) Upon receiving notice that a juvenile has been taken into custody
on an allegation of delinquency, the intake officer shall immediately notify
the juvenile's parent, guardian, or custodian of the location at which the
juvenile is being held and of the reasons for the juvenile's detention if
such notification has not previously taken place and shall:
(1) Unconditionally release the juvenile to the juvenile's
parent, guardian, or custodian;
(2) Release the juvenile to the juvenile's parent, guardian, or
custodian upon the written promise of the parent, guardian, or custodian to
bring the juvenile before the court when summoned;
(3) Release the juvenile to the juvenile's parent, guardian, or
custodian upon written conditions to ensure the juvenile will be brought
before the court;
(4) Pending court review, place the juvenile in shelter care if
unable to locate the juvenile's parent, guardian, or custodian;
(5) Pending court review, place the juvenile on electronic
monitoring; or
(6) Detain the juvenile pending a detention hearing before the
circuit court.
(b) Criteria for Release by Intake Officer.
(1) In determining whether to detain a juvenile who has been
taken into custody on an allegation of delinquency pending a detention
hearing, the intake officer shall consider the following facts:
(A) Ties to the community, including:
(i) Place and length of residence;
(ii) School attendance;
(iii) Present and past employment;
(iv) Family relationships; and
(v) References; and
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(B) Nature of the alleged offense, including:
(i) Whether the offense would constitute a felony or
misdemeanor;
(ii) The use of force or violence;
(iii) Prior juvenile or criminal record; and
(iv) Any history of failure to appear for court
appearances.
(2) The intake officer may determine that there is no less
restrictive alternative to detention if detention is necessary:
(A) To prevent imminent bodily harm to the juvenile or to
another; or
(B) To prevent flight when the juvenile is a fugitive or
escapee from another jurisdiction.
(3) Only if a substantial number of the facts considered under
subdivision (b)(1) of this section weigh against the juvenile or one (1) of
the two (2) circumstances in subdivision (b)(2) of this section exists shall
the juvenile be detained pending a detention hearing by the court.
(c) The juvenile and his or her parent, guardian, or custodian shall
not be charged the cost of detention, shelter, or electronic monitoring
authorized by a juvenile officer under subsection (a) of this section.

9-27-323. Diversion — Conditions — Agreement — Completion — Definition.
(a) If the prosecuting attorney, after consultation with the intake
officer, determines that a diversion of a delinquency case is in the best
interests of the juvenile and the community, the officer with the consent of
the juvenile and his or her parent, guardian, or custodian may attempt to
make a satisfactory diversion of a case.
(b) If the intake officer determines that a diversion of a family in
need of services case is in the best interest of the juvenile and the
community, the officer with the consent of the petitioner, juvenile, and his
or her parent, guardian, or custodian may attempt to make a satisfactory
diversion of a case.
(c) In addition to the requirements of subsections (a) and (b) of this
section, a diversion of a case is subject to the following conditions:
(1) The juvenile has admitted his or her involvement in:
(A) A delinquent act for a delinquency diversion; or
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(B) A family in need of services act for a family in need
of services diversion;
(2) The intake officer advises the juvenile and his or her
parent, guardian, or custodian that they have the right to refuse a diversion
of the case and demand the filing of a petition and a formal adjudication;
(3) Any diversion agreement is entered into voluntarily and
intelligently by the juvenile with the advice of his or her attorney or by
the juvenile with the consent of a parent, guardian, or custodian if the
juvenile is not represented by counsel;
(4) The diversion agreement provides for the supervision of a
juvenile or the referral of the juvenile to a public or private agency for
services not to exceed six (6) months;
(5) All other terms of a diversion agreement do not exceed nine
(9) months; and
(6) The juvenile and his or her parent, guardian, or custodian
shall have the right to terminate the diversion agreement at any time and to
request the filing of a petition and a formal adjudication.
(d)(1) The terms of the diversion agreement shall:
(A) Be in writing in simple, ordinary, and understandable
language;
(B) State that the agreement was entered into voluntarily
by the juvenile;
(C) Name the attorney or other person who advised the
juvenile upon the juvenile's entering into the agreement; and
(D) Be signed by all parties to the agreement and by the
prosecuting attorney if it is a delinquency case and the offense would
constitute a felony if committed by an adult or a family in need of services
case pursuant to § 6-18-222.
(2) A copy of the diversion agreement shall be given to the
juvenile, the counsel for the juvenile, the parent, guardian, or custodian,
and the intake officer, who shall retain the copy in the case file.
(e) Diversion agreements shall be:
(1) Implemented by all juvenile courts based on validated
assessment tools; and
(2) Used to provide for:
(A) Nonjudicial probation under the supervision of the
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
intake officer or probation officer for a period during which the juvenile
may be required to comply with specified conditions concerning his or her
conduct and activities;
(B) Participation in a court-approved program of
education, counseling, or treatment;
(C) Participation in a court-approved teen court;
(D) Participation in a juvenile drug court program;
(E) Enrollment in the Regional Educational Career
Alternative School System for Adjudicated Youth; and
(F)(i) Payment of restitution to the victim.
(ii) Payments of restitution under subdivision
(e)(2)(F)(i) of this section shall be paid under § 16-13-326.
(f)(1) If a diversion of a complaint has been made, a petition based
upon the events out of which the original complaint arose may be filed only
during the period for which the agreement was entered into.
(2) If a petition is filed within this period, the juvenile's
compliance with all proper and reasonable terms of the agreement shall be
grounds for dismissal of the petition by the court.
(g) The diversion agreement may be terminated, and the prosecuting
attorney in a delinquency case or the petitioner in a family in need of
services case may file a petition if at any time during the agreement period:
(1) The juvenile or his or her parent, guardian, or custodian
declines to further participate in the diversion process;
(2) The juvenile fails, without reasonable excuse, to attend a
scheduled conference;
(3) The juvenile appears unable or unwilling to benefit from the
diversion process; or
(4) The intake officer becomes apprised of new or additional
information that indicates that further efforts at diversion would not be in
the best interests of the juvenile or society.
(h) Upon the satisfactory completion of the diversion period:
(1) The juvenile shall be dismissed without further proceedings;
(2) The intake officer shall furnish written notice of the
dismissal to the juvenile and his or her parent, guardian, or custodian; and
(3) The complaint and the agreement, and all references thereto,
may be expunged by the court from the juvenile's file.
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(i)(1) A juvenile intake or probation officer may charge a diversion
fee only after review of an affidavit of financial means and a determination
of the juvenile's or the juvenile's parent's, guardian's, or custodian's
ability to pay the fee.
(2) The diversion fee shall not exceed twenty dollars ($20.00)
per month to the juvenile division of circuit court.
(3) The court may direct that the fees be collected by the
juvenile officer, sheriff, or court clerk for the county in which the fees
are charged.
(4) The officer designated by the court to collect diversion
fees shall maintain receipts and account for all incoming fees and shall
deposit the fees at least weekly into the county treasury of the county where
the fees are collected and in which diversion services are provided.
(5) The diversion fees shall be deposited into the account with
the juvenile service fees under § 16-13-326.
(j)(1) In judicial districts having more than one (1) county, the
judge may designate the treasurer of one (1) of the counties in the district
as the depository of all juvenile fees collected in the district.
(2) The treasurer so designated by the court shall maintain a
separate account of the juvenile fees collected and expended in each county
in the district.
(3) Money remaining at the end of the fiscal year shall not
revert to any other fund but shall carry over to the next fiscal year.
(4) The funds derived from the collection of diversion fees
shall be used by agreement of the judge or judges of the circuit court
designated to hear juvenile cases in their district plan pursuant to Supreme
Court Administrative Order No. 14, originally issued April 6, 2001, and the
quorum court of the county to provide services and supplies to juveniles at
the discretion of the juvenile division of circuit court.
(k)(1) The Department of Human Services shall develop a statewide
referral protocol for helping to coordinate the delivery of services to
sexually exploited children.
(2) As used in this section, “sexually exploited child” means a
person less than eighteen (18) years of age who has been subject to sexual
exploitation because the person:
(A) Is a victim of trafficking of persons under § 5-18-
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
103;
(B) Is a victim of child sex trafficking under 18 U.S.C. §
1591, as it existed on January 1, 2013; or
(C) Engages in an act of prostitution under § 5-70-102 or
sexual solicitation under § 5-70-103.

9-27-324. Preliminary investigation.
(a) Upon receiving notice that a juvenile has been taken into custody
on an allegation of delinquency, the intake officer shall also conduct a
preliminary investigation.
(b) In the course of a preliminary investigation, the intake officer
may:
(1) Interview the complainant, victim, or witnesses of the act
and circumstances alleged in the complaint;
(2) Review existing records of the court, law enforcement
agencies, and public records of other agencies; and
(3) Hold conferences with the juvenile and his or her parent,
guardian, or custodian for the purpose of interviewing them and discussing
the disposition of the complaint.
(c) Any additional inquiries may be made only with the consent of the
juvenile and his or her parent, guardian, or custodian.
(d)(1) Participation of the juvenile and his or her parent, guardian,
or custodian in a conference with an intake officer shall be voluntary, with
the right to refuse to continue participation at any time.
(2) At the conferences, the juvenile and his or her parent,
guardian, or custodian shall be advised of the juvenile's right to assistance
of counsel and the right to remain silent when questioned by the intake
officer.

9-27-325. Hearings — Generally.
(a)(1)(A) All hearings shall be conducted by the judge without a jury,
except as provided by the Extended Juvenile Jurisdiction Act, § 9-27-501 et
seq.
(B) If a juvenile is designated an extended juvenile
jurisdiction offender, the juvenile shall have a right to a jury trial at the
adjudication.
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(2) The juvenile shall be advised of the right to a jury trial
by the court following a determination that the juvenile will be tried as an
extended juvenile jurisdiction offender.
(3) The right to a jury trial may be waived by a juvenile only
after being advised of his or her rights and after consultation with the
juvenile's attorney.
(4) The waiver shall be in writing and signed by the juvenile
and the juvenile's attorney.
(b)(1) The defendant need not file a written responsive pleading in
order to be heard by the court.
(2) In dependency-neglect proceedings, if not appointed by the
court in an order provided to all parties, counsel shall file a notice of
appearance immediately upon acceptance of representation, with a copy to be
served on the petitioner and all parties.
(c)(1) At the time set for hearing, the court may:
(A) Proceed to hear the case only if the juvenile is
present or excused for good cause by the court; or
(B) Continue the case upon determination that the presence
of an adult defendant is necessary.
(2) Upon determining that a necessary party is not present
before the court, the court may:
(A) Issue an order for contempt if the juvenile was served
with an order to appear; or
(B) Issue an order to appear, with a time and place set by
the court for hearing, if the juvenile was served with a notice of hearing.
(d)(1) The court shall be a court of record.
(2) A record of all proceedings shall be kept in the same manner
as other proceedings of circuit court and in accordance with rules
promulgated by the Supreme Court.
(e)(1) Unless otherwise indicated, the Arkansas Rules of Evidence
shall apply.
(2)(A) Upon motion of any party, the court may order that the
father, mother, and child submit to scientific testing for drug or alcohol
abuse.
(B) A written report of the test results prepared by the
person conducting the test, or by a person under whose supervision or
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
direction the test and analysis have been performed, certified by an
affidavit subscribed and sworn to by him or her before a notary public, may
be introduced in evidence without calling the person as a witness unless a
motion challenging the test procedures or results has been filed within
thirty (30) days before the hearing and bond is posted in an amount
sufficient to cover the costs of the person's appearance to testify.
(C)(i) If contested, documentation of the chain of custody
of samples taken from test subjects shall be verified by affidavit of one (1)
person's witnessing the procedure or extraction, packaging, and mailing of
the samples and by one (1) person's signing for the samples at the place
where the samples are subject to the testing procedure.
(ii) Submission of the affidavits along with the
submission of the test results shall be competent evidence to establish the
chain of custody of those specimens.
(D) Whenever a court orders scientific testing for drug or
alcohol abuse and one (1) of the parties refuses to submit to the testing,
that refusal shall be disclosed at trial and may be considered civil contempt
of court.
(f) Except as otherwise provided in this subchapter, the Arkansas
Rules of Civil Procedure shall apply to all proceedings and the Arkansas
Rules of Criminal Procedure shall apply to delinquency proceedings.
(g) All parties shall have the right to compel attendance of witnesses
in accordance with the Arkansas Rules of Civil Procedure and the Arkansas
Rules of Criminal Procedure.
(h)(1) The petitioner in all proceedings shall bear the burden of
presenting the case at hearings.
(2)(A) The following burdens of proof shall apply:
(i) Proof beyond a reasonable doubt in delinquency
hearings;
(ii) Proof by a preponderance of the evidence in
dependency-neglect proceedings, except if subject to the Indian Child Welfare
Act of 1978, 25 U.S.C. § 1901 et seq., family in need of services, and
probation revocation hearings; and
(iii) Proof by clear and convincing evidence for
hearings to terminate parental rights, except if subject to the Indian Child
Welfare Act of 1978, 25 U.S.C. § 1901 et seq., transfer hearings, and in
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
hearings to determine whether or not reunification services shall be
provided.
(B) If the Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978, 25 U.S.C. §
1901 et seq., applies, the following burdens of proof shall apply:
(i) Clear and convincing evidence in probable cause,
adjudication, review, and permanency planning hearings; and
(ii) Beyond a reasonable doubt in termination of
parental rights hearings that are subject to the Indian Child Welfare Act of
1978, 25 U.S.C. § 1901 et seq.
(i)(1)(A) Except as provided by this section, all hearings involving
allegations and reports of child maltreatment and all hearings involving
cases of children in foster care shall be closed.
(B)(i) A member of the General Assembly may attend any
hearing held under this subchapter, including a closed hearing, unless the
court excludes the member of the General Assembly based on the:
(a) Best interest of the child; or
(b) Court's authority under the Arkansas Rules
of Civil Procedure or the Arkansas Rules of Evidence.
(ii) Except as otherwise provided by law, a member of
the General Assembly who attends a hearing in accordance with subdivision
(i)(1)(B)(i) of this section shall not disclose information obtained during
his or her attendance at the hearing.
(C)(i)(a) A Child Welfare Ombudsman may attend a hearing
held under this subchapter, including a closed hearing.
(b) However, a court may exclude the Child
Welfare Ombudsman from a hearing if:
(1) It is in the best interest of the
child; or
(2) The reason for the exclusion is
based on the authority of the court under the Arkansas Rules of Civil
Procedure or the Arkansas Rules of Evidence.
(ii) Unless otherwise allowed by law, the Child
Welfare Ombudsman shall not disclose information that he or she obtains
through his or her attendance at a hearing held under this subchapter.
(D)(i) A relative, fictive kin, or individual with a
connection to the family involved in a dependency-neglect proceeding may
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
attend a hearing unless the court determines:
(a) The best interest of the child requires
the relative, fictive kin, or individual with a connection to the family
involved in the dependency-neglect proceeding to be excluded from the
hearing; or
(b) It is within the authority of the court
under the Arkansas Rules of Civil Procedure or the Arkansas Rules of Evidence
to exclude the relative, fictive kin, or individual with a connection to the
family involved in the dependency-neglect proceeding from the hearing.
(ii) The court shall confirm the identity of each
relative, fictive kin, or individual with a connection to the family involved
in the dependency-neglect proceeding to determine if the relative, fictive
kin, or individual with a connection to the family involved in the
dependency-neglect proceeding should be excluded from the hearing.
(iii) A relative, fictive kin, or individual with a
connection to the family involved in the dependency-neglect proceeding who is
permitted to attend a hearing shall not disclose any information obtained
during the hearing.
(E)(i) The court may allow an individual with an interest
in attending a closed hearing in a dependency-neglect proceeding to attend
the hearing if:
(a) It is in the best interest of the child;
and
(b) The individual demonstrates a sincere and
legitimate need to attend the hearing as determined by the court.
(ii) An individual who attends a hearing in
accordance with subdivision (i)(1)(E)(i) of this section shall not disclose
any information obtained during the hearing.
(F) An individual who discloses information in violation
of subdivision (i)(1)(D)(iii) and subdivision (i)(1)(E)(ii) of this section
is guilty of a Class C misdemeanor.
(2) All other hearings may be closed within the discretion of
the court, except that in delinquency cases the juvenile shall have the right
to an open hearing, and in adoption cases the hearings shall be closed as
provided in the Revised Uniform Adoption Act, § 9-9-201 et seq.
(j) Except as provided in § 9-27-502, in any juvenile delinquency
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
proceeding in which the juvenile's fitness to proceed is put in issue by any
party or the court, the provisions of § 5-2-301 et seq. shall apply.
(k) In delinquency proceedings, juveniles are entitled to all defenses
available to criminal defendants in circuit court.
(l)(1) The Department of Human Services shall provide to foster
parents and preadoptive parents of a child in department custody notice of
any proceeding to be held with respect to the child.
(2) Relative caregivers shall be provided notice by the original
petitioner in the juvenile matter.
(3)(A) The court shall allow foster parents, preadoptive
parents, and relative caregivers an opportunity to be heard in any proceeding
held with respect to a child in their care but only as witnesses.
(B) Foster parents, adoptive parents, and relative
caregivers shall not be made parties to the proceeding solely on the basis
that the persons are entitled to notice and the opportunity to be heard.
(C) Foster parents, adoptive parents, and relative
caregivers shall not be made parties to the proceeding when reunification
remains the goal of the case.
(D) A foster parent, adoptive parent, preadoptive parent,
or relative caregiver may not offer evidence to be considered by the court
unless he or she is called as a witness.
(m)(1)(A) A grandparent shall be entitled to notice and shall be
granted an opportunity to be heard in any dependency-neglect proceeding
involving a grandchild who is twelve (12) months of age or younger when:
(i) The grandchild resides with this grandparent for
at least six (6) continuous months prior to his or her first birthday;
(ii) The grandparent was the primary caregiver for
and financial supporter of the grandchild during the time the grandchild
resided with the grandparent;
(iii) The continuous custody occurred within one (1)
year of the date the child custody proceeding was initiated; and
(iv) Notice to a grandparent under this subdivision
(m)(1) shall be given by the department.
(B) A grandparent shall be entitled to notice and shall be
granted an opportunity to be heard in any dependency-neglect proceeding
involving a grandchild who is twelve (12) months of age or older when:
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(i) The grandchild resides with this grandparent for
at least one (1) continuous year regardless of age;
(ii) The grandparent was the primary caregiver for
and financial supporter of the grandchild during the time the grandchild
resided with the grandparent; and
(iii) The continuous custody occurred within one (1)
year of the date the child custody proceeding was initiated.
(2) For purposes of this subsection, “grandparent” does not mean
a parent of a putative father of a child.
(n)(1)(A) The department shall make diligent efforts to identify
putative parents in a dependency-neglect proceeding.
(B) Diligent efforts shall include without limitation
checking the Putative Father Registry.
(2)(A)(i) If the petitioner has named and served a putative
parent under this section and § 9-27-311, the court shall resolve the party
status of a putative parent and the rights of the putative parent as a
putative father.
(ii) A court may consider the termination of the
rights of a putative parent under § 9-27-341 if the court finds that the
putative parent has established significant contacts and the rights of the
putative parent as a putative father have attached.
(B) The court shall provide a putative parent the
opportunity to be heard regarding his or her efforts in establishing
paternity and his or her significant contacts with regard to the juvenile
involved in the dependency-neglect proceedings.
(C)(i) The court may order deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA)
testing at any time.
(ii) A court may establish paternity or determine
whether a putative parent is a parent as defined in § 9-27-303 without a
deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) test being ordered by the court or performed.
(D) If there is more than one (1) putative parent of the
juvenile, the court shall order a deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) test of each
identified putative parent to determine the biological parent of the
juvenile.
(E) A deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) test establishing a
putative parent as the biological parent of a juvenile is sufficient evidence
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
on which the court may adjudicate paternity, establish that the putative
parent is a parent for the purposes of this subchapter, and enter a decree of
paternity.
(3) A putative parent has the burden to prove paternity and
significant contacts with the juvenile.
(4)(A) Except as provided under § 9-27-311, a putative parent
shall be named as a party if the circuit court determines that the putative
parent:
(i) Has established paternity and the circuit court
enters an order establishing the putative parent as the parent for the
purposes of this subchapter and directs that the parent be added to the case
as a party defendant; or
(ii) Has established significant contacts with the
juvenile and the circuit court enters an order that putative parent rights
have attached and the putative parent shall be added to the case as a party
defendant.
(B)(i) If the petitioner has named and served a putative
parent under this section and § 9-27-311 and the circuit court finds that the
putative parent has established paternity, the court shall:
(a) Enter an order establishing the putative
parent as a parent for the purposes of this subchapter; and
(b) Maintain the parent as a party defendant.
(ii) If the petitioner has named and served a
putative parent under this section and § 9-27-311 and the circuit court finds
that the putative parent has established significant contacts with the
juvenile, the court shall:
(a) Enter an order stating that the rights of
the putative parent have attached; and
(b) Maintain the putative parent as a party
defendant.
(C) If the circuit court finds that the putative parent,
after being given notice and opportunity to be heard, has not established
paternity or significant contacts, the circuit court shall:
(i) Find that the putative parent is not a parent
for the purposes of this subchapter;
(ii) Find that the rights of the putative parent have
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
not attached; and
(iii) Dismiss the putative parent from the case and
enter an order finding that no further notice, including notice of an
adoption petition concerning the juvenile, is required to be provided to the
putative parent.
(5) The rights of a putative parent to appointed counsel are
subject to § 9-27-316(h)(3).
(o)(1)(A) If the court determines that the health and safety of the
juvenile can be adequately protected and it is in the best interest of the
child, unsupervised family time may occur between a juvenile and a parent.
(B) Unless the court has restricted unsupervised family
time, the department may allow unsupervised family time between a juvenile
and a parent at any time.
(2)(A) A petitioner has the burden of proving at every hearing
that unsupervised family time is not in the best interest of a child.
(B) If the court determines that unsupervised family time
between a juvenile and a parent is not in the best interest of the child,
family time between the juvenile and the parent shall be supervised.
(C)(i) A rebuttable presumption that unsupervised family
time is in the best interest of the juvenile applies at every hearing.
(ii) The burden of proof to rebut the presumption is
proof by a preponderance of the evidence.
(D) The court may consider the preferences of the juvenile
if the juvenile is of a sufficient age and capacity to reason, regardless of
the juvenile's chronological age.
(E)(i) If the court orders supervised family time, the
parent from whom custody of the juvenile has been removed shall receive a
minimum of four (4) hours of supervised family time per week.
(ii) The court may order less than four (4) hours of
supervised family time if the court determines that the supervised family
time:
(a) Is not in the best interest of the
juvenile; or
(b) Will impose an extreme hardship on one (1)
of the parties.
(p) When family time is ordered between a juvenile and the parent:
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(1)(A) A parent's positive result from a drug test is
insufficient to deny the parent family time with a juvenile.
(B) If at the time that family time between the parent and
a juvenile occurs a parent is under the influence of drugs or alcohol,
exhibits behavior that may create an unsafe environment for a child, or
appears to be actively impaired, the family time may be cancelled; and
(2) A relative or fictive kin may transport a juvenile to and
from family time with a parent if:
(A) It is in the best interest of a child;
(B) The relative or fictive kin submits to a background
check and a child maltreatment registry check; and
(C) The relative or fictive kin meets the driving
requirements established by the department.
(q)(1) A court shall set a hearing to address the entry of a written
order if:
(A) The written order is not provided to the court for
entry within the time specified under this subchapter; and
(B) A party files a motion for a hearing to address the
entry of the written order.
(2)(A) The court shall conduct a hearing to address the entry of
the written order within thirty (30) days from the date on which the motion
for a hearing to address the entry of the written order is filed.
(B) A hearing to address the entry of a written order may
be the next scheduled hearing in the proceeding if the hearing to address the
entry of the written order is being held within thirty (30) days from the
date on which the motion for a hearing to address the entry of the written
order is filed.
(C) The court is not required to conduct a hearing to
address the entry of a written order if the written order is submitted to the
court.
(3) The court shall reassign the preparation of the written
order as needed.

9-27-326. Detention hearing.
(a) If a juvenile is taken into custody on an allegation of
delinquency, violation of Division of Youth Services aftercare, violation of
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
probation, or violation of a court order and not released by the law
enforcement officer or intake officer, a detention hearing shall be held as
soon as possible but no later than seventy-two (72) hours after the juvenile
was taken into custody or, if the seventy-two (72) hours ends on a Saturday,
Sunday, or holiday, on the next business day. Otherwise, the juvenile shall
be released.
(b) Prior written notice of the time, place, and purpose of the
detention hearing shall be given to:
(1) The juvenile;
(2) The juvenile's attorney; and
(3)(A) The juvenile's parent, guardian, or custodian.
(B) However, if the court finds after a reasonable,
diligent effort that the petitioner was unable to notify the parent,
guardian, or custodian, the hearing may proceed without notice to that party.
(c) The petitioner shall have the burden of proof by clear and
convincing evidence that the restraint on the juvenile's liberty is necessary
and that no less restrictive alternative will reduce the risk of flight, or
of serious harm to property, or to the physical safety of the juvenile or
others.
(d) During the detention hearing, the court shall:
(1) Inform the juvenile:
(A) Of the reasons continued detention is being sought;
(B) That he or she is not required to say anything, and
that anything he or she says may be used against him or her;
(C) That he or she has a right to counsel; and
(D) That before the hearing proceeds further he or she has
the right to communicate with his or her attorney, parent, guardian, or
custodian, and that reasonable means will be provided for him or her to do
so;
(2) Admit testimony and evidence relevant only to determination
that probable cause exists that the juvenile committed the offense as alleged
and that detention of the juvenile is necessary; and
(3) Assess the following factors in determining whether to
release the juvenile prior to further hearings in the case:
(A) Place and length of residence;
(B) Family relationships;
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(C) References;
(D) School attendance;
(E) Past and present employment;
(F) Juvenile and criminal records;
(G) The juvenile's character and reputation;
(H) Nature of the charge being brought and any mitigating
or aggravating circumstances;
(I) Whether detention is necessary to prevent imminent
bodily harm to the juvenile or to another;
(J) The possibility of additional violations occurring if
the juvenile is released;
(K) Factors that indicate the juvenile is likely to appear
as required; and
(L) Whether conditions should be imposed on the juvenile's
release.
(e)(1) The court shall release the juvenile when there is a finding
that no probable cause exists that the juvenile committed the offense as
alleged.
(2) The court, upon a finding that detention is not necessary,
may release the juvenile:
(A) Upon his or her personal recognizance;
(B) Upon an order to appear;
(C) To his or her parent, guardian, or custodian upon
written promise to bring the juvenile before the court when required;
(D)(i) To the care of a qualified person or agency
agreeing to supervise the juvenile and assist him or her in appearing in
court.
(ii) Provided, that for purposes of this subdivision
(e)(2)(D), “qualified agency” does not include the Department of Human
Services or any of its divisions;
(E)(i) Under the supervision of the probation officer or
other appropriate public official.
(ii) However, for purposes of this subdivision
(e)(2)(E), “appropriate public official” does not include the department;
(F) Upon reasonable restrictions on activities, movements,
associations, and residences of the juvenile;
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(G) On bond to his or her parent, guardian, or custodian;
or
(H) Under such other reasonable restrictions to ensure the
appearance of the juvenile.
(3) If the court determines that only a money bond will ensure
the appearance of the juvenile, the court may require:
(A) An unsecured bond in an amount set by the judicial
officer;
(B) A bond accompanied by a deposit of cash or securities
equal to ten percent (10%) of the face amount set by the court that shall be
returned at the conclusion of the proceedings if the juvenile has not
defaulted in the performance of the conditions of the bond; or
(C) A bond secured by deposit of the full amount in cash,
or by other property, or by obligation of qualified securities.
(4) Orders of conditional release may be modified upon notice,
hearing, and good cause shown.
(5)(A) If the court releases a juvenile under subdivision
(e)(2)(D) of this section, the court may, if necessary for the best interest
of the juvenile, request that the department immediately initiate an
investigation as to whether the juvenile is in imminent danger or a situation
exists whereby the juvenile is dependent-neglected.
(B) The court shall not place preadjudicated juveniles in
the custody of the department except as provided in § 12-12-516 [repealed].
(f)(1) If the juvenile who is being detained is also in the custody of
the department pursuant to a family in need of services or dependency-neglect
petition and the court does not keep the juvenile in detention, then any
issues regarding placement of the juvenile shall be addressed only in the
family in need of services or dependency-neglect case and shall not be an
issue addressed, nor shall any orders be entered in the delinquency case
regarding placement of the juvenile.
(2) Within ten (10) days of the entry of any order in the
delinquency case, the prosecuting attorney shall file a copy of the order in
the juvenile's dependency-neglect or family in need of services case.

9-27-327. Adjudication hearing.
(a)(1)(A) An adjudication hearing shall be held to determine whether
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
the allegations in a petition are substantiated by the proof.
(B)(i) If the court finds that the juvenile is dependent-
neglected, the court shall determine whether a noncustodial parent
contributed to the dependency-neglect and whether the noncustodial parent is
a fit parent for purposes of custody or family time.
(ii) A noncustodial parent in subdivision
(a)(1)(B)(i) of this section is presumed to be a fit parent.
(iii)(a) If no prior court order has been
entered into evidence concerning custody or family time with the noncustodial
parent of the juvenile subject to the dependency-neglect petition, the
petitioner shall, and any party may, provide evidence to the court whether
the noncustodial parent is unfit for purposes of custody or family time.
(b) The petitioner shall provide evidence as
to whether the noncustodial parent contributed to the dependency-neglect.
(iv)(a) The court may transfer temporary
custody or permanent custody to the noncustodial parent after a review of
evidence and a finding that it is in the best interest of the juvenile to
transfer custody, or the court may order family time with the noncustodial
parent.
(b) An order of transfer of custody to the
noncustodial parent does not relieve the Department of Human Services of the
responsibility to provide services to the parent from whom custody was
removed, unless the court enters an order to relieve the department of the
responsibility.
(c) A home study is not required to transfer
custody to a parent of the juvenile.
(v) If the court determines that the child cannot
safely be placed in the custody of the noncustodial parent, the court shall
make specific findings of fact regarding the safety factors that need to be
corrected by the noncustodial parent before placement or family time with the
juvenile.
(2) Unless the court finds that a removal occurred due to an
emergency and the agency had no prior contact with the family or the child,
evidence shall be presented to the court regarding all prior contact between
the agency and the juvenile or the family before a finding of reasonable
efforts to prevent removal by the department.
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(3) A finding of reasonable efforts to prevent removal of the
juvenile is void if the court determines that the department failed to
disclose all prior contact between the agency and juvenile or the family
before the finding.
(4)(A) The dependency-neglect adjudication hearing shall be held
within thirty (30) days after the probable cause hearing under § 9-27-315.
(B) On a motion of the court or any party, the court may
continue the adjudication hearing up to sixty (60) days after the removal
for good cause shown.
(C)(i) The court may continue an adjudication hearing
beyond the sixty-day limitation provided in subdivision (a)(4)(B) of this
section in extraordinary circumstances.
(ii) As used in this subdivision (a)(4)(C),
“extraordinary circumstances” includes without limitation the following
circumstances:
(a) The Supreme Court orders the suspension of
in-person court proceedings; and
(b) One (1) of the following has occurred:
(1) The President of the United States
has declared a national emergency; or
(2) The Governor has declared a state of
emergency or a statewide public health emergency.
(5) If the juvenile has previously been adjudicated a dependent-
neglected juvenile in the same case in which a motion for a change of custody
has been filed to remove the juvenile from the custody of a parent, a
subsequent adjudication is required if the ground for the removal is not the
same as the ground previously adjudicated.
(b) If a juvenile is in detention, an adjudication hearing shall be
held, unless the juvenile or a party is seeking an extended juvenile
jurisdiction designation, not later than fourteen (14) days from the date of
the detention hearing unless waived by the juvenile or good cause is shown
for a continuance.
(c) In extended juvenile jurisdiction offender proceedings, the
adjudication shall be held within the time prescribed by the speedy trial
provisions of Rule 28 of the Arkansas Rules of Criminal Procedure.
(d) Following an adjudication in which a juvenile is found to be
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
delinquent, dependent-neglected, or a member of a family in need of services,
the court may order any studies, evaluations, or predisposition reports, if
needed, that bear on disposition.
(e)(1) All such reports shall be provided in writing to all parties
and counsel at least two (2) days prior to the disposition hearing.
(2) All parties shall be given a fair opportunity to controvert
any parts of such reports.
(f) In dependency-neglect cases, a written adjudication order shall be
filed by the court, or by a party or party's attorney as designated by the
court, within thirty (30) days of the date of the hearing or prior to the
next hearing, whichever is sooner.

9-27-328. Removal of juvenile.
(a) Before a circuit court may order any dependent-neglected juvenile
or family in need of services juvenile removed from the custody of his or her
parent, guardian, or custodian and placed with the Department of Human
Services or other licensed agency responsible for the care of juveniles or
with a relative or other individual, the court shall order family services
appropriate to prevent removal unless the health and safety of the juvenile
warrant immediate removal for the protection of the juvenile.
(b) When the court orders a dependent-neglected or family in need of
services juvenile removed from the custody of a parent, guardian, or
custodian and placed in the custody of the department or other licensed
agency responsible for the care of juveniles or with a relative or other
individual, the court shall make these specific findings in the order:
(1) In the initial order of removal, the court must find:
(A) Whether it is contrary to the welfare of the juvenile
to remain at home;
(B) Whether the removal and the reasons for the removal of
the juvenile is necessary to protect the health and safety of the juvenile;
and
(C) Whether the removal is in the best interest of the
juvenile; and
(2) Within sixty (60) days of removal, the court must find:
(A) Which family services were made available to the
family before the removal of the juvenile;
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(B) What efforts were made to provide those family
services relevant to the needs of the family before the removal of the
juvenile, taking into consideration whether or not the juvenile could safely
remain at home while family services were provided;
(C) Why efforts made to provide the family services
described did not prevent the removal of the juvenile; and
(D) Whether efforts made to prevent the removal of the
juvenile were reasonable, based upon the needs of the family and the
juvenile.
(c) When the state agency's first contact with the family has occurred
during an emergency in which the juvenile could not safely remain at home,
even with reasonable services being provided, the responsible state agency
shall be deemed to have made reasonable efforts to prevent or eliminate the
need for removal.
(d) When the court finds that the department's preventive or
reunification efforts have not been reasonable, but further preventive or
reunification efforts could not permit the juvenile to remain safely at home,
the court may authorize or continue the removal of the juvenile but shall
note the failure by the department in the record of the case.
(e)(1) In all instances of removal of a juvenile from the home of his
or her parent, guardian, or custodian by a court, the court shall set forth
in a written order:
(A) The evidence supporting the decision to remove;
(B) The facts regarding the need for removal; and
(C) The findings required by this section.
(2) The written findings and order shall be filed by the court
or by a party or party's attorney as designated by the court within thirty
(30) days of the date of the hearing at which removal is ordered or prior to
the next hearing, whichever is sooner.
(f) Within one (1) year from the date of removal of the juvenile and
annually thereafter, the court shall determine whether the department has
made reasonable efforts to obtain permanency for the juvenile.
(g)(1) If the court transfers custody of a child to the department,
the court shall issue an order containing the following determinations
regarding the educational issues of the child and whether the parent or
guardian of the child may:
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(A) Have access to the child's school records;
(B) Obtain information on the current placement of the
child, including the name and address of the child's foster parent or
provider, if the parent or guardian has access to the child's school records;
and
(C) Participate in school conferences or similar
activities at the child's school.
(2) If the court transfers custody of a child to the department,
the court may appoint an individual to consent to an initial evaluation of
the child and serve as the child's surrogate parent under the Individuals
with Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. § 1400 et seq., as it existed on
February 1, 2007.

9-27-329. Disposition hearing.
(a) If the circuit court finds that the petition has been
substantiated by the proof at the adjudication hearing, a disposition hearing
shall be held for the court to enter orders consistent with the disposition
alternatives.
(b) When a juvenile is held in detention after an adjudication hearing
for delinquency pending a disposition hearing, the disposition hearing shall
be held no more than fourteen (14) days following the adjudication hearing.
(c) In dependency-neglect proceedings, the disposition hearing may be
held immediately following or concurrent with the adjudication hearing but in
any event shall be held no more than fourteen (14) days following the
adjudication hearing.
(d) In initially considering the disposition alternatives and at any
subsequent hearing, the court shall give preference to the least restrictive
disposition consistent with the best interests and welfare of the juvenile
and the public.
(e) In dependency-neglect cases, a written disposition order shall be
filed by the court, or by a party or party's attorney as designated by the
court, within thirty (30) days of the date of the hearing or prior to the
next hearing, whichever is sooner.
(f) At the disposition hearing, the court may admit into evidence any
victim impact statements and studies or reports that have been ordered, even
though they are not admissible at the adjudication hearing.
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320

9-27-330. Disposition — Delinquency — Alternatives.
(a) If a juvenile is found to be delinquent, the circuit court may
enter an order making any of the following dispositions based upon the best
interest of the juvenile:
(1)(A) Transfer legal custody of the juvenile to any licensed
agency responsible for the care of delinquent juveniles or to a relative or
other individual.
(B)(i) Commit the juvenile to the Division of Youth
Services using the validated risk assessment system for Arkansas juvenile
offenders selected by the Juvenile Judges Committee of the Arkansas Judicial
Council with the division and distributed and administered by the
Administrative Office of the Courts.
(ii)(a) The validated risk assessment system
selected by the Juvenile Judges Committee of the Arkansas Judicial Council
with the division shall be:
(1) The only validated risk assessment
used by courts for commitment;
(2) Used throughout the state; and
(3) Applied to all commitment decisions
for all juvenile offenders.
(b) The validated risk assessment may be
changed to another validated risk assessment system by the Juvenile Judges
Committee of the Arkansas Judicial Council with the division.
(iii)(a) In an order of commitment, the court
may recommend that a juvenile be placed in a treatment program or community-
based program instead of a youth services center and shall make specific
findings in support of such a placement in the order.
(b) The court shall also specify in its
recommendation whether it is requesting a division aftercare plan upon the
juvenile's release from the division.
(c) A court may not commit a juvenile to the
division if the juvenile is adjudicated delinquent of only a misdemeanor
offense unless the:
(1) Juvenile is determined to be
moderate risk or high risk by the validated risk assessment; and
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(2) Court makes specific findings as to
the factors considered for the disposition to be in the juvenile's best
interest.
(d) A court may not commit a juvenile to the
division if the juvenile is adjudicated delinquent of only a misdemeanor
offense and the juvenile is determined to be low risk by the validated risk
assessment.
(iv) A circuit court committing a juvenile to the
division under subdivision (a)(1)(B)(iii) of this section shall make written
findings and consider the following factors in making its determination to
commit the juvenile to the division:
(a) The previous history of the juvenile,
including without limitation whether:
(1) The juvenile has been adjudicated
delinquent and, if so, whether the offense was against a person or property;
and
(2) Any other previous history of
antisocial behavior or patterns of physical violence exist;
(b) Whether the circuit court has previously
offered less restrictive programs or services to the juvenile and whether
there are less restrictive programs or services available to the court that
are likely to rehabilitate the juvenile before the expiration of the court's
jurisdiction;
(c) Written reports and other materials
relating to the juvenile's mental, physical, educational, and social history;
and
(d) Any other factors deemed relevant by the
circuit court.
(v) Upon receipt of an order of commitment with
recommendations for placement, the division shall consider the
recommendations of the committing court in placing a juvenile in a youth
services facility or a community-based program.
(vi) Upon receipt of an order of commitment, the
division or its contracted provider or designee shall prepare a written
treatment plan that:
(a) States the treatment plan for the
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
juvenile, including the types of programs and services that will be provided
to the juvenile;
(b) States the anticipated length of the
juvenile's commitment;
(c)(1) States recommendations as to the most
appropriate post-commitment placement for the juvenile.
(2) If the juvenile cannot return to the
custody of his or her parent, guardian, or custodian because of child
maltreatment, which includes the parent's, guardian's, or custodian's
refusing to take responsibility for the juvenile, the division shall
immediately contact the Office of Chief Counsel of the Department of Human
Services.
(3) The Office of Chief Counsel of the
Department of Human Services shall petition the committing court to determine
the issue of custody of the juvenile;
(d) States any post-commitment community-based
services that will be offered to the juvenile and to his or her family by the
division or the community-based provider;
(e)(1) Outlines an aftercare plan, if
recommended, including specific terms and conditions required of the juvenile
and the community-based provider.
(2) If the juvenile progresses in
treatment and an aftercare plan is no longer recommended or the terms of the
aftercare plan need to be amended as a result of treatment changes, any
change in the terms of the aftercare plan and conditions shall be provided in
writing and shall be explained to the juvenile.
(3) The terms and conditions shall be
provided also to the prosecuting attorney, the juvenile's attorney, and to
the juvenile's legal parent, guardian, or custodian by the division or its
designee before the juvenile's release from the division.
(4) All aftercare terms shall be
provided to the committing court; and
(f)(1) The treatment plan shall be filed with
the committing court no later than thirty (30) days from the date of the
commitment order or before the juvenile's release, whichever is sooner.
(2) A copy of the written treatment plan
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
shall be provided and shall be explained to the juvenile.
(3) A copy shall be provided to the
prosecutor, the juvenile's attorney, and to the juvenile's legal parent,
guardian, or custodian and shall be filed in the court files of any circuit
court where a dependency-neglect or family in need of services case
concerning that juvenile is pending.
(C) This transfer of custody shall not include placement
of adjudicated delinquents into the custody of the Department of Human
Services for the purpose of foster care except as under the Child
Maltreatment Act, § 12-18-101 et seq.;
(2) Order the juvenile or members of the juvenile's family to
submit to physical, psychiatric, or psychological evaluations;
(3) Grant permanent custody to an individual upon proof that the
parent or guardian from whom the juvenile has been removed has not complied
with the orders of the court and that no further services or periodic reviews
are required;
(4)(A) Place the juvenile on probation under those conditions
and limitations that the court may prescribe pursuant to § 9-27-339(a).
(B)(i) In addition, the court shall have the right as a
term of probation to require the juvenile to attend school or make
satisfactory progress toward attaining a high school equivalency diploma
approved by the Adult Education Section.
(ii) The court shall have the right to revoke
probation if the juvenile fails to regularly attend school or if satisfactory
progress toward attaining a high school equivalency diploma approved by the
Adult Education Section is not being made;
(5) Order a probation fee, not to exceed twenty dollars ($20.00)
per month, as provided in § 16-13-326(a);
(6) Assess a court cost of no more than thirty-five dollars
($35.00) to be paid by the juvenile, his or her parent, both parents, or his
or her guardian;
(7)(A) Order restitution to be paid by the juvenile, a parent,
both parents, the guardian, or his or her custodian.
(B) If the custodian is the State of Arkansas, both
liability and the amount that may be assessed shall be determined by the
Arkansas State Claims Commission;
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(8) Order a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500) to
be paid by the juvenile, a parent, both parents, or the guardian;
(9) Order that the juvenile and his or her parent, both parents,
or the guardian perform court-approved volunteer service in the community
designed to contribute to the rehabilitation of the juvenile or to the
ability of the parent or guardian to provide proper parental care and
supervision of the juvenile, not to exceed one hundred sixty (160) hours;
(10)(A) Order that the parent, both parents, or the
guardian of the juvenile attend a court-approved parental responsibility
training program if available.
(B) The court may make reasonable orders requiring proof
of completion of the training program within a certain time period and
payment of a fee covering the cost of the training program.
(C) The court may provide that any violation of such
orders shall subject the parent, both parents, or the guardian to the
contempt sanctions of the court;
(11)(A)(i) Order that the juvenile remain in a juvenile
detention facility for an indeterminate period not to exceed ninety (90)
days.
(ii) The court may further order that the juvenile be
eligible for work release or to attend school or other educational or
vocational training.
(B) The juvenile detention facility shall afford
opportunities for education, recreation, and other rehabilitative services to
adjudicated delinquents;
(12) Place the juvenile on residential detention with electronic
monitoring, either in the juvenile's home or in another facility as ordered
by the court;
(13)(A) Order the parent, both parents, or the guardian of
any juvenile adjudicated delinquent and committed to a youth services center,
detained in a juvenile detention facility, or placed on electronic monitoring
to be liable for the cost of the commitment, detention, or electronic
monitoring.
(B)(i) The court shall take into account the financial
ability of the parent, both parents, or the guardian to pay for the
commitment, detention, or electronic monitoring.
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(ii) The court shall take into account the past
efforts of the parent, both parents, or the guardian to correct the
delinquent juvenile's conduct.
(iii) If the parent is a noncustodial parent, the
court shall take into account the opportunity the parent has had to correct
the delinquent juvenile's conduct.
(iv) The court shall take into account any other
factors the court deems relevant;
(14) When a juvenile is committed to a youth services center or
detained in a juvenile detention facility and the juvenile is covered by
private health insurance, order the parent or guardian to provide information
on the juvenile's health insurance coverage, including a copy of the health
insurance policy and the pharmacy card when available, to the juvenile
detention center or youth services center that has physical custody of the
juvenile; or
(15)(A) Order the Department of Finance and Administration
to suspend the driving privileges of any juvenile adjudicated delinquent.
(B) The order shall be prepared and transmitted to the
Department of Finance and Administration within twenty-four (24) hours after
the juvenile has been found delinquent and is sentenced to have his or her
driving privileges suspended.
(C) The court may provide in the order for the issuance of
a restricted driving permit to allow driving to and from a place of
employment or driving to and from school or for other circumstances.
(b) The court shall specifically retain jurisdiction to amend or
modify any orders entered pursuant to this section.
(c)(1) If a juvenile is adjudicated delinquent for possession of a
handgun, as provided in § 5-73-119, or criminal use of prohibited weapons, as
provided in § 5-73-104, or possession of a defaced firearm, as provided in §
5-73-107, then the court shall commit the juvenile:
(A) To a juvenile detention facility, as provided in
subdivision (a)(11) of this section;
(B) To a youth services center operated by the Department
of Human Services State Institutional System Board, as provided in
subdivision (a)(1) of this section; or
(C) Place the juvenile on residential detention, as
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
provided in subdivision (a)(12) of this section.
(2) The court may take into consideration any preadjudication
detention period served by the juvenile and sentence the juvenile to time
served.
(d)(1) When the court orders restitution pursuant to subdivision
(a)(7) of this section, the court shall consider the following:
(A) The amount of restitution may be decided:
(i) If the juvenile is to be responsible for the
restitution, by agreement between the juvenile and the victim;
(ii) If the parent or parents are to be responsible
for the restitution, by agreement between the parent or parents and the
victim;
(iii) If the juvenile and the parent or parents are
to be responsible for the restitution, by agreement between the juvenile, his
or her parent or parents, and the victim; or
(iv) At a hearing at which the state must prove the
restitution amount by a preponderance of the evidence;
(B) Restitution shall be made immediately unless the court
determines that the parties should be given a specified time to pay or should
be allowed to pay in specified installments; and
(C)(i) In determining if restitution should be paid and by
whom, as well as the method and amount of payment, the court shall take into
account:
(a) The financial resources of the juvenile,
his or her parent, both parents, or the guardian and the burden the payment
will impose with regard to the other obligations of the paying party;
(b) The ability to pay restitution on an
installment basis or on other conditions to be fixed by the court;
(c) The rehabilitative effect of the payment
of restitution and the method of payment; and
(d) The past efforts of the parent, both
parents, or the guardian to correct the delinquent juvenile's conduct.
(ii)(a) The court shall take into account
whether the parent is a noncustodial parent.
(b) The court may take into consideration the
opportunity the parent has had to correct the delinquent juvenile's conduct.
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(iii) The court shall take into account any other
factors the court deems relevant.
(2) If the juvenile is placed on probation, any restitution
ordered under this section may be a condition of the probation.
(e) When an order of restitution is entered, it may be collected by
any means authorized for the enforcement of money judgments in civil actions,
and it shall constitute a lien on the real and personal property of the
persons and entities the order of restitution is directed upon in the same
manner and to the same extent as a money judgment in a civil action.
(f)(1) The judgment entered by the court may be in favor of the state,
the victim, or any other appropriate beneficiary.
(2) The judgment may be discharged by a settlement between the
parties ordered to pay restitution and the beneficiaries of the judgment.
(g) The court shall determine priority among multiple beneficiaries on
the basis of the seriousness of the harm each suffered, their other
resources, and other equitable factors.
(h) If more than one (1) juvenile is adjudicated delinquent of an
offense for which there is a judgment under this section, the juveniles are
jointly and severally liable for the judgment, unless the court determines
otherwise.
(i)(1) A judgment under this section does not bar a remedy available
in a civil action under other law.
(2) A payment under this section must be credited against a
money judgment obtained by the beneficiary of the payment in a civil action.
(3) A determination under this section and the fact that payment
was or was not ordered or made are not admissible in evidence in a civil
action and do not affect the merits of the civil action.
(j) If a juvenile is adjudicated delinquent as an extended juvenile
jurisdiction offender, the court shall enter the following dispositions:
(1) Order any of the juvenile delinquency dispositions
authorized by this section; and
(2) Suspend the imposition of an adult sentence pending court
review.

9-27-331. Disposition — Delinquency — Limitations.
(a)(1) A commitment to the Division of Youth Services is for an
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
indeterminate period not to exceed the juvenile's twenty-first birthday,
except as otherwise provided by law.
(2) An order of commitment shall remain in effect for an
indeterminate period not exceeding two (2) years from the date entered.
(3) Before the expiration of an order of commitment, the circuit
court may extend the order for additional periods of one (1) year if it finds
the extension is necessary to safeguard the welfare of the juvenile or the
interest of the public.
(4) The committing court may at any time recommend that a
juvenile be released from the custody of the division by making a written
request for release stating the reasons release is in the best interests of
the juvenile and society.
(5) The length of stay and the final decision to release shall
be the exclusive responsibility of the division, except when the juvenile is
an extended juvenile jurisdiction offender.
(b)(1)(A) Subsection (a) of this section does not apply to extended
juvenile jurisdiction offenders.
(B) The circuit court shall have sole release authority
when an extended juvenile jurisdiction offender is committed to the division.
(2)(A) Upon a determination that the juvenile has been
rehabilitated, the division may petition the court for release.
(B) The court shall conduct a hearing and shall consider
the following factors in making its determination to release the juvenile
from the division:
(i) The experience and character of the juvenile
before and after the juvenile's disposition, including compliance with the
court's orders;
(ii) The nature of the offense or offenses and the
manner in which they were committed;
(iii) The recommendations of the professionals who
have worked with the juvenile;
(iv) The protection of public safety; and
(v) Opportunities provided to the juvenile for
rehabilitation and the juvenile's efforts toward rehabilitation.
(3) The court shall release the juvenile upon a finding by a
preponderance of the evidence that the juvenile's release does not pose a
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
substantial threat to public safety.
(c)(1) Unless otherwise stated, and excluding extended juvenile
jurisdiction offenders, an order of probation shall remain in effect for an
indeterminate period not exceeding two (2) years.
(2) A juvenile shall be released from probation upon:
(A) Expiration of the order; or
(B) A finding by the court that the purpose of the order
has been achieved.
(3) Prior to the expiration of an order of probation, the court
may extend the order for an additional period of one (1) year if it finds the
extension is necessary to safeguard the welfare of the juvenile or the
interest of the public.
(d)(1)(A) The court may enter an order for physical, psychiatric, or
psychological evaluation or counseling or treatment affecting the family of a
juvenile only after finding that the evaluation, counseling, or treatment of
family members is necessary for the treatment or rehabilitation of the
juvenile.
(B) Subdivision (d)(1)(A) of this section shall not apply
to the parental responsibility training programs in § 9-27-330(a)(10).
(2) For purposes of this section, if the Department of Human
Services will be the payor, excluding the community-based providers, the
court shall not specify a particular provider for family services.
(e)(1) An order of restitution, not to exceed ten thousand dollars
($10,000) per victim, to be paid by the juvenile, his or her parent, both
parents, the guardian, or the custodian may be entered only after proof by a
preponderance of the evidence that specific damages were caused by the
juvenile and that the juvenile's actions were the proximate cause of the
damage.
(2)(A) If the amount of restitution determined by the court
exceeds ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for any individual victim, the court
shall enter a restitution order for ten thousand dollars ($10,000) in favor
of the victim.
(B) Nothing in this section shall prevent a person or
entity from seeking recovery for damages in excess of ten thousand dollars
($10,000) available under other law.
(f) Custody of a juvenile may be transferred to a relative or other
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
individual only after a home study of the placement is conducted by the
department or a licensed certified social worker and submitted to the court
in writing and the court determines that the placement is in the best
interest of the juvenile.
(g)(1) If the juvenile who has been adjudicated delinquent is also in
the custody of the department pursuant to a family in need of services or
dependency-neglect petition and the court does not commit the juvenile to the
division or order the juvenile to detention, the Civilian Student Training
Program, or a facility exclusively for delinquents, then any issues regarding
placement of the juvenile shall be addressed only in the family in need of
services or dependency-neglect case and shall not be an issue addressed, nor
shall any orders be entered in the delinquency case regarding placement of
the juvenile.
(2) Within ten (10) days of the entry of any order in the
delinquency case, the prosecuting attorney shall file a copy of the order in
the juvenile's dependency-neglect case.
(h) Custody of a juvenile shall not be transferred to the department
if a delinquency petition or case is converted to a family in need of
services petition or case.
(i) No court may commit to the division a juvenile found solely in
criminal contempt.

9-27-332. Disposition — Family in need of services — Generally.
(a) If a family is found to be in need of services, the circuit court
may enter an order making any of the following dispositions:
(1)(A) To order family services to rehabilitate the juvenile and
his or her family.
(B)(i) If the Department of Human Services is the provider
for family services, the family services shall be limited to those services
available by the department's community-based providers or contractors,
excluding the contractors with the Division of Children and Family Services
and services of the department for which the family applies and is determined
eligible.
(ii) To prevent removal when the department is the
provider for family services, the court shall make written findings outlining
how each service is intended to prevent removal;
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(2)(A) If it is in the best interest of the juvenile, transfer
custody of juvenile family members to another licensed agency responsible for
the care of juveniles or to a relative or other individual.
(B) If it is in the best interest of the juvenile and
because of acts or omissions by the parent, guardian, or custodian, removal
is necessary to protect the juvenile's health and safety, transfer custody to
the department.
(C) A juvenile in the custody of the department is
“awaiting foster care placement”, as that term is used in the definition of
“homeless children and youths” in the McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act,
42 U.S.C. § 11434a(2), if the juvenile:
(i) Is placed in a shelter, facility, or other
short-term placement with a plan of moving the juvenile within ninety (90)
days;
(ii) Is transferred to an emergency placement to
protect the juvenile's health or welfare;
(iii) Is placed in a provisional foster home as
defined by § 9-28-402;
(iv) Has experienced three (3) or more placements
within a twelve-month period; or
(v) Is placed in a regular foster home or other
placement that is not directly related to the permanency goal identified in
the case plan required under § 9-28-111;
(3)(A) Order that the parent, both parents, or the guardian of
the juvenile attend a court-ordered parental responsibility training program,
if available.
(B) The court may make reasonable orders requiring proof
of completion of such a training program within a certain time period and
payment of a fee covering the cost of the training program;
(4) Place the juvenile on residential detention with electronic
monitoring in the juvenile's home;
(5) Order the juvenile, his or her parent, both parents, or
guardian to perform court-approved volunteer service in the community
designed to contribute to the rehabilitation of the juvenile or the ability
of the parent or guardian to provide proper parental care and supervision of
the juvenile, not to exceed one hundred sixty (160) hours;
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(6)(A) Place the juvenile on supervision terms, including
without limitation requiring the juvenile to attend school or make
satisfactory progress toward attaining a high school equivalency diploma
approved by the Adult Education Section, requiring the juvenile to observe a
curfew, and prohibiting the juvenile from possessing or using any alcohol or
illegal drugs.
(B) The supervision terms shall be in writing.
(C) The supervision terms shall be given to the juvenile
and explained to the juvenile and to his or her parent, guardian, or
custodian by the juvenile intake or probation officer in a conference
immediately following the disposition hearing;
(7)(A) Order a fine not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) to
be paid by the juvenile, a parent, both parents, a guardian, or a custodian
when the juvenile exceeds the number of excessive unexcused absences provided
in the student attendance policy of the district or the Career Education and
Workforce Development Board.
(B) The purpose of the penalty set forth in this section
is to impress upon the parents, guardians, or persons in loco parentis the
importance of school or adult education attendance, and the penalty is not to
be used primarily as a source of revenue.
(C)(i) In all cases in which a fine is ordered, the court
shall determine the parent's, guardian's, or custodian's ability to pay for
the fine.
(ii) In making its determination, the court shall
consider the following factors:
(a) The financial ability of the parent, both
parents, the guardian, or the custodian to pay for such services;
(b) The past efforts of the parent, both
parents, the guardian, or the custodian to correct the conditions that
resulted in the need for family services; and
(c) Any other factors that the court deems
relevant.
(D) When practicable and appropriate, the court may
utilize mandatory attendance to such programs as well as community service
requirements in lieu of a fine;
(8) Assess a court cost of no more than thirty-five dollars
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
($35.00) to be paid by the juvenile, his or her parent, both parents, the
guardian, or the custodian; and
(9) Order a juvenile service fee not to exceed twenty dollars
($20.00) a month to be paid by the juvenile, his or her parent, both parents,
the guardian, or the custodian.
(b) The court may provide that any violation of its orders shall
subject the parent, both parents, the juvenile, custodian, or guardian to
contempt sanctions.

9-27-333. Disposition — Family in need of services — Limitations —
Definitions.
(a) At least five (5) working days before ordering the Department of
Human Services, excluding community-based providers, to provide or pay for
family services, the circuit court shall fax a written notice of intent to
the Secretary of the Department of Human Services and to the attorney of the
local Office of Chief Counsel of the Department of Human Services.
(b) At any hearing in which the department is ordered to provide
family services, the court shall provide the department with the opportunity
to be heard.
(c) Failure to provide at least five (5) working days' notice to the
department renders any part of the order pertaining to the department void.
(d)(1) For purposes of this section, the court shall not specify a
particular provider for placement or family services when the department is
the payor or provider.
(2)(A) The court may order a child to remain in a placement if
the court finds the placement is in the best interest of the child after
hearing evidence from all parties.
(B) A court may also order a child to be placed into a
licensed or approved placement after a hearing where the court makes a
finding that it is in the best interest of the child based on bona fide
consideration of evidence and recommendations from all the parties.
(e)(1) In all cases in which family services are ordered, the court
shall determine a parent's, guardian's, or custodian's ability to pay, in
whole or in part, for these services.
(2) This determination and the evidence supporting it shall be
made in writing in the order ordering family services.
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(3) If the court determines that the parent, guardian, or
custodian is able to pay, in whole or part, for the services, the court shall
enter a written order setting forth the amount the parent, guardian, or
custodian can pay for the family services ordered and ordering the parent,
guardian, or custodian to pay the amount periodically to the provider from
whom family services are received.
(4) For purposes of this subsection:
(A) “Parent, guardian, and custodian” means the individual
or individuals from whom custody was removed; and
(B) “Periodically” means no more than one (1) time per
month.
(5) In making its determination, the court shall consider the
following factors:
(A) The financial ability of the parent, both parents, the
guardian, or the custodian to pay for the services;
(B) The past efforts of the parent, both parents, the
guardian, or the custodian to correct the conditions that resulted in the
need for family services; and
(C) Any other factors the court deems relevant.
(f) Custody of a juvenile may be transferred to a relative or other
individual only after a home study of the placement is conducted by the
department or a licensed social worker who is approved to do home studies and
submitted to the court in writing and the court determines that the placement
is in the best interest of the juvenile.
(g) Custody of a juvenile shall not be transferred to the department
if a delinquency petition or case is converted to a family in need of
services petition or case.
(h) No court may commit a juvenile found solely in criminal contempt
to the Division of Youth Services.
(i) For purposes of this section, the court shall not order the
department to expend or forward Social Security benefits for which the
department is payee.

9-27-334. Disposition — Dependent-neglected — Generally.
(a) If a juvenile is found to be dependent-neglected, the circuit
court may enter an order making any of the following dispositions:
03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(1) Order family services;
(2)(A) If it is in the best interest of the juvenile, transfer
custody of the juvenile to the Department of Human Services, to another
licensed agency responsible for the care of juveniles, or to a relative or
other individual.
(B) If the court grants custody of the juvenile to the
department, the juvenile shall be placed in a licensed or approved foster
home, shelter, or facility, or an exempt child welfare agency as defined at §
9-28-402.
(C) A juvenile in the custody of the department is
“awaiting foster care placement”, as that term is used in the definition of
“homeless children and youths” in the McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act,
42 U.S.C. § 11434a(2), if the juvenile:
(i) Is placed in a shelter, facility, or other
short-term placement with a plan of moving the juvenile within ninety (90)
days;
(ii) Is transferred to an emergency placement to
protect the juvenile's health or welfare;
(iii) Is placed in a provisional foster home as
defined by § 9-28-402;
(iv) Has experienced three (3) or more placements
within a twelve-month period; or
(v) Is placed in a regular foster home or other
placement that is not directly related to the permanency goal identified in
the case plan required under § 9-28-111;
(3)(A) Order that the parent, both parents, or the guardian of
the juvenile attend a court-ordered parental responsibility training program,
if available, and participate in a juvenile drug court program.
(B) The court may make reasonable orders requiring proof
of completion of such a training program within a certain time period and
payment of a fee covering the cost of the training program;
(4) Determine the most appropriate goal of the case; and
(5) Order that the parent, both parents, or the guardian or
custodian of the juvenile participate in a family treatment specialty court
program under § 9-27-801 et seq., if available.
(b) Such an order of custody shall supersede an existing court order
100 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
of custody and shall remain in full force and effect until a subsequent order
of custody is entered by a court of competent jurisdiction.
(c) The court may provide that any violation of its orders shall
subject any party in violation to contempt sanctions.

9-27-335. Disposition — Dependent-neglected — Limitations.
(a)(1) At least five (5) working days before ordering the Department
of Human Services, excluding community-based providers, to provide or pay for
family services in any case in which the department is not a party, the
circuit court shall fax a written notice of intent to the Secretary of the
Department of Human Services and to the attorney of the local Office of Chief
Counsel of the Department of Human Services.
(2) At any hearing in which the department is ordered to provide
family services, the court shall provide the department with the opportunity
to be heard.
(3) Failure to provide at least five (5) working days' notice to
the department renders any part of the order pertaining to the department
void.
(b)(1) For purposes of this section, the court shall not specify a
particular provider for placement or family services if the department is the
payor or provider.
(2)(A) The court may order a child to be placed or to remain in
a placement if the court finds the placement is in the best interest of the
child after hearing evidence from all parties.
(B) A court may also order a child into a licensed or
approved placement after a hearing where the court makes a finding that it is
in the best interest of the child based on bona fide consideration of
evidence and recommendations from all the parties.
(C) The court shall not order a child to be placed or
remain in a placement in a foster home that has been closed or suspended by a
child placement agency.
(D)(i) If the health or welfare of a child is in immediate
danger while in a court-ordered placement, the department may immediately
remove the child from the court-ordered placement.
(ii) The department shall notify all parties within
twenty-four (24) hours of the change in placement under subdivision
101 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(b)(2)(D)(i) of this section.
(iii) A party may request a hearing on the change in
placement made under subdivision (b)(2)(D)(ii) of this section, and the
hearing shall be held within five (5) business days of receiving the request.
(c)(1) In all cases in which family services are ordered, the court
shall determine the ability of the parent, guardian, or custodian to pay, in
whole or in part, for these services.
(2) The determination of ability to pay and the evidence
supporting it shall be made in writing in the order ordering family services.
(3) If the court determines that the parent, guardian, or
custodian is able to pay, in whole or in part, for the services, the court
shall enter a written order setting forth the amount the parent, guardian, or
custodian is able to pay for the family services ordered and order the
parent, guardian, or custodian to pay the amount periodically to the provider
from whom family services are received.
(d)(1) Custody of a juvenile may be transferred to a relative or other
individual only after a home study of the placement is conducted by the
department or by a licensed social worker who is approved to do home studies
and submitted to the court in writing and the court determines that the
placement is in the best interest of the juvenile.
(2) A home study is not required for a parent of a juvenile.
(e)(1)(A) The court shall enter an order transferring custody of a
juvenile in a dependency-neglect case only after determining that reasonable
efforts have been made by the department to deliver family services designed
to prevent the need for out-of-home placement and that the need for out-of-
home placement exists.
(B) The juvenile's health and safety shall be the
paramount concern of the court in determining if the department could have
made reasonable efforts to prevent the juvenile's removal.
(2) If the court finds that reasonable efforts to deliver family
services could have been made with the juvenile safely remaining at home but
were not made, the court may:
(A) Dismiss the petition;
(B) Order family services reasonably calculated to prevent
the need for out-of-home placement; or
(C) Transfer custody of the juvenile despite the lack of
102 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
reasonable efforts by the department to prevent the need for out-of-home
placement if the transfer is necessary:
(i) To protect the juvenile's health and safety; or
(ii) To prevent the removal of the juvenile from the
jurisdiction of the court.
(f) In a case of medical neglect involving a child's receiving
treatment through prayer alone in accordance with a religious method of
healing in lieu of medical care, the adjudication order shall be limited to:
(1) Preventing or remedying serious harm to the child; or
(2) Preventing the withholding of medically indicated treatment
from a child with a life-threatening condition.
(g) No court may commit a juvenile found solely in criminal contempt
to the Division of Youth Services.
(h) For purposes of this section, the court shall not order the
department to expend or forward Social Security benefits for which the
department is payee.

9-27-336. Limitations on detention.
(a) A juvenile who is alleged to be or who has been adjudicated either
dependent-neglected or a member of a family in need of services shall not be
placed or detained in a secure detention facility, in a facility utilized for
the detention of alleged or adjudicated delinquent juveniles, or in a
facility utilized for the detention of adults held for, charged with, or
convicted of a crime except:
(1)(A) A juvenile may be held in a juvenile detention facility
when he or she has been away from home for more than twenty-four (24) hours
and when the parent, guardian, or other person contacted lives beyond a
fifty-mile driving distance or out of state.
(B)(i) The juvenile may be held in custody in a juvenile
detention facility for purposes of identification, processing, or arranging
for release or transfer to an alternative facility.
(ii) The holding shall be limited to the minimum time
necessary to complete these actions and shall not occur in any facility
utilized for incarceration of adults.
(C)(i) A juvenile held under this subdivision (a)(1) shall
be separated from detained juveniles charged or held for delinquency.
103 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(ii) A juvenile may not be held under this
subdivision (a)(1) for more than six (6) hours if the parent, guardian, or
other person contacted lives in the state or twenty-four (24) hours,
excluding weekends and holidays, if the parent, guardian, or other person
contacted lives out of state; and
(2)(A) An adjudicated-family-in-need-of-services juvenile may be
held in a juvenile detention facility when the court finds that the juvenile
violated a valid court order.
(B)(i) For the purposes of this subdivision (a)(2), a
valid court order shall include any order of a circuit court regarding a
juvenile who has been brought before the court and made subject to a court
order.
(ii) The juvenile who is the subject of the order
shall receive full due process rights.
(C)(i) A juvenile held under this subdivision (a)(2) shall
be separated from detained juveniles charged or held for delinquency.
(ii) The holding shall not occur in any facility
utilized for incarceration of adults.
(b) A juvenile shall not be placed or confined in a jail or lock-up
used for the detention of adults except under the following circumstances:
(1) A juvenile who has been formally transferred from the
juvenile division of circuit court to the criminal division of circuit court
and against whom felony charges have been filed or a juvenile whom the
prosecuting attorney has the discretion to charge in circuit court and to
prosecute as an adult and against whom the circuit court's jurisdiction has
been invoked by the filing of felony charges may be held in an adult jail or
lock-up;
(2)(A) A juvenile alleged to have committed a delinquent act may
be held in an adult jail or lock-up for up to six (6) hours for purposes of
identification, processing, or arranging for release or transfer to an
alternative facility, provided that he or she is separated by sight and sound
from adults who are pretrial detainees or convicted persons.
(B) A holding for those purposes shall be limited to the
minimum time necessary and shall not include travel time for transporting the
juvenile to the alternative facility; or
(3)(A) A juvenile alleged to have committed a delinquent act who
104 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
is awaiting an initial appearance before a judge may be held in an adult jail
or lock-up for up to twenty-four (24) hours, excluding weekends and holidays,
provided the following conditions exist:
(i) The alleged act would be a misdemeanor or a
felony if committed by an adult or is a violation of § 5-73-119;
(ii) The geographical area having jurisdiction over
the juvenile is outside a metropolitan statistical area pursuant to the
current designation of the United States Bureau of the Census;
(iii) No acceptable alternative placement for the
juvenile exists; and
(iv) The juvenile is separated by sight and sound
from adults who are pretrial detainees or convicted persons.
(B)(i) A juvenile awaiting an initial appearance and being
held in an adult jail or lock-up pursuant to the twenty-four-hour exception,
as provided in subdivision (b)(3)(A) of this section, may be held for an
additional period not to exceed twenty-four (24) hours, provided that the
following conditions exist:
(a) The conditions of distance to be traveled
or the lack of highway, road, or other ground transportation does not allow
for court appearances within twenty-four (24) hours; and
(b) All the conditions in subdivision
(b)(3)(A) of this section exist.
(ii) Criteria will be adopted by the Governor or his
or her designee to establish what distance, highway or road conditions, or
ground transportation limitations will provide a basis for holding a juvenile
in an adult jail or lock-up under this exception.
(c) Provided that the facilities are designed and used in accordance
with federal and state guidelines and restrictions, nothing in this
subchapter is intended to prohibit the use of juvenile detention facilities
that are attached to or adjacent to adult jails or lock-ups.
(d) A detention facility shall not release a serious offender for a
less serious offender except by order of the judge who committed the more
serious offender.

9-27-337. Six-month reviews required.
(a)(1) The court shall review every case of dependency-neglect or
105 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
families in need of services when:
(A) A juvenile is placed by the court in the custody of
the Department of Human Services or in another out-of-home placement until
there is a permanent order of custody, guardianship, or other permanent
placement for the juvenile; or
(B) A juvenile is returned to the parent from whom the
child was removed, another fit parent, guardian, or custodian and the court
has not discontinued orders for family services.
(2)(A) The first six-month review shall be held no later than
six (6) months from the date of the original out-of-home placement of the
child and shall be scheduled by the court following the adjudication and
disposition hearing.
(B) It shall be reviewed every six (6) months thereafter
until permanency is achieved.
(3) A six-month review hearing shall not be required for a
juvenile who:
(A) Is over eighteen (18) years of age; and
(B) Has elected to remain in extended foster care or to
return to extended foster care under § 9-27-306(a)(1)(B)(ii).
(b) The court may require these cases to be reviewed prior to the
sixth-month review hearing, and the court shall announce the date, time, and
place of the hearing.
(c) At any time during the pendency of any case of dependency-neglect
or families in need of services in which an out-of-home placement has
occurred, any party may request the court to review the case, and the party
requesting the hearing shall provide reasonable notice to all parties.
(d) At any time during the course of a case, the department, the
attorney ad litem, or the court can request a hearing on whether or not
reunification services should be terminated pursuant to § 9-27-327(a)(2).
(e)(1) In each case in which a juvenile has been placed in an out-of-
home placement, the court shall conduct a hearing to review the case
sufficiently to determine the future status of the juvenile based upon the
best interest of the juvenile.
(2)(A) The court shall determine and include in its orders the
following:
(i) Whether the case plan, services, and placement
106 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
meet the special needs and best interest of the juvenile, with the juvenile's
health, safety, and educational needs specifically addressed;
(ii) Whether the state has made reasonable efforts to
provide family services;
(iii) Whether the parent or parents or person from
whom custody was removed has demonstrated progress toward the goals of the
case plan and whether completion of the goals has benefited the parent in
remedying the issues that prevent the safe return of the juvenile;
(iv) Whether the case plan is moving toward an
appropriate permanency plan under § 9-27-338 for the juvenile;
(v) Whether the visitation plan is appropriate for
the juvenile, the parent or parents, and any siblings, if separated; and
(vi)(a) Whether the juvenile should be
returned to his or her parent or parents and whether or not the juvenile's
health and safety can be protected by his or her parent or parents if
returned home, either permanently or for a trial placement.
(b) At any time the court determines that the
health and safety of the child can be adequately protected and it is in the
best interest of the child, the court shall return the child to a parent or
parents from whom custody was removed.
(B)(i) The court may order any studies, evaluations, or
post-disposition reports, if needed.
(ii) All studies, evaluations, or post-disposition
reports shall be provided in writing to all parties and counsel at least two
(2) days before the review hearing.
(iii) All parties shall be given a fair opportunity
to controvert any part of a study, evaluation, or post-disposition report.
(3)(A) In making its findings, the court shall consider the
following:
(i) The extent of compliance with the case plan,
including without limitation a review of the department's care for the
health, safety, and education of the juvenile while he or she has been in an
out-of-home placement;
(ii) The extent of progress that has been made toward
alleviating or mitigating the causes of the out-of-home placement;
(iii) Whether the juvenile should be returned to his
107 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
or her parent or parents and whether or not the juvenile's health and safety
can be protected by his or her parent or parents if returned home; and
(iv) An appropriate permanency plan under § 9-27-338
for the juvenile, including concurrent planning.
(B) Incompletion of the case plan under subdivision
(e)(3)(A)(i) of this section is an insufficient reason by itself to deny the
juvenile's return to the family home.
(f) Each six-month review hearing shall be completed, and the written
order under subsection (e) of this section shall be filed by the court or by
a party or a party's attorney as designated by the court and distributed to
the parties within thirty (30) days of the date of the hearing or before the
next hearing, whichever is sooner.

9-27-338. Permanency planning hearing.
(a)(1) A permanency planning hearing shall be held to finalize a
permanency plan for the juvenile:
(A) No later than twelve (12) months after the date the
juvenile enters an out-of-home placement;
(B) After a juvenile has been in an out-of-home placement
for fifteen (15) of the previous twenty-two (22) months, excluding trial
placements and time on runaway status; or
(C) No later than thirty (30) days after a hearing
granting no reunification services.
(2) If a juvenile remains in an out-of-home placement after the
initial permanency planning hearing, a permanency planning hearing shall be
held annually to reassess the permanency plan selected for the juvenile.
(b)(1) This section does not prevent the Department of Human Services
or the attorney ad litem from filing at any time prior to the permanency
planning hearing a:
(A) Petition to terminate parental rights;
(B) Petition for guardianship; or
(C) Petition for permanent custody.
(2) A permanency planning hearing is not required prior to any
of these actions.
(c) At the permanency planning hearing, based upon the facts of the
case, the circuit court shall enter one (1) of the following permanency
108 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
goals, listed in order of preference, in accordance with the best interest,
health, and safety of the juvenile:
(1) Placing custody of the juvenile with a fit parent at the
permanency planning hearing;
(2) Returning the juvenile to the guardian or custodian from
whom the juvenile was initially removed at the permanency planning hearing;
(3) Authorizing a plan to place custody of the juvenile with a
parent, guardian, or custodian only if the court finds that:
(A)(i) The parent, guardian, or custodian is complying
with the established case plan and orders of the court, making significant
and measurable progress toward achieving the goals established in the case
plan and diligently working toward reunification or placement in the home of
the parent, guardian, or custodian.
(ii) Regardless of when the effort was made, the
court shall consider all evidence of an effort made by the parent, guardian,
or custodian to remedy the conditions that led to the removal of the juvenile
from the custody of the parent, guardian, or custodian and give the evidence
the appropriate weight and consideration in relation to the safety, health,
and well-being of the juvenile.
(iii) The burden is on the parent, guardian, or
custodian to demonstrate genuine, sustainable investment in completing the
requirements of the case plan and following the orders of the court in order
to authorize a plan to return or be placed in the home as the permanency
goal;
(B) The parent, guardian, or custodian is making
significant and measurable progress toward remedying the conditions that:
(i) Caused the juvenile's removal and the juvenile's
continued removal from the home; or
(ii) Prohibit placement of the juvenile in the home
of a parent; and
(C)(i) Placement of the juvenile in the home of the
parent, guardian, or custodian shall occur within a time frame consistent
with the juvenile's developmental needs but no later than three (3) months
from the date of the permanency planning hearing.
(ii) The court may authorize a plan to place custody
of a juvenile with a parent, guardian, or custodian of the juvenile despite
109 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
finding that placement of the juvenile in the home of the parent, guardian,
or custodian of the juvenile may not occur within the three-month period
required under subdivision (c)(3)(C)(i) of this section if the plan is in the
best interest of the child during extraordinary circumstances.
(iii) As used in this subdivision (c)(3)(C),
“extraordinary circumstances” includes without limitation the following
circumstances:
(a) The Supreme Court orders the suspension of
in-person court proceedings; and
(b) One (1) of the following has occurred:
(1) The President of the United States
has declared a national emergency; or
(2) The Governor has declared a state of
emergency or a statewide public health emergency;
(4) Authorizing a plan to obtain a guardianship or adoption with
a fit and willing relative;
(5) Authorizing a plan for adoption with the department's filing
a petition for termination of parental rights unless:
(A) The juvenile is being cared for by a relative and the
court finds that:
(i) Either:
(a) The relative has made a long-term
commitment to the child and the relative is willing to pursue guardianship or
permanent custody; or
(b) The juvenile is being cared for by his or
her minor parent who is in foster care; and
(ii) Termination of parental rights is not in the
best interest of the juvenile;
(B) The department has documented in the case plan a
compelling reason why filing a petition for termination of parental rights is
not in the best interest of the juvenile and the court approves the
compelling reason as documented in the case plan; or
(C)(i) The department has not provided to the family of
the juvenile, consistent with the time period in the case plan, the services
as the department deemed necessary for the safe return of the juvenile to the
juvenile's home if reunification services were required to be made to the
110 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
family.
(ii) If the department has failed to provide services
as outlined in the case plan, the court shall schedule another permanency
planning hearing for no later than six (6) months;
(6) Authorizing a plan to obtain a guardian for the juvenile;
(7) Authorizing a plan to obtain a permanent custodian,
including permanent custody with a fit and willing relative; or
(8)(A) Authorizing a plan for another planned permanent living
arrangement that includes a permanent planned living arrangement and
addresses the quality of services, including, but not limited to, independent
living services and a plan for the supervision and nurturing the juvenile
will receive.
(B) Another planned permanent living arrangement shall be
selected only if:
(i) The department has documented to the circuit
court a compelling reason for determining that it would not be in the best
interest of the child to follow one (1) of the permanency plans identified in
subdivisions (c)(1)-(7) of this section and this subdivision (c)(8);
(ii) The child is sixteen (16) years of age or older;
and
(iii) The court makes a judicial determination
explaining why, as of the date of the hearing, another planned permanent
living arrangement is the best permanency plan for the juvenile and the court
finds compelling reasons why it continues to not be in the best interest of
the juvenile to:
(a) Return home;
(b) Be placed for adoption;
(c) Be placed with a legal guardian; or
(d) Be placed with a fit and willing relative.
(d) At the permanency planning hearing on a juvenile sixteen (16)
years of age or older, the court shall ask the juvenile his or her desired
permanency outcome, or the attorney ad litem shall enter evidence concerning
the child's wishes.
(e) At every permanency planning hearing the court shall make a
finding on whether the department has made reasonable efforts and shall
describe the efforts to finalize a permanency plan for the juvenile.
111 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(f) A written order shall be filed by the court or by a party or
party's attorney as designated by the court and distributed to the parties
within thirty (30) days of the date of the hearing or prior to the next
hearing, whichever is sooner.
(g) If the court determines that the permanency goal is adoption, the
department shall file the petition to terminate parental rights within thirty
(30) days from the date of the permanency planning hearing that establishes
adoption as the permanency goal.
(h)(1) The court shall determine if establishing concurrent permanency
planning goals is appropriate.
(2) If the court determines that establishing concurrent
permanency planning goals is appropriate, the court shall establish all
appropriate permanency planning goals subject to the requirements of this
section.
(3) If the court sets a goal of adoption, reunification services
shall continue to be provided unless the court:
(A) Determines that the reunification services are no
longer needed;
(B) Terminates parental rights; or
(C) Otherwise finalizes a permanency plan for the
juvenile.

9-27-339. Probation — Revocation.
(a)(1) After an adjudication of delinquency, the court may place a
juvenile on probation. The conditions of probation shall be given to the
juvenile in writing and shall be explained to him or her and to his or her
parent, guardian, or custodian by the probation officer in the initial
conference following the disposition hearing.
(2) The court shall notify the Division of Youth Services in its
commitment order of the order of probation including the juvenile's
compliance with the division's aftercare plan, if provided in the treatment
plan.
(b) Any violation of a condition of probation may be reported to the
prosecuting attorney, who may initiate a petition in the court for revocation
of probation. A petition for revocation of probation shall contain specific
factual allegations constituting each violation of a condition of probation.
112 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(c) The petition alleging violation of a condition of probation and
seeking revocation of probation shall be served upon the juvenile, his or her
attorney, and his or her parent, guardian, or custodian.
(d) A revocation hearing shall be set within a reasonable time after
the filing of the petition, or within fourteen (14) days if the juvenile has
been detained as a result of the filing of the petition for revocation.
(e) If the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that the
juvenile violated the terms and conditions of probation, the court may:
(1) Extend probation;
(2) Impose additional conditions of probation; or
(3) Make any disposition that could have been made at the time
probation was imposed under § 9-27-330.
(f)(1) Nonpayment of restitution, fines, or court costs may constitute
a violation of probation, unless the juvenile shows that his or her default
was not attributable to a purposeful refusal to obey the sentence of the
court or was not due to a failure on his or her part to make a good faith
effort to obtain the funds required for payment.
(2) In determining whether to revoke probation, the court shall
consider the juvenile's employment status, earning ability, financial
resources, the willfulness of the juvenile's failure to pay, and any other
special circumstances that may have a bearing on the juvenile's ability to
pay.
(3) If the court determines that the default in payment of a
fine, costs, or restitution is excusable under subdivision (f)(1) of this
section, the court may enter an order allowing the juvenile additional time
for payment, reducing the amount of each installment, or revoking the fine,
costs, or restitution or unpaid portion thereof in whole or in part.

9-27-340. [Repealed.]

9-27-341. Termination of parental rights — Definition.
(a)(1)(A) This section shall be a remedy available only to the
Department of Human Services or a court-appointed attorney ad litem.
(B) This section shall not be available for private
litigants or other agencies.
(2)(A) This section shall be used only in cases in which the
113 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
department is attempting to clear a juvenile for permanent placement by
terminating the parental rights of a parent and putative parent based on the
definition of “parent” and “putative father” under § 9-27-303.
(B) This section shall not be used to terminate the rights
of a putative parent if a court of competent jurisdiction has previously
determined under § 9-27-325 that the rights of the putative parent have not
attached.
(3) The intent of this section is to provide permanency in a
juvenile's life in all instances in which the return of a juvenile to the
family home is contrary to the juvenile's health, safety, or welfare and it
appears from the evidence that a return to the family home cannot be
accomplished in a reasonable period of time as viewed from the juvenile's
perspective.
(4) The court shall rely upon the record of the parent's
compliance in the entire dependency-neglect case and evidence presented at
the termination hearing in making its decision on whether it is in the best
interest of the juvenile to terminate parental rights.
(b)(1)(A) The circuit court may consider a petition to terminate
parental rights if the court finds that there is an appropriate permanency
placement plan for the juvenile.
(B) This section does not require that a permanency
planning hearing be held as a prerequisite to the filing of a petition to
terminate parental rights or as a prerequisite to the court's considering a
petition to terminate parental rights.
(2)(A) The petitioner shall serve the petition to terminate
parental rights as required under Rule 5 of the Arkansas Rules of Civil
Procedure, except:
(i) Service shall be made as required under Rule 4
of the Arkansas Rules of Civil Procedure if the:
(a) Parent was not served under Rule 4 of the
Arkansas Rules of Civil Procedure at the initiation of the proceeding;
(b) Parent is not represented by an attorney;
or
(c) Initiation of the proceeding was more than
two (2) years ago; or
(ii) When the court orders service of the petition to
114 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
terminate parental rights as required under Rule 4 of the Arkansas Rules of
Civil Procedure.
(B) The petitioner shall check with the Putative Father
Registry if the name or whereabouts of the putative father is unknown.
(3) An order forever terminating parental rights shall be based
upon a finding by clear and convincing evidence:
(A) That it is in the best interest of the juvenile,
including consideration of the following factors:
(i) The likelihood that the juvenile will be adopted
if the termination petition is granted; and
(ii) The potential harm, specifically addressing the
effect on the health and safety of the child, caused by returning the child
to the custody of the parent, parents, or putative parent or parents; and
(B) Of one (1) or more of the following grounds:
(i)(a) That a juvenile has been adjudicated by the
court to be dependent-neglected and has continued to be out of the custody of
the parent for twelve (12) months and, despite a meaningful effort by the
department to rehabilitate the parent and correct the conditions that caused
removal, those conditions have not been remedied by the parent.
(b) That a juvenile has been adjudicated by
the court to be dependent-neglected and has continued out of the home of the
noncustodial parent for twelve (12) months and, despite a meaningful effort
by the department to rehabilitate the parent and correct the conditions that
prevented the child from safely being placed in the parent's home, the
conditions have not been remedied by the parent.
(c) It is not necessary that the twelve-month
period referenced in subdivision (b)(3)(B)(i)(a) of this section immediately
precede the filing of the petition for termination of parental rights or that
it be for twelve (12) consecutive months;
(ii)(a) The juvenile has lived outside the
home of the parent for a period of twelve (12) months, and the parent has
willfully failed to provide significant material support in accordance with
the parent's means or to maintain meaningful contact with the juvenile.
(b) To find willful failure to maintain
meaningful contact, it must be shown that the parent was not prevented from
visiting or having contact with the juvenile by the juvenile's custodian or
115 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
any other person, taking into consideration the distance of the juvenile's
placement from the parent's home.
(c) Material support consists of either
financial contributions or food, shelter, clothing, or other necessities when
the contribution has been requested by the juvenile's custodian or ordered by
a court of competent jurisdiction.
(d) It is not necessary that the twelve-month
period referenced in subdivision (b)(3)(B)(ii)(a) of this section immediately
precede the filing of the petition for termination of parental rights or that
it be for twelve (12) consecutive months;
(iii)(a) The parent is not the biological
parent of the juvenile and the welfare of the juvenile can best be served by
terminating the parental rights of the parent.
(b) A termination of parental rights under
subdivision (b)(3)(B)(iii)(a) of this section shall not be considered an
involuntary termination;
(iv) A parent has abandoned the juvenile;
(v)(a) A parent has executed consent to termination
of parental rights or adoption of the juvenile, subject to the court's
approval.
(b) If the consent is executed under oath by a
person authorized to administer the oath, the parent is not required to
execute the consent in the presence of the court unless required by federal
law or federal regulations;
(vi)(a) The court has found the juvenile or a
sibling dependent-neglected as a result of neglect or abuse that could
endanger the life of the child, sexual abuse, or sexual exploitation, any of
which was perpetrated by the juvenile's parent or parents or stepparent or
stepparents.
(b) Such findings by the juvenile division of
circuit court shall constitute grounds for immediate termination of the
parental rights of one (1) or both of the parents;
(vii)(a) That other factors or issues arose
subsequent to the filing of the original petition for dependency-neglect that
demonstrate that placement of the juvenile in the custody of the parent is
contrary to the juvenile's health, safety, or welfare and that, despite the
116 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
offer of appropriate family services, the parent has manifested the
incapacity or indifference to remedy the subsequent issues or factors or
rehabilitate the parent's circumstances that prevent the placement of the
juvenile in the custody of the parent.
(b) The department shall make reasonable
accommodations in accordance with the Americans with Disabilities Act of
1990, 42 U.S.C. § 12101 et seq., to parents with disabilities in order to
allow them meaningful access to reunification and family preservation
services.
(c) For purposes of this subdivision
(b)(3)(B)(vii), the inability or incapacity to remedy or rehabilitate
includes, but is not limited to, mental illness, emotional illness, or mental
deficiencies.
(d) Subdivision (b)(3)(B)(vii)(a) of this
section does not apply if the factors or issues have not been adjudicated by
the court or the parent is not provided with proper notice of the factors or
issues;
(viii) The parent is sentenced in a criminal
proceeding for a period of time that would constitute a substantial period of
the juvenile's life;
(ix)(a) The parent is found by a court of
competent jurisdiction, including the juvenile division of the circuit court,
to:
(1) Have committed murder or
manslaughter of any juvenile or to have aided or abetted, attempted,
conspired, or solicited to commit the murder or manslaughter;
(2) Have committed a felony battery that
results in serious bodily injury to any juvenile or to have aided or abetted,
attempted, conspired, or solicited to commit felony battery that results in
serious bodily injury to any juvenile;
(3)(A) Have subjected any juvenile to
aggravated circumstances.
(B) “Aggravated circumstances”
means:
(i) A juvenile has been
abandoned, chronically abused, subjected to extreme or repeated cruelty,
117 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
sexually abused, or a determination has been or is made by a judge that there
is little likelihood that services to the family will result in successful
reunification;
(ii) A juvenile has been
removed from the custody of the parent or guardian and placed in foster care
or in the custody of another person three (3) or more times in the last
fifteen (15) months; or
(iii) A child or a sibling
has been neglected or abused to the extent that the abuse or neglect could
endanger the life of the child;
(4)(A) Have had his or her parental
rights involuntarily terminated as to a child.
(B) It is an affirmative defense
to the termination of parental rights based on a prior involuntary
termination of parental rights that the parent has remedied the conditions
that caused the prior involuntary termination of parental rights; or
(5) Have abandoned an infant, as defined
in § 9-27-303.
(b) This subchapter does not require
reunification of a surviving child with a parent who has been found guilty of
any of the offenses listed in subdivision (b)(3)(B)(ix)(a) of this section;
or
(x)(a) A putative parent who fails to establish or
maintain meaningful contacts with his or her juvenile after:
(1) Being named and served as a party in
a dependency-neglect proceeding;
(2) Receiving notice of a dependency-
neglect proceeding under § 9-27-311 or § 9-27-325; and
(3) The court finds that the rights of
the putative parent with regard to the juvenile have attached.
(b) To find willful failure to maintain
meaningful contact, it shall be shown that the putative parent was not
prevented from visiting or having contact with the juvenile by the custodian
of the juvenile or any other person, taking into consideration the distance
of the juvenile's placement from the putative parent's home.
(c) A termination of parental rights under
118 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
subdivision (b)(3)(B)(x)(a) of this section shall not be considered an
involuntary termination.
(d)(1) Subdivision (b)(3)(B)(x)(a) of this
section does not apply to a putative parent whose rights have not attached to
a juvenile.
(2) If a court finds that the rights of
the putative parent have not attached to the juvenile, the court shall
dismiss the putative parent from the petition to terminate parental rights
and enter an order finding that no further notice is due to the putative
parent.
(c)(1) An order terminating the relationship between parent and
juvenile:
(A) Divests the parent and the juvenile of all legal
rights, powers, and obligations with respect to each other, including the
right to withhold consent to adoption, except the right of the juvenile to
inherit from the parent, that is terminated only by a final order of
adoption; and
(B)(i) Divests a putative parent and the juvenile of all
rights, powers, and obligations with respect to the putative parent and the
juvenile if the rights of the putative parent have attached under § 9-27-
325(n) before or during the termination proceeding.
(ii) The divesting of all the rights, powers, and
obligations of the putative parent and the juvenile shall be based on the
same authority, requirements, limitations, and other provisions that apply to
the termination of the rights of a parent, including without limitation the
provision requiring the dismissal of a putative parent as a party to a case
without further notice to the putative parent.
(2)(A) Termination of the relationship between a juvenile and
one parent shall not affect the relationship between the juvenile and the
other parent if those rights are legally established.
(B) A court may terminate the rights of one parent and not
the other parent if the court finds that it is in the best interest of the
child.
(3) An order terminating parental rights under this section:
(A) May authorize the department to consent to adoption of
the juvenile; and
119 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(B) Dismisses the parent or putative parent subject to the
termination of parental rights as a party to the case without further notice
to the parent or putative parent required.
(d)(1) The court shall conduct and complete a termination of parental
rights hearing within ninety (90) days from the date the petition for
termination of parental rights is filed unless continued for good cause as
articulated in the written order of the court.
(2)(A) The court may continue a termination of parental rights
hearing for up to one hundred eighty (180) days from the date the petition
for termination of parental rights is filed in extraordinary circumstances.
(B) As used in this subdivision (d)(2), “extraordinary
circumstances” includes without limitation the following circumstances:
(i) The Supreme Court orders the suspension of in-
person court proceedings; and
(ii) One (1) of the following has occurred:
(a) The President of the United States has
declared a national emergency; or
(b) The Governor has declared a state of
emergency or a statewide public health emergency.
(e) A written order shall be filed by the court or by a party or
party's counsel as designated by the court within thirty (30) days of the
date of the termination hearing or before the next hearing, whichever is
sooner.
(f) After the termination of parental rights hearing, the court shall
review the case at least every six (6) months, and a permanency planning
hearing shall be held each year following the initial permanency hearing
until permanency is achieved for that juvenile.
(g)(1)(A) A parent may withdraw consent to termination of parental
rights within ten (10) calendar days after it was signed by filing an
affidavit with the circuit clerk in the county designated by the consent as
the county in which the termination of parental rights will be filed.
(B) If the ten-day period ends on a weekend or legal
holiday, the person may file the affidavit the next working day.
(C) No fee shall be charged for the filing of the
affidavit.
(2) The consent to terminate parental rights shall state that
120 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
the person has the right of withdrawal of consent and shall provide the
address of the circuit clerk of the county in which the termination of
parental rights will be filed.
(h) Upon the entry of an order terminating parental rights the:
(1) Department is relieved of all responsibility for providing
reunification services to the parent whose parental rights are terminated;
(2) Appointed parent counsel is relieved of his or her
representation of the parent whose parental rights are terminated except as
provided under Rules 6-9 and 6-10 of the Rules of the Supreme Court and Court
of Appeals of the State of Arkansas;
(3) Appointed parent counsel shall be reappointed to represent a
parent who successfully appeals the termination of his or her parental rights
if the parent is indigent; and
(4) Parent whose parental rights are terminated or a putative
parent who after receiving notice is determined by a court to not have rights
attached to the juvenile is not entitled to:
(A) Notice of any court proceeding concerning the
juvenile, including a petition for adoption concerning the juvenile; and
(B) An opportunity to be heard in any court proceeding
concerning the juvenile.

9-27-342. Proceedings concerning juveniles for whom paternity not
established.
(a) Absent orders of a circuit court or another court of competent
jurisdiction to the contrary, the biological mother, whether adult or minor,
of a juvenile for whom paternity has not been established is deemed to be the
natural guardian of that juvenile and is entitled to the care, custody, and
control of that juvenile.
(b) The biological mother, the putative father, the juvenile himself
or herself, or the Office of Child Support Enforcement of the Revenue
Division of the Department of Finance and Administration may bring an action
to establish paternity or support of a juvenile for whom paternity has not
been established.
(c)(1) If the juvenile is not born when the parties appear before the
court, the court may hear evidence and issue temporary orders and findings
pending the birth of the juvenile.
121 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(2) In the event the final order is contrary to the temporary
one, the court shall render judgment for the amount paid under the temporary
order against the petitioner if such was the biological mother.
(3) If the mother dies before the final order, the action may be
revived in the name of the juvenile, and the mother's testimony at the
temporary hearing may be introduced in the final hearing.
(d) Upon an adjudication by the court that the putative father is the
father of the juvenile, the court shall follow the same guidelines,
procedures, and requirements as established by the laws of this state
applicable to child support orders and judgments entered upon divorce. The
court may award court costs and attorney's fees.
(e) If paternity has been established in a court of competent
jurisdiction, a father may petition the court in the county where the
juvenile resides for custody of the juvenile. The court may award custody to
a father who has had paternity established if the court finds by a
preponderance of the evidence that:
(1) He is a fit parent to raise the juvenile;
(2) He has assumed his responsibilities toward the juvenile by
providing care, supervision, protection, and financial support for the
juvenile; and
(3) It is in the best interest of the juvenile to award custody
to the father.
(f) At the request of either party in a paternity action, the trial
court shall direct that the putative father, biological mother, and juvenile
submit to one (1) or more blood tests or other scientific examinations or
tests, including deoxyribonucleic acid typing, to determine whether or not
the putative father can be excluded as being the father of the juvenile and
to establish the probability of paternity if the test does not exclude the
putative father.
(g) The tests shall be made by a duly qualified physician or
physicians, or by another duly qualified person or persons, not to exceed
three (3), to be appointed by the court.
(h)(1) The results of the tests shall be receivable in evidence.
(2)(A) A written report of the test results by the duly
qualified expert performing the test, or by a duly qualified expert under
whose supervision and direction the test and analysis have been performed,
122 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
certified by an affidavit duly subscribed and sworn to by the expert before a
notary public, may be introduced in evidence in illegitimacy actions without
calling the expert as a witness. If either party shall desire to question the
expert, the party shall have the expert subpoenaed within a reasonable time
prior to trial.
(B) If the results of the paternity tests establish a
ninety-five percent (95%) or more probability of inclusion that the putative
father is the biological father of the juvenile and after corroborating
testimony of the mother in regard to access during the probable period of
conception, this shall constitute a prima facie case of establishment of
paternity and the burden of proof shall shift to the putative father to rebut
such proof.
(3) The experts shall be subject to cross-examination by both
parties after the court has caused them to disclose their findings.
(i) Whenever the court orders the blood tests to be taken and one (1)
of the parties refuses to submit to the test, that fact shall be disclosed
upon the trial unless good cause is shown to the contrary.
(j) The costs of the test and witness fees shall be taxed by the court
as other costs in the case.
(k) Whenever it shall be relevant to the prosecution or the defense in
a paternity action, blood tests that exclude third parties as the father of
the juvenile shall be the same as set out in subsections (f) and (g) of this
section.
(l) The refusal of a party to submit to a genetic or other ordered
test is admissible at a hearing to determine paternity only as to the
credibility of the party.
(m) If a male witness offers testimony indicating that his act of
intercourse with the mother may have resulted in the conception of the
juvenile, the court may require the witness to submit to genetic or other
tests to determine whether he is the juvenile's father.

9-27-343. Appeals.
(a) All appeals from juvenile cases shall be made to the Supreme Court
or to the Court of Appeals in the time and manner provided for appeals in the
Arkansas Rules of Appellate Procedure.
(b) In delinquency cases, the petitioner may appeal only under those
123 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
circumstances that would permit the state to appeal in criminal proceedings.
(c) Pending an appeal from any case involving a juvenile out-of-home
placement, the juvenile division of circuit court retains jurisdiction to
conduct further hearings.

9-27-344. Monthly report.
The circuit court shall submit monthly to the Director of the
Administrative Office of the Courts a report in writing upon forms to be
furnished by the director showing the number and disposition of juveniles
brought before the juvenile division of circuit court together with such
other information regarding those cases as may be requested by the director.

9-27-345. Admissibility of evidence.
(a) Juvenile adjudications of delinquency for offenses for which the
juvenile could have been tried as an adult may be used at the sentencing
phase in subsequent adult criminal proceedings against those same
individuals.
(b)(1) No other evidence adduced against a juvenile in any proceeding
under this subchapter nor the fact of adjudication or disposition shall be
admissible evidence against the juvenile in any civil, criminal, or other
proceeding.
(2) However, the evidence shall be admissible when proper in
subsequent proceedings against the same juvenile under this subchapter.

9-27-346. Support orders.
(a) If it appears at the adjudication or disposition hearing in any
case brought under this subchapter that the parents or any other person named
in the petition who is by law required to provide support for the juvenile is
able to contribute to the support of the juvenile, the court shall issue an
order requiring the person to pay a reasonable sum pursuant to the guidelines
for child support and the family support chart for the support, maintenance,
or education of the juvenile to any person, agency, or institution to whom
custody is awarded.
(b) The court, upon proper motion, may make such adjustments and
modifications of the order as may appear reasonable and proper.
(c) The court shall also order the persons required by law to support
124 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
a juvenile to disclose their places of employment and the amounts earned by
them. Anyone who refuses to disclose such information may be cited for
contempt of court.

9-27-347. Probation reports.
(a) The probation officer shall make and keep a complete history of
each case before disposition and during the course of any probation imposed
by the circuit court.
(b)(1) It is the intention of this section to require an intelligent
and thorough report of each juvenile before probation and during probation as
to heredity, environment, condition, treatment, development, and results.
(2) The report shall contain among other information the age,
sex, nativity, residence, education, mentality, habits, whether married or
single, and employment and income and shall be continued so as to show the
condition of the person during the term of his or her probation and the
results of probation in the case.
(3) The report shall never be disclosed except as required by
law or directed by the court.
(c) The probation officer shall furnish to each person released on
probation a written statement of the terms and conditions of probation and
shall report to the court any violation or breach of the terms and conditions
so imposed.

9-27-348. Publication of proceedings.
No information by which the name or identity of a juvenile who is the
subject of proceedings under this subchapter may be ascertained shall be
published by the news media without written order of the circuit court.

9-27-349. Compliance with federal acts.
The Division of Youth Services shall have the responsibility for the
collection, review, and reporting of statistical information on detained or
incarcerated juveniles, for adult jails, adult lock-ups, and juvenile
detention facilities to assure compliance with the provisions of Pub. L. No.
93-415, the Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention Act of 1974.

9-27-350. Compacts to share costs.
125 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
Nothing in this subchapter shall prohibit two (2) or more counties,
cities, or school districts of this state from agreeing by compact to share
the costs of court personnel or juvenile facilities to serve both or all of
the counties so agreeing.

9-27-351. Escape considered an act of delinquency.
The escape of a juvenile from the locked portion of a juvenile facility
is an act of delinquency.

9-27-352. [Repealed.]

9-27-353. Duties and responsibilities of custodian.
(a) It shall be the duty of any person or agency appointed as the
custodian of any juvenile in a proceeding under this subchapter to care for
and maintain the juvenile and to see that the juvenile is protected, properly
trained and educated, and has the opportunity to learn a trade, occupation,
or profession.
(b)(1) The person or agency appointed as the custodian of a juvenile
in a proceeding under this subchapter has the right to obtain medical care
for the juvenile, including giving consent to specific medical, dental, or
mental health treatments and procedures as required in the opinion of a duly
authorized or licensed physician, dentist, surgeon, or psychologist, whether
or not such care is rendered on an emergency, inpatient, or outpatient basis.
(2) If there is an open dependency-neglect proceeding, the
custodian shall not make any of the following decisions without receiving
express court approval:
(A) Consent to the removal of bodily organs, unless the
procedure is necessary to save the life of the juvenile;
(B) Consent to withhold life-saving treatments;
(C) Consent to withhold life-sustaining treatments; or
(D) The amputation of any body part, unless the procedure
is necessary in an emergency to save the life of the juvenile.
(c) The custodian has the right to enroll the juvenile in school upon
the presentation of an order of custody.
(d) The custodian has the right to obtain medical and school records
of any juvenile in his or her custody upon presentation of an order of
126 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
custody.
(e) Any agency appointed as the custodian of a juvenile has the right
to consent to the juvenile's travel on vacation or similar trips.
(f)(1) It shall be the duty of every person granted custody,
guardianship, or adoption of any juvenile in a proceeding under or arising
out of a dependency-neglect action under this subchapter to ensure that the
juvenile is not returned to the care or supervision of any person from whom
the child was removed or any person the court has specifically ordered not to
have care, supervision, or custody of the juvenile.
(2) This section shall not be construed to prohibit these
placements if the person who has been granted custody, guardianship, or
adoption obtains a court order to that effect from the juvenile division of
circuit court that made the award of custody, guardianship, or adoption.
(3) Failure to abide by subdivision (f)(1) of this section is
punishable as a criminal offense under § 5-26-502(a)(3).
(g) The court shall not split custody, that is, grant legal custody to
one (1) person or agency and grant physical custody to another person or
agency.

9-27-354. Progress reports on juveniles.
(a)(1) The court may order progress reports from a service provider
whenever a juvenile is placed out of home and in a setting other than a
Department of Human Services foster home.
(2) The order shall:
(A) Set forth the schedule for the progress reports; and
(B) Identify the service provider responsible for
submitting the progress reports.
(3) The service provider shall be provided a copy of the written
court order by:
(A) Certified mail, restricted delivery; or
(B) Process server.
(4) Failure to follow the order of the court shall subject the
service provider to contempt sanctions of the court.
(b) A progress report shall include, but not be limited to the:
(1) Reason for admission;
(2) Projected length of stay;
127 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(3) Identified goals and objectives to be addressed during
placement;
(4) Progress of the juvenile in meeting goals and objectives;
(5) Barriers to progress;
(6) Significant behavioral disruptions and response of provider;
and
(7) Recommendations upon the juvenile's release.
(c) The service provider shall immediately report any incidents
concerning the juvenile's health or safety to:
(1) The juvenile's attorney or attorney ad litem; and
(2) The custodian of the juvenile.

9-27-355. Placement of juveniles.
(a) The court shall not specify a particular provider for placement of
a foster child.
(b)(1)(A) When the Department of Human Services takes custody of a
juvenile under § 12-18-1001, or when the court determines that a juvenile
shall be removed from his or her home under this subchapter, the department
shall conduct an immediate assessment to locate:
(i) A noncustodial parent of the juvenile;
(ii) Recommended relatives of the juvenile, including
each grandparent of the juvenile, and all parents of the juvenile's sibling
if the parent has custody of the sibling; and
(iii) Fictive kin identified by the juvenile as one
(1) or more persons who play or have a significant positive role in his or
her life.
(B)(i) If there is a safety issue identified from a Child
Maltreatment Central Registry check or criminal background check, the
department is not required to provide further assessment or notice to the
persons identified under subdivision (b)(1)(A) of this section.
(ii) If there is not a safety issue identified in a
Child Maltreatment Central Registry check or criminal background check
regarding all the persons identified under subdivision (b)(1)(A) of this
section, the department shall provide in writing to the persons identified
the following notice:
(a) A statement saying that the juvenile has
128 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
been or is being removed from his or her parent;
(b) An explanation concerning how to
participate and be considered for care, placement, and family time with the
juvenile;
(c) Information needed for a child welfare
safety check and home study, if the person is interested in placement;
(d) Information about provisional relative
foster care, fictive kin, and other supportive benefits available through the
department;
(e) A statement saying that failure to timely
respond may result in the loss of opportunities to be involved in the care,
placement, and family time with the juvenile; and
(f) The name, phone number, email address, and
physical address of the caseworker and supervisor assigned to the case.
(C) If the court has not transferred custody to a
noncustodial parent, relative, or other individual, or the department has not
placed the juvenile in provisional relative placement or fictive kin
placement, the department shall continue its assessment under subdivisions
(b)(1)(A) and (B) of this section throughout the case.
(D) The department shall provide upon request of the
court, parties to the proceeding, or counsel for the parties to the
proceeding a record of the efforts made to locate the noncustodial parent,
relatives, fictive kin, or other persons identified under subdivision
(b)(1)(A) of this section and the results of the assessment, including the
following information concerning the identified person:
(i) Name;
(ii) Last known address and phone number;
(iii) The appropriateness of placement based on the
department's assessment of the person; and
(iv) Other identifying or relevant information to the
extent known by the department.
(E)(i) A relative or fictive kin identified by the
department under subdivision (b)(1)(A) of this section shall be given
preferential consideration for placement if the relative or fictive kin meets
all relevant protective standards and it is in the best interest of the
juvenile to be placed with the relative or fictive kin.
129 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(ii) In all placements, preferential consideration
for a relative or fictive kin shall be given at all stages of the case.
(iii) If the court denies placement with a relative
or fictive kin, the court shall make specific findings of fact in writing
regarding the considerations given to the relative or fictive kin and the
reasons the placement was denied.
(iv) The court shall not base its decision to place
the juvenile solely upon the consideration of the relationship formed between
the juvenile and a foster parent.
(F)(i) The court may transfer custody to any relative or
any other person recommended by the department, the parent, or any party upon
review of a home study, including criminal background and child maltreatment
reports, and a finding that custody is in the best interest of the child.
(ii) A home study is not required for a parent of a
juvenile.
(2) Placement or custody of a juvenile in the home of a
relative, fictive kin, or other person shall not relieve the department of
its responsibility to actively implement the goal of the case.
(3)(A) The juvenile shall remain in a licensed or approved
foster home, shelter, or facility or an exempt child welfare agency as
defined under § 9-28-402 until the home is opened as a regular foster home,
as a provisional foster home if the person is a relative to one (1) of the
children in the sibling group, including step-siblings, or the court grants
custody of the juvenile to the relative, fictive kin, or other person after a
written approved home study is presented to the court.
(B) For placement only with a relative or fictive kin:
(i) The juvenile and the juvenile's siblings or
step-siblings may be placed in the home of a relative or fictive kin on a
provisional basis for up to six (6) months pending the relative or fictive
kin's home being opened as a regular foster home;
(ii)(a) If the relative or fictive kin opts to
have his or her home opened as a provisional foster home, the relative or
fictive kin shall not be paid a board payment until the relative or fictive
kin meets all of the requirements and his or her home is opened as a regular
foster home.
(b) A relative or fictive kin who has his or
130 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
her home opened as a provisional foster home may receive a board payment from
the department for no more than six (6) months unless fully opened as a
foster home;
(iii) Until the relative or fictive kin's home is
opened as a regular foster home, the relative or fictive kin may:
(a) Apply for and receive benefits that the
relative or fictive kin may be entitled to due to the placement of the
juvenile in the home, such as benefits under the Transitional Employment
Assistance Program, § 20-76-401, and the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance
Program; and
(b) Receive child support or any federal
benefits paid on behalf of the juvenile in the relative or fictive kin's
home; and
(iv) If the relative or fictive kin's home is not
fully licensed as a foster home after six (6) months of the placement of the
juvenile and the siblings or step-siblings in the home:
(a) The department shall remove the juvenile
and any of the siblings or step-siblings from the relative or fictive kin's
home and close the relative or fictive kin's provisional foster home; or
(b) The court shall remove custody from the
department and grant custody of the juvenile to the relative or fictive kin
subject to the limitations outlined in subdivision (b)(4) of this section.
(4) If the court grants custody of the juvenile and any siblings
or step-siblings to the relative, fictive kin, or other person:
(A)(i) The juvenile and any siblings or step-siblings
shall not be placed back in the custody of the department while remaining in
the home of the relative, fictive kin, or other person.
(ii) The juvenile and any siblings or step-siblings
shall not be removed from the custody of the relative, fictive kin, or other
person, placed in the custody of the department, and then remain or be
returned to the home of the relative, fictive kin, or other person while
remaining in the custody of the department;
(B)(i) The relative, fictive kin, or other person shall
not receive any financial assistance, including board payments, from the
department, except for financial assistance for which the relative, fictive
kin, or other person has applied and for which the relative, fictive kin, or
131 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
other person qualifies under the program guidelines, such as the Transitional
Employment Assistance Program, the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program,
Medicaid, and a federal adoption subsidy.
(ii) A relative or fictive kin who has his or her
home opened as a provisional foster home may receive a monthly board payment
from the department for no more than six (6) months unless fully opened as a
foster home; and
(C) The department shall not be ordered to pay the
equivalent of board payments, adoption subsidies, or guardianship subsidies
to the relative, fictive kin, or other person as reasonable efforts to
prevent removal of custody from the relative, fictive kin, or other person.
(5) In an action under this subsection concerning placement of a
juvenile, the circuit court may consider the preferences of the juvenile if
the juvenile is of a sufficient age and capacity to reason, regardless of the
juvenile's chronological age.
(c)(1)(A) The court may order a juvenile who is in the custody of the
department to be placed in a trial home placement with a parent of the
juvenile or the person from whom custody of the juvenile was removed for a
period of:
(i) No longer than sixty (60) days; or
(ii) More than sixty (60) days but no longer than one
hundred eighty (180) days with the consent of the department.
(B) The department may place a juvenile who is in its
custody in a trial home placement with a parent of the juvenile or the person
from whom custody of the juvenile was removed for no longer than one hundred
eighty (180) days.
(C) A trial home placement with a parent who did not have
custody of the juvenile at the time of the removal of the juvenile and
placement into the custody of the department may occur only after the court
or the department determines that:
(i) The trial home placement is in the best interest
of the juvenile;
(ii) The noncustodial parent does not have a
restriction on contact with the juvenile; and
(iii) There is no safety concern with the trial home
placement after reviewing:
132 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(a) The criminal background of the
noncustodial parent;
(b) The home of the noncustodial parent and
each person in the home of the noncustodial parent; and
(c) Other information in the records of the
department, including without limitation records concerning foster care,
child maltreatment, protective services, and supportive services.
(2)(A) At every stage of the case, the court shall consider the
least restrictive placement for the juvenile and assess safety concerns that
prevent either a trial home placement or the juvenile from being returned to
or placed in the custody of the parent of the juvenile.
(B) The court shall detail the safety concerns in
subdivision (c)(2)(A) of this section in its written order.
(C) Failure to complete a case plan is not a sufficient
reason alone to deny the placement of the juvenile in the home of a parent of
the juvenile.
(D) A trial home placement may be made with a parent of
the juvenile or the person from whom custody of the juvenile was removed.
(3) At the end of the trial home placement:
(A) The court shall place custody of the juvenile with the
parent of the juvenile or the person from whom custody of the juvenile was
removed; or
(B) The department shall return the juvenile to a licensed
or approved foster home, shelter, or facility or an exempt child welfare
agency as defined in § 9-28-402.
(d) When a juvenile leaves the custody of the department and the court
grants custody to the parent or another person, the department is no longer
legal custodian of the juvenile, even if the juvenile division of circuit
court retains jurisdiction.

9-27-356. Juvenile sex offender assessment and registration.
(a) If a juvenile is an adjudicated delinquent for any of the
following offenses, the court shall order a sex offender screening and risk
assessment:
(1) Rape, § 5-14-103;
(2) Sexual assault in the first degree, § 5-14-124;
133 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(3) Sexual assault in the second degree, § 5-14-125;
(4) Incest, § 5-26-202; or
(5) Engaging children in sexually explicit conduct for use in
visual or print medium, § 5-27-303.
(b)(1) The court may order a sex offender screening and risk
assessment if a juvenile is adjudicated delinquent for any offense with an
underlying sexually motivated component.
(2) The court may require that a juvenile register as a sex
offender upon recommendation of the Sex Offender Assessment Committee and
following a hearing as set forth in subsection (e) of this section.
(c) The juvenile division of circuit court judge may order
reassessment of the sex offender screening and risk assessment by the
committee at any time while the court has jurisdiction over the juvenile.
(d) Following a sex offender screening and risk assessment, the
prosecutor may file a motion to request that a juvenile register as a sex
offender at any time while the court has jurisdiction of the delinquency case
if a juvenile is found delinquent for any of the offenses listed in
subsection (a) of this section.
(e)(1) The court shall conduct a hearing within ninety (90) days of
the registration motion.
(2)(A) The juvenile defendant shall be represented by counsel,
and the court shall consider the following factors in making its decision to
require the juvenile to register as a delinquent sex offender:
(i) The seriousness of the offense;
(ii) The protection of society;
(iii) The level of planning and participation in the
alleged offense;
(iv) The previous sex offender history of the
juvenile, including whether the juvenile has been adjudicated delinquent for
prior sex offenses;
(v) Whether there are facilities or programs
available to the court that are likely to rehabilitate the juvenile prior to
the expiration of the court's jurisdiction;
(vi) The sex offender assessment and any other
relevant written reports and other materials relating to the juvenile's
mental, physical, educational, and social history; and
134 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(vii) Any other factors deemed relevant by the court.
(B) However, under no circumstances shall the exercise by
the juvenile of the right against self-incrimination, the right to an
adjudication hearing or appeal, the refusal to admit to an offense for which
he or she was adjudicated delinquent, or the refusal to admit to other
offenses in the assessment process be considered in the decision whether to
require registration.
(f)(1) The court shall make written findings on all the factors in
subsection (e) of this section.
(2) Upon a finding by clear and convincing evidence that a
juvenile should or should not be required to register as a sex offender, the
court shall enter its order.
(g) When the juvenile division of circuit court judge orders a
juvenile to register as a sex offender, the judge shall order either the
Division of Youth Services or a juvenile probation officer to complete the
registration process by:
(1) Completing the sex offender registration form;
(2) Providing a copy of the sex offender registration order,
fact sheet, registration form, and the Juvenile Sex Offender Rights and
Responsibilities Form to the juvenile and the juvenile's parent, guardian, or
custodian and explaining this information to the juvenile and the juvenile's
parent, guardian, or custodian;
(3) Mailing a copy of the registration court order, fact sheets,
and registration form to the Arkansas Crime Information Center, Sex Offender
Registry Manager, 322 Main St #615, Little Rock, AR 72201;
(4) Providing local law enforcement agencies where the juvenile
resides a copy of the sex offender registration form; and
(5) Ensuring that copies of all documents are forwarded to the
court for placement in the court file.
(h) The juvenile may petition the court to have his or her name
removed from the sex offender register at any time while the court has
jurisdiction over the juvenile or when the juvenile turns twenty-one (21)
years of age, whichever is later.
(i) The juvenile division of circuit court judge shall order the
juvenile's name removed from the sex offender register upon proof by a
preponderance of the evidence that the juvenile does not pose a threat to the
135 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
safety of others.
(j) If the court does not order the juvenile's name removed from the
sex offender register, the juvenile shall remain on the sex offender register
for ten (10) years from the last date on which the juvenile was adjudicated a
delinquent or found guilty as an adult for a sex offense or until the
juvenile turns twenty-one (21) years of age, whichever is longer.
(k) Once a juvenile is ordered to register as a sex offender, he or
she shall be subject to the registration requirements set forth in §§ 12-12-
904, 12-12-906, 12-12-908, 12-12-909, and 12-12-912.

9-27-357. Deoxyribonucleic acid samples.
(a) A person who is adjudicated delinquent for the following offenses
shall have a deoxyribonucleic acid sample drawn:
(1) Rape, § 5-14-103;
(2) Sexual assault in the first degree, § 5-14-124;
(3) Sexual assault in the second degree, § 5-14-125;
(4) Incest, § 5-26-202;
(5) Capital murder, § 5-10-101;
(6) Murder in the first degree, § 5-10-102;
(7) Murder in the second degree, § 5-10-103;
(8) Kidnapping, § 5-11-102;
(9) Aggravated robbery, § 5-12-103;
(10) Terroristic act, § 5-13-310; and
(11) Aggravated assault upon a law enforcement officer or an
employee of a correctional facility, § 5-13-211, if a Class Y felony.
(b) The court shall order a fine of two hundred fifty dollars ($250)
unless the court finds that the fine would cause an undue hardship.
(c)(1) Only a juvenile adjudicated delinquent for one (1) of the
offenses listed in subsection (a) of this section shall have a
deoxyribonucleic acid sample drawn upon intake at a juvenile detention
facility or intake at a Division of Youth Services facility.
(2) If the juvenile is not placed in a facility, the juvenile
probation officer to whom the juvenile is assigned shall ensure that the
deoxyribonucleic acid sample is drawn.
(d) All deoxyribonucleic acid samples taken under this section shall
be taken in accordance with rules promulgated by the State Crime Laboratory.
136 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320

9-27-358. [Repealed.]

9-27-359. Fifteenth-month review hearing.
(a) A hearing shall be held to determine whether the Department of
Human Services shall file a petition to terminate parental rights if:
(1) A juvenile has been in an out-of-home placement for fifteen
(15) continuous months, excluding trial placements and time on runaway
status; and
(2) The goal at the permanency planning hearing was either
reunification or Another Planned Permanent Living Arrangement (APPLA).
(b) The circuit court shall authorize the department to file a
petition to terminate parental rights unless:
(1)(A)(i) The child is being cared for by a relative or
relatives;
(ii) Termination of parental rights is not in the
best interest of the child;
(iii) The relative has made a long-term commitment to
the child; and
(iv) The relative is willing to pursue adoption,
guardianship, or permanent custody of the juvenile; or
(B)(i) The child is being cared for by his or her parent
who is in foster care; and
(ii) Termination of parental rights is not in the
best interest of the child;
(2)(A) The department has documented in the case plan a
compelling reason why filing a petition is not in the best interest of the
child; and
(B) The court approves the compelling reason as documented
in the case plan; or
(3) The department has not provided to the family of the
juvenile, consistent with the time period in the case plan, the services the
department deemed necessary for the safe return of the child to the child's
home if reunification services were required to be made to the family.
(c) If the court determines the permanency goal to be adoption, the
department shall file a petition to terminate parental rights no later than
137 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
the fifteenth month of the child's entry into foster care.
(d) If the court finds that the juvenile should remain in an out-of-
home placement, either long-term or otherwise, the juvenile's case shall be
reviewed every six (6) months, with an annual permanency planning hearing.
(e) A written order shall be filed by the court or by a party or
party's attorney as designated by the court and distributed to the parties
within thirty (30) days of the date of the hearing or prior to the next
hearing, whichever is sooner.

9-27-360. Review of termination of parental rights.
(a) After an order of termination of parental rights, the circuit
court shall review the case following the termination hearing at least every
six (6) months until permanency is achieved, and a permanency planning
hearing shall be held each year following the initial permanency hearing
until permanency is achieved for that juvenile.
(b) The court shall determine and shall include in its orders whether:
(1) The case plan, services, and current placement meet the
juvenile's special needs and best interest, with the juvenile's health,
safety, and educational needs specifically addressed;
(2) The Department of Human Services has made reasonable efforts
to finalize a permanency plan for the juvenile; and
(3) The case plan is moving toward an appropriate permanent
placement for the juvenile.
(c) In making its findings, the court shall consider the extent of the
compliance of the department and the juvenile with the case plan and court
orders to finalize the permanency plan.
(d) A written order shall be filed by the court or by a party or a
party's attorney as designated by the court and distributed to the parties
within thirty (30) days of the date of the hearing or prior to the next
hearing, whichever is sooner.

9-27-361. Court reports.
(a)(1) Seven (7) business days before a scheduled dependency-neglect
review hearing, including the fifteenth-month review hearing and any post-
termination of parental rights hearing, the Department of Human Services and
a court-appointed special advocate, if appointed, shall:
138 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(A) Distribute a review report to all the parties or their
attorneys and the court-appointed special advocate, if appointed; or
(B) Upload into a shared case management database an
electronic copy of the court report.
(2)(A) The court report prepared by the department shall include
a summary of the compliance of the parties with the court orders and case
plan, including the description of the services and assistance the department
has provided and recommendations to the court.
(B) In cases in which a child has been returned home, the
department's review report shall include a description of any services needed
by and requirements of the parent or parents, including, but not limited to,
a safety plan to ensure the health and safety of the juvenile in the home.
(C)(i) In cases in which a juvenile has been transferred
to the custody of the department, the department's court report shall outline
the efforts made by the department to identify and notify adult grandparents
and other adult relatives that the juvenile is in the custody of the
department.
(ii) The department's court report shall list all
adult grandparents and other adult relatives notified by the department and
the response of each adult grandparent or other adult relative to the notice,
including:
(a) The adult grandparent or other adult
relative's interest in participating in the care and placement of the
juvenile;
(b) Whether the adult grandparent or other
adult relative is interested in becoming a provisional foster parent or
foster parent of the juvenile;
(c) Whether the adult grandparent or other
adult relative is interested in kinship guardianship, if funding is
available; and
(d) Whether the adult grandparent or other
adult relative is interested in family time.
(3) The report prepared by the court-appointed special advocate
shall include, but is not limited to:
(A) Any independent factual information that he or she
feels is relevant to the case;
139 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(B) A summary of the compliance of the parties with the
court orders;
(C) Any information on adult relatives, including their
contact information and the volunteer's recommendation about relative
placement and family time; and
(D) Recommendations to the court.
(4)(A) At a review hearing, the court shall determine on the
record whether the previously filed reports shall be admitted into evidence
based on any evidentiary objections made by the parties.
(B) The court shall not consider as evidence any report or
part of a report that was not admitted into evidence on the record.
(b)(1) Seven (7) business days before a scheduled dependency-neglect
permanency planning hearing, the department and the court-appointed special
advocate, if appointed, shall:
(A) Distribute a permanency planning court report to all
of the parties or their attorneys and the court-appointed special advocate,
if appointed; or
(B) Upload into a shared case management database an
electronic copy of the court report.
(2) The permanency planning court report prepared by the
department shall include, but not be limited to, the following:
(A) A summary of the compliance of the parties with the
court orders and case plan, including the description of the services and
assistance the department has provided;
(B) A list of all the placements in which the juvenile has
been;
(C) A recommendation and discussion regarding the
permanency plan, including:
(i) The appropriateness of the plan;
(ii) A timeline; and
(iii) The steps and services necessary to achieve the
plan, including the persons responsible; and
(D) The location of any siblings, and if separated, a
statement for the reasons for separation and any efforts to reunite or
maintain contact if appropriate and in the best interest of the siblings.
(3) The report prepared by the court-appointed special advocate
140 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
shall include, but is not limited to:
(A) Any independent factual information that he or she
feels is relevant to the case;
(B) A summary of the compliance of the parties with the
court orders;
(C) Any information on adult relatives, including their
contact information and the volunteer's recommendation about relative
placement and family time; and
(D) The recommendations to the court.
(4)(A) At the permanency planning hearing, the court shall
determine on the record whether the previously filed reports shall be
admitted into evidence based on any evidentiary objections made by the
parties.
(B) The court shall not consider as evidence any report or
part of a report that was not admitted into evidence on the record.
(c)(1) The court shall determine on the record whether a report or an
addendum report shall be admitted into evidence based on any evidentiary
objections made by the parties.
(2) The court shall not consider as evidence any report, part of
a report, or an addendum report that was not admitted into evidence on the
record.

9-27-362. Emancipation of juveniles.
(a) A petition for emancipation may be filed in a circuit court by any
party to a dependency-neglect, dependency, family in need of services, or
delinquency case.
(b) The petition shall be served along with a notice of hearing to the
juvenile's parent, legal guardian, or legal custodian.
(c) The circuit court may emancipate a juvenile in a dependency-
neglect, dependency, family in need of services, or delinquency case.
(d)(1) The court may emancipate the juvenile after a hearing on the
petition if the petitioner shows by a preponderance of the evidence that:
(A) The juvenile is at least seventeen (17) years of age;
(B) The juvenile is willing to live separate and apart
from his or her parent, legal guardian, or legal custodian;
(C) The juvenile has an appropriate place to live;
141 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(D) The juvenile has been managing or has the ability to
manage his or her own financial affairs;
(E) The juvenile has a legal source of income, such as
employment or a trust fund;
(F) The juvenile has healthcare coverage or a realistic
plan on how to meet his or her health needs;
(G) The juvenile agrees to comply with the compulsory
school attendance laws; and
(H) Emancipation is in the best interest of the juvenile.
(2) The court shall consider the wishes of the parent, legal
guardian, or legal custodian in making its decision.
(3) If the juvenile has an attorney ad litem, the court shall
consider the recommendation of the attorney ad litem.
(e) An order of emancipation has the following effects:
(1) The juvenile has the right to obtain and consent to all
medical care, including counseling;
(2) The juvenile has the right to enter into contracts;
(3) The juvenile has the right to enroll himself or herself in
school, college, or other educational programs;
(4) The juvenile has the right to obtain a driver's license
without consent of a parent or other adult so long as the juvenile complies
with the remaining requirements of the driver's license law;
(5) The juvenile's parent, legal guardian, or legal custodian is
no longer legally responsible for the juvenile;
(6) The juvenile may still be charged with a delinquency and
prosecuted in juvenile court;
(7) The juvenile may not marry without parental permission
pursuant to § 9-11-102;
(8) The juvenile is not relieved from compulsory school
attendance;
(9) The Department of Human Services is not relieved from the
responsibility of providing independent living services and funding for which
the juvenile is eligible upon request by the juvenile;
(10) Child support orders are not terminated but may cease upon
entry of an order from the court that issued the order of child support;
(11) Until the juvenile reaches the age of majority, the juvenile
142 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
remains eligible for federal programs and services as a juvenile;
(12) The juvenile is not permitted to obtain items prohibited for
sale to or possession by a minor, such as tobacco or alcohol;
(13) The juvenile remains subject to state and federal laws
enacted for the protection of persons under eighteen (18) years of age such
as the prohibition against a juvenile's obtaining a tattoo; and
(14) No statute of limitations is affected.

9-27-363. Foster youth transition.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) A juvenile in foster care should have a family for a
lifetime, but too many juveniles in foster care reach the age of majority
without being successfully reunited with their biological families and
without the security of permanent homes;
(2) A juvenile in foster care who is approaching the age of
majority shall be provided the opportunity to be actively engaged in the
planning of his or her future; and
(3) The Department of Human Services shall:
(A) Include the juvenile in the process of developing a
plan to transition the child into adulthood;
(B) Empower the juvenile with information about all of the
options and services available;
(C) Provide the juvenile with the opportunity to
participate in services tailored to his or her individual needs and designed
to enhance his or her ability to receive the skills necessary to enter
adulthood;
(D) Assist the juvenile in developing and maintaining
healthy relationships with nurturing adults who can be a resource and
positive guiding influences in his or her life after he or she leaves foster
care; and
(E) Provide the juvenile with basic information and
documentation regarding his or her biological family and personal history.
(b)(1) The department shall assist a juvenile in foster care or
entering foster care with the development of a transitional life plan when
the juvenile turns fourteen (14) years of age or within ninety (90) days of
his or her fourteenth birthday, whichever occurs first.
143 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(2) The plan shall include without limitation written
information and confirmation concerning:
(A) A description of the programs and services that will
help the juvenile prepare for transition from foster care to a successful
adulthood, including without limitation the John H. Chafee Foster Care
Program for Successful Transition to Adulthood;
(B) The juvenile's right to remain in extended foster care
after reaching eighteen (18) years of age if the juvenile:
(i) Is completing secondary education or a program
leading to an equivalent credential;
(ii) Is enrolled in an institution that provides
postsecondary or vocational education;
(iii) Is participating in a program or activity
designed to promote or remove barriers to employment;
(iv) Is employed for at least eighty (80) hours per
month;
(v) Has a viable plan to meet the requirements of
subdivisions (b)(2)(B)(i)-(iv) of this section; or
(vi) Is incapable of doing one (1) or more of the
activities listed in subdivisions (b)(2)(B)(i)-(v) of this section due to a
medical condition, which incapability is supported by regularly updated
information in the case plan of the juvenile; and
(C) The juvenile's case, including his or her biological
family, foster care placement history, tribal information, if applicable, and
the whereabouts of siblings, if any, unless a court determines that release
of information pertaining to a sibling would jeopardize the safety or welfare
of the sibling.
(c) The department shall assist the juvenile with:
(1) Completing applications for:
(A) ARKids First, Medicaid, or assistance in obtaining
other health insurance;
(B) Referrals to transitional housing, if available, or
assistance in securing other housing; and
(C) Assistance in obtaining employment or other financial
support;
(2) Applying for admission to a college or university, to a
144 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
vocational training program, or to another educational institution and in
obtaining financial aid, when appropriate; and
(3) Developing and maintaining relationships with individuals
who are important to the juvenile and who may serve as resources that are
based on the best interest of the juvenile.
(d) A juvenile and his or her attorney shall fully participate in the
development of his or her transitional plan, to the extent that the juvenile
is able to participate medically and developmentally.
(e)(1) If a juvenile does not have the capacity to successfully
transition into adulthood without the assistance of the Office of Public
Guardian for Adults, the Division of Children and Family Services shall make
a referral to the office no later than six (6) months before the juvenile
reaches eighteen (18) years of age or upon entering foster care, whichever
occurs later.
(2) A representative from the office or a designee shall attend
and participate in the transitional youth staffing, and information shall be
provided to all of the parties about what services are available and how to
access services for the juvenile after reaching the age of majority.
(f) Before closing a case, the department shall provide a juvenile in
foster care who reaches eighteen (18) years of age or before leaving foster
care, whichever is later, his or her:
(1) Social Security card;
(2) Certified birth certificate or verification of birth record,
if available or if it should have been available to the department;
(3) Family photos in the possession of the department;
(4)(A) All of the juvenile's health records for the time the
juvenile was in foster care and other medical records that were available or
should have been available to the department.
(B) A juvenile who reaches eighteen (18) years of age and
remains in foster care shall not be prevented from requesting that his or her
health records remain private;
(5) All of the juvenile's educational records for the time the
juvenile was in foster care and any other educational records that were
available or should have been available to the department; and
(6) Driver's license or a state-issued official identification
card.
145 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(g) Within thirty (30) days after the juvenile leaves foster care, the
department shall provide the juvenile a full accounting of all funds held by
the department to which he or she is entitled, information on how to access
the funds, and when the funds will be available.
(h) The department shall not request a circuit court to close a
family-in-need-of-services case or dependency-neglect case involving a
juvenile in foster care until the department complies with this section.
(i) The department shall provide notice to the juvenile and his or her
attorney before a hearing in which the department or another party requests a
court to close the case is held.
(j) A circuit court shall continue jurisdiction over a juvenile who
has reached eighteen (18) years of age to ensure compliance with § 9-28-114.
(k) This section does not limit the discretion of a circuit court to
continue jurisdiction for other reasons as provided for by law.

9-27-364. Division of Youth Services aftercare.
(a)(1) After an adjudication of delinquency and upon commitment to the
Division of Youth Services, the court may order compliance with a division
aftercare plan upon a juvenile's release from the division, if recommended as
part of the treatment plan submitted to the court.
(2) The division or its designee shall provide the terms and
conditions of the aftercare plan in writing to the juvenile before the
juvenile's release from the division.
(3) The division or its designee shall provide the aftercare
terms and conditions to the juvenile's attorney and the juvenile's legal
parent, guardian, or custodian by the division or its designee, the
prosecutor, and the committing court before the juvenile's release from the
division.
(4) The division or its designee shall explain the terms of the
aftercare plan to the juvenile and his or her legal parent, guardian, or
custodian before the juvenile's release from the division.
(b)(1) Any violation of an aftercare term may be reported to the
prosecuting attorney, who may initiate a petition in the committing court for
violation of the aftercare plan.
(2) The Department of Human Services may also initiate a
petition for a violation with the committing court.
146 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(c) The petition shall contain specific factual allegations
constituting each violation of the aftercare plan and shall be served upon
the juvenile, his or her attorney, his or her parent, guardian, or custodian,
and the prosecuting attorney if filed by the department.
(d) A hearing shall be set within a reasonable time after the filing
of the petition or within fourteen (14) days if the juvenile has been
detained as a result of the filing of the petition for the aftercare
violation.
(e) If the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that the
juvenile violated the terms of the aftercare plan, the court may:
(1) Extend the terms of the aftercare plan, if requested by the
division;
(2) Impose additional conditions to the aftercare plan, if
requested by the division; or
(3) Make any disposition that could have been made at the time
commitment was ordered under § 9-27-330.

9-27-365. No reunification hearing.
(a)(1)(A) Any party can file a motion for no reunification services at
any time.
(B) The motion shall be provided to all parties in writing
at least twenty (20) days before a scheduled hearing.
(C) The court may conduct a hearing immediately following
or concurrent with an adjudication determination or at a separate hearing if
proper notice has been provided.
(2) The motion shall identify sufficient facts and grounds in
sufficient detail to put the defendant on notice as to the basis of the
motion for no reunification services.
(3)(A) A response is not required.
(B) If a party responds, the time for response shall not
be later than ten (10) days after receipt of the motion.
(b)(1) The court shall conduct and complete a no reunification hearing
within fifty (50) days of the date of written notice to the defendants and
shall enter an order determining whether or not reunification services shall
be provided.
(2) Upon good cause shown, the hearing may be continued for an
147 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
additional twenty (20) days.
(c) An order terminating reunification services on a party and ending
the duty of the Department of Human Services to provide services to a party
shall be based on a finding of clear and convincing evidence that:
(1) The termination of reunification services is in the child's
best interest; and
(2) One (1) or more of the following grounds exist:
(A) A circuit court has determined that the parent,
guardian, custodian, or noncustodial parent has subjected the child to
aggravated circumstances that include:
(i) A child's being abandoned;
(ii) A child's being chronically abused;
(iii) A child's being sexually exploited;
(iv) A child's being subjected to extreme or repeated
cruelty or sexual abuse;
(v) A determination by a circuit judge that there is
little likelihood that services to the family will result in successful
reunification;
(vi) A child has been removed from the custody of the
parent or guardian and placed in foster care or the custody of another person
three (3) or more times in the past fifteen (15) months; or
(vii) A child's or a sibling's being neglected or
abused such that the abuse or neglect could endanger the life of the child;
or
(B) A circuit court has determined that the parent has:
(i) Committed murder of a child;
(ii) Committed manslaughter of a child;
(iii) Aided or abetted, attempted, conspired, or
solicited to commit murder or manslaughter;
(iv) Committed a felony battery that results in
serious bodily injury to any child;
(v) Had parental rights involuntarily terminated as
to a sibling of the child; or
(vi) Abandoned an infant as defined in § 9-27-303(1).
(d) Upon a determination that no reunification services shall be
provided, the court shall hold a permanency planning hearing within thirty
148 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(30) days unless permanency for the juvenile has been achieved through
guardianship, custody, or a petition for termination of parental rights has
been filed within thirty (30) days.
(e) A written order setting forth the court's findings of fact and law
shall be filed with the court, by the court, or by a party or party's
attorneys as designated by the court within thirty (30) days or before the
next hearing, whichever is sooner.

9-27-366. Confessions.
In determining whether a juvenile's confession was voluntarily,
knowingly, and intelligently made, the court shall consider all circumstances
surrounding the confession, including without limitation the following:
(1) The juvenile's physical, mental, and emotional maturity;
(2) Whether the juvenile understood the consequences of the
confession;
(3) In cases in which the custodial parent, guardian, or
custodian agreed to the interrogation that led to the confession, whether the
custodial parent, guardian, or custodian understood the consequences of the
confession or has an interest in the matter that is adverse to the juvenile;
(4) Whether the juvenile and his or her custodial parent,
guardian, or custodian were informed of the alleged delinquent act;
(5) Whether the confession was the result of any coercion,
force, or inducement;
(6) Whether the juvenile and his or her custodial parent,
guardian, or custodian had waived the right to counsel or been provided
counsel; and
(7) Whether any of the following occurred:
(A) The oral, written, or sign language confession was
electronically recorded in its entirety;
(B) The entire interrogation was electronically recorded;
(C) The audio or video recordings of the interrogation, if
available, were used; and
(D) All of the voices on the recording are identified and
the names of all persons present during the interrogation are identified.

9-27-367. Court costs, fees, and fines.
149 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(a) The juvenile division of the circuit court may order the following
court costs, fees, and fines to be paid by adjudicated defendants to the
circuit court juvenile division fund as provided for in § 16-13-326:
(1) The court may assess an adjudicated delinquent court costs
not to exceed thirty-five dollars ($35.00) as provided under § 9-27-
330(a)(6);
(2) The court may assess an adjudicated family in need of
services court costs not to exceed thirty-five dollars ($35.00) as provided
under § 9-27-332(a)(8);
(3) The court may order a probation fee for juveniles
adjudicated delinquent not to exceed twenty dollars ($20.00) per month as
provided under § 9-27-330(a)(5);
(4) The court may order a juvenile service fee for an
adjudicated family in need of services not to exceed twenty dollars ($20.00)
per month as provided under § 9-27-332(a)(9);
(5) The court may order a fine for adjudicated delinquents of
not more than five hundred dollars ($500) as provided under § 9-27-330(a)(8);
(6) The court may order a fine for an adjudicated family in need
of services of not more than five hundred dollars ($500) as provided under §
9-27-332(a)(7); and
(7) A juvenile intake or probation officer may charge a
diversion fee limited to no more than twenty dollars ($20.00) per month as
provided under § 9-27-323.
(b) The court shall direct that the juvenile division court costs and
fees be collected, maintained, and accounted for in the same manner as
juvenile probation and juvenile services fees as provided for in § 16-13-326.

9-27-368. Risk and needs assessments.
(a) The Administrative Office of the Courts shall work with the
circuit courts to implement a validated risk and needs assessment that shall
be provided to the juvenile divisions of the circuit courts to be used at
delinquency disposition hearings and to aid in juvenile treatment plans.
(b) A juvenile division circuit court judge shall have the discretion
to designate either a trained juvenile intake or probation officer to conduct
the validated risk and needs assessment in the court of the circuit court
judge.
150 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(c)(1) The juvenile intake or probation officer conducting the risk
and needs assessment shall interview the juvenile and the juvenile's parent,
guardian, or custodian.
(2) Information gathered by the juvenile intake or probation
officer during the intake process implemented to complete the risk and needs
assessment shall be confidential and shall not be used against the juvenile
in the delinquency proceeding.
(3) The juvenile intake or probation officer conducting the risk
and needs assessment shall not discuss any offense for which the juvenile is
currently charged during the intake assessment.
(d) A risk and needs assessment prepared for a delinquency disposition
hearing shall be provided to the necessary parties seven (7) days in advance
and presented to the court at the disposition hearing.
(e)(1) The court may order an updated risk and needs assessment that
should be updated when there are significant changes in the juvenile's
treatment plan.
(2) Any revisions or updates to the risk and needs assessment
shall be provided to the necessary parties seven (7) days in advance of a
court hearing in the delinquency proceeding.
(f) Juvenile risk and needs assessments may be provided to the
Division of Youth Services personnel, service providers, and other necessary
persons designated by the court to provide appropriate treatment and case
plan services.

9-27-369. Resumption of services.
(a) The Department of Human Services or an attorney ad litem may file
a motion to resume services for a parent whose parental rights were
previously terminated under this subchapter if:
(1) The child:
(A) Is currently in the custody of the department;
(B) Is not in an adoptive placement, a pre-adoptive
placement, or under another permanent placement and there is some evidence
that the juvenile is not likely to achieve permanency within a reasonable
period of time as viewed from the child's perspective; or
(C) Was previously adopted, appointed a permanent
guardian, or placed in the permanent custody of another individual and the
151 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
adoption, guardianship, or custodial placement was disrupted or otherwise
dissolved; and
(2)(A) The order terminating the parental rights of the parent
who is the subject of a motion filed under this section was entered at least
three (3) years before the date on which the motion to resume services was
filed.
(B) The three-year waiting period may be waived if it is
in the best interest of the child.
(b)(1) A motion filed under this section shall identify the parent for
whom services would resume.
(2) A parent shall not be named as a party to a motion filed
under this section.
(3) The petitioner shall serve the parent who is the subject of
a motion filed under this section with the motion.
(4) A parent who is the subject of a motion filed under this
section shall have the right to be heard at a hearing on the motion.
(c) When determining whether to grant or deny a motion filed under
this section, the court shall consider the:
(1) Efforts made by the department to achieve adoption or other
permanent placement for the child, including without limitation any barriers
preventing permanency from being achieved;
(2) Current status of the parent who is the subject of the
motion, including without limitation the extent to which the parent has
remedied any conditions that led to the termination of his or her parental
rights;
(3) Willingness of the parent who is the subject of the motion
to participate with the services offered; and
(4) Child's wishes regarding a resumption of contact,
visitation, or placement with the parent who is the subject of the motion.
(d)(1) A court may grant a motion filed under this section if it finds
by a preponderance of the evidence that it is in the best interest of the
child to resume services and establish appropriate contact or family time
between the child and the parent or placement of the child with the parent.
(2) If the court grants a motion filed under this section, the
court:
(A)(i) May order family services for the purposes of
152 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
assisting reunification between the child and a fit parent who is the subject
of the motion.
(ii) The court may order the parent to pay for some
or all of the costs associated with court-ordered family services;
(B)(i) May order studies, evaluations, home studies, or
post-disposition reports.
(ii) A written home study on the parent who is the
subject of the motion shall be submitted to the court before the court may
order unsupervised visitation or placement of the juvenile with the parent.
(iii) If a study, evaluation, or home study is
performed before a hearing on a motion filed under subsection (a) of this
section, the results of the study, evaluation, or home study shall be served
on the parent, attorney ad litem, court-appointed special advocate, and any
other party to the motion at least two (2) business days before the hearing;
and
(C) Shall schedule a review hearing every ninety (90) days
until the court:
(i) Finds that it is not in the best interest of the
child to have contact, family time, or placement with the parent;
(ii) Enters an order reinstating the rights of the
parent under § 9-27-370; or
(iii) No longer has jurisdiction over the case.
(3) A staffing shall be held and a case plan developed within
thirty (30) days of the date on which the order granting a motion for
resumption of services under this section is entered.
(e) A court may deny a motion filed under this section if the court
finds by a preponderance of the evidence that the parent who is the subject
of the motion engaged in conduct that interfered with the child's ability to
achieve permanency.
(f) The written order of the court shall be filed by the court, a
party, or the attorney of a party as designated by the court and distributed
to the parties within thirty (30) days of the date of the hearing on the
motion to resume services or before the next hearing, whichever is sooner.

9-27-370. Reinstatement of parental rights.
(a) The Department of Human Services or an attorney ad litem may file
153 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
a petition to reinstate the parental rights of a parent whose parental rights
have been terminated under this subchapter if the:
(1) Court has granted a motion to resume services under § 9-27-
369;
(2) Services have continued for at least one hundred eighty
(180) days following the date on which the court entered the order granting a
motion to resume services under § 9-27-369; and
(3) Parent for whom reinstatement of parental rights is sought
has substantially complied with the orders of the court and with the case
plan developed under § 9-27-369.
(b) A petition to reinstate parental rights shall be filed in the
circuit court that had jurisdiction over the petition to terminate the
parental rights of the parent who is the subject of the petition to reinstate
parental rights.
(c) A petition filed under this section shall be served on the:
(1) Attorney ad litem;
(2) Department;
(3) Parent who is the subject of the petition;
(4) Court Appointed Special Advocate Program Director, if
applicable; and
(5) Child's tribe, if applicable.
(d) At least seven (7) business days before a hearing on a petition
filed under this section, the department shall provide the parent, parent's
counsel, attorney ad litem, court-appointed special advocate, and any other
party to the petition with a written report that includes information on:
(1) The efforts made by the department to achieve adoption or
another permanent placement for the child, including without limitation any
barriers to the adoption or permanent placement of the child;
(2) The extent to which the parent who is the subject of the
petition has complied with the case plan and orders of the court as of the
date on which services were ordered to be resumed under § 9-27-369;
(3) The impact of the resumed services on the parent and on the
health, safety, and well-being of the child; and
(4) Any recommendations of the department.
(e) Parental rights may be reinstated under this section if the court
finds by clear and convincing evidence that:
154 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(1) Reinstatement of parental rights is in the best interest of
the child; and
(2) There has been a material change in circumstances as to the
parent who is the subject of the petition since the date on which the order
terminating the parental rights of the parent was entered.
(f) The court shall consider the following factors when determining
whether a reinstatement of parental rights is in the best interest of the
child:
(1) The likelihood of the child achieving permanency through
adoption or another permanent placement;
(2) The age, maturity, and preference of the child concerning
the reinstatement of parental rights;
(3) The parent's fitness and whether the parent has remedied the
conditions that existed at the time of the termination of his or her parental
rights; and
(4) The effect that the reinstatement of parental rights would
have on the health, safety, and well-being of the child.
(g) A court may deny a petition filed under this section if the court
finds by a preponderance of the evidence that the parent engaged in conduct
that interfered with the child's ability to achieve permanency.
(h) An order reinstating the parental rights of the parent who is the
subject of a petition filed under this section restores all rights, powers,
privileges, immunities, duties, and obligations of the parent as to the
child, including without limitation custody, control, and support of the
child.
(i) If the child is placed with a parent whose parental rights are
reinstated under this section, the court shall not close the case until the
child has resided with the parent for no less than six (6) months.
(j) A written order shall be filed by the court, a party, or the
attorney of a party as designated by the court within thirty (30) days of the
date of the hearing on the motion to reinstate parental rights or before the
next hearing, whichever is sooner.
(k) An order reinstating parental rights under this section does not:
(1) Vacate or affect the validity of a previous order
terminating the parental rights of the parent who is the subject of the
petition; and
155 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(2) Restore or impact the rights of a parent who is not the
subject of a petition filed under this section.
(l) This section is retroactive and applies to a child who is under
the jurisdiction of a court at the time of a hearing on a petition to
terminate parental rights, regardless of the date on which parental rights
were terminated by court order.

9-27-371. Punitive isolation or solitary confinement of juveniles —
Definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) “Punitive isolation” means the placement of a juvenile in a
location that is separate from the general population as a punishment; and
(2) “Solitary confinement” means the isolation of a juvenile in
a cell separate from the general population as a punishment.
(b) Subject to subsection (c) of this section, a juvenile who has been
placed or detained in a juvenile detention facility shall not be placed in
punitive isolation or solitary confinement as a disciplinary measure for more
than twenty-four (24) hours unless the:
(1) Placement of the juvenile in punitive isolation or solitary
confinement is due to:
(A) A physical or sexual assault committed by the juvenile
while in the juvenile detention facility;
(B) Conduct of the juvenile that poses an imminent threat
of harm to the safety or well-being of the juvenile, the staff, or other
juveniles in the juvenile detention facility; or
(C) The juvenile's escaping or attempting to escape from
the juvenile detention facility; and
(2)(A) Director of the juvenile detention facility provides
written authorization to place the juvenile in punitive isolation or solitary
confinement for more than twenty-four (24) hours.
(B) The director of the juvenile detention facility shall
provide the written authorization described in subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this
section for every twenty-four-hour period during which the juvenile remains
in punitive isolation or solitary confinement after the initial twenty-four
(24) hours.
(c)(1) A juvenile who has been placed or detained in a juvenile
156 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
detention facility shall not be placed in solitary confinement if the
juvenile:
(A) Is pregnant;
(B) Has delivered a child prior to or within thirty (30)
days of being detained;
(C) Is breastfeeding;
(D) Is suffering from postpartum depression or another
medically verifiable postpartum condition; or
(E) Is caring for a child in a juvenile detention
facility.
(2) This subsection does not apply if:
(A) The juvenile has engaged in an act of violence while
incarcerated or detained that either resulted in or was likely to result in
serious physical injury or death to another person; or
(B) There is reasonable cause to believe that the use of
solitary confinement is necessary to reduce a substantial risk of imminent
serious physical injury or death to another person, as evidenced by the
juvenile's recent conduct while incarcerated or detained.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 3-3-203(f), concerning purchase or
possession of intoxicating liquor, wine, or beer by a person under eighteen
(18) years of age, is amended to read as follows:
(f) A person under eighteen (18) years of age who violates this
section is subject to the Arkansas Juvenile Code of 1989, § 9-27-301 et seq.
Arkansas Juvenile Code, § 9-35-101 et seq.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 5-26-502(a)(3) and (4), concerning unlawful
transfer of care or supervision of a juvenile by a person who was awarded
custody or granted adoption of the juvenile in a dependency-neglect case, are
amended to read as follows:
(3)(A) Has been awarded custody or granted an adoption or
guardianship of a juvenile pursuant to or arising out of a dependency-neglect
action pursuant to under the Arkansas Juvenile Code of 1989, § 9-27-301 et
seq. Arkansas Juvenile Code, § 9-35-101 et seq., and subsequently places the
juvenile in the care or supervision of any person:
(i) From whom the juvenile was removed; or
157 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(ii) The court has specifically ordered not to have
care, supervision, or custody of the juvenile.
(B) Subdivision (a)(3)(A) of this section shall not be
construed to prohibit a placement described in subdivision (a)(3)(A) of this
section if the person who has been granted custody, adoption, or guardianship
obtains a court order to that effect from the juvenile division of circuit
court that made the award of custody, adoption, or guardianship; or
(4) Accepts or acquiesces in taking physical custody for any
length of time of a juvenile who was removed from the person or if the court
has specifically ordered that the person not have care, supervision, or
custody of the juvenile pursuant to or arising out of a dependency-neglect
action pursuant to under the Arkansas Juvenile Code of 1989, § 9-27-301 et
seq. Arkansas Juvenile Code, § 9-35-101 et seq.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 5-26-502(e)(1), concerning requirements for
providing notice when the Arkansas Juvenile Code of 1989, § 9-27-301 et seq.,
is implicated in an alleged interference with custody offense, is amended to
read as follows:
(e)(1) A petitioner shall comply with the requirements of § 9-27-312
§§ 9-35-207, 9-35-307, and 9-35-408 with regard to the giving of a for
providing notice and of the filing of a petition and the setting of a hearing
on a petition.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 5-26-503(e)(1), concerning requirements for
providing notice when the Arkansas Juvenile Code of 1989, § 9-27-301 et seq.,
is implicated in an alleged interference with custody offense, is amended to
read as follows:
(e)(1) The department shall comply with the requirements of § 9-27-312
§§ 9-35-207, 9-35-307, and 9-35-408 with regard to the giving of a for
providing notice and of the filing of a petition and the setting of a hearing
on a petition filed under subsection (d) of this section.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 5-27-220(a), concerning contributing to the
delinquency of a minor or causing a minor to be considered a juvenile in need
of supervision under the Arkansas Juvenile Code of 1989, § 9-27-301 et seq.,
is amended to read as follows:
158 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(a) A person is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor if the person
willfully causes, aids, or encourages any minor to do or perform any act
which, if done or performed, would make the minor a delinquent juvenile or
juvenile in need of supervision within the meaning of this section and the
Arkansas Juvenile Code of 1989, § 9-27-301 et seq. Arkansas Juvenile Code, §
9-35-101 et seq.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 5-64-710(c)(2), concerning dispositions
available when a minor whose driving privileges may be revoked is a juvenile
adjudicated delinquent under the Arkansas Juvenile Code of 1989, § 9-27-301
et seq., is amended to read as follows:
(2) A juvenile adjudicated delinquent is subject to a juvenile
disposition provided in under § 9-27-330 § 9-35-423.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 5-64-710(e), concerning denial of driving
privileges to a minor when the minor is adjudicated delinquent under the
Arkansas Juvenile Code of 1989, § 9-27-301 et seq. for a drug offense or
driving or boating while intoxicated, is amended to read as follows:
(e) If a juvenile is found delinquent for any offense described in
subsection (a) or subsection (b) of this section, the circuit court may order
any juvenile disposition available under § 9-27-330 § 9-35-423.

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code § 5-65-402(a)(1)(C), concerning when an
arresting officer may issue a juvenile a citation to appear for a juvenile
intake with a juvenile intake officer for purchase or possession of
intoxicating beer, liquor, or wine or for attempting to purchase intoxicating
beer, liquor, or wine with a fraudulent or altered personal identification
document, is amended to read as follows:
(C)(i) If a juvenile, as defined in the Arkansas Juvenile
Code of 1989, § 9-27-301 et seq. Arkansas Juvenile Code, § 9-35-101 et seq.,
is arrested for violating § 3-3-203(a) or § 5-27-503(a)(3), the arresting
officer shall issue the juvenile a citation to appear for a juvenile intake
with a juvenile intake officer.
(ii) The arresting officer shall forward a copy of
the citation and the license, permit, or other evidence of the driving
privilege to the juvenile office before the scheduled juvenile intake.
159 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(iii) Juveniles subject to the jurisdiction of the
circuit court under the Arkansas Juvenile Code of 1989, § 9-27-301 et seq.
Arkansas Juvenile Code, § 9-35-101 et seq., shall not be subject to this
section, except as provided in this subdivision (a)(1).

SECTION 11. Arkansas Code § 5-65-402(h), concerning when the surrender
of a person's license, permit, or other evidence of driving privilege to an
arresting law enforcement officer does not apply to a juvenile, is amended to
read as follows:
(h) Except as provided in subsection (a) of this section, this section
shall not apply to juveniles subject to the Arkansas Juvenile Code of 1989, §
9-27-301 et seq. Arkansas Juvenile Code, § 9-35-101 et seq.

SECTION 12. Arkansas Code § 6-10-134(f), concerning when records of
the arrest of, detention of, investigation of, or proceedings involving a
minor are subject to disclosure, is amended to read as follows:
(f) Records of the arrest of, the detention of, investigation of, or
proceedings involving a minor are confidential and are not subject to
disclosure under the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq.,
unless:
(1) Authorized by a written order of the juvenile division of
circuit court;
(2) The arrest or the proceedings result in the minor being
formally charged in the criminal division of circuit court for a felony; or
(3) As allowed under this section or § 9-27-320 § 9-35-414.

SECTION 13. Arkansas Code § 6-18-222(a)(6)(A)(i), concerning when a
family in need of services petition may be filed or a diversion agreement
entered regarding a student with unexcused absences, is amended to read as
follows:
(6)(A)(i) Upon notification by the school district or the adult
education program to the prosecuting authority, the prosecuting authority
shall file in circuit court a family in need of services petition pursuant to
under § 9-27-310 § 9-35-205 or enter into a diversion agreement with the
student pursuant to under § 9-27-323 § 9-35-209.

160 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
SECTION 14. Arkansas Code § 6-20-104(a)(2), concerning when a juvenile
detention facility shall provide educational and other rehabilitative
services to juveniles who are adjudicated delinquent, is amended to read as
follows:
(2) Under § 9-27-330(a)(11) § 9-35-423(a)(11), such juvenile
detention facility must shall provide educational and other rehabilitative
services to adjudicated delinquents juveniles who are adjudicated delinquent
and who may be ordered by the court to remain in the juvenile detention
facility for an indeterminate period not to exceed ninety (90) days.

SECTION 15. Arkansas Code § 9-9-202(2), concerning the definition of
"court" under the Revised Uniform Adoption Act, § 9-9-201 et seq., is amended
to read as follows:
(2) “Court” means all probate divisions of circuit courts in
this state, or the juvenile divisions of circuit courts when exercising
jurisdiction over adoption cases pursuant to §§ 9-27-301 — 9-27-339, 9-27-340
[repealed], and 9-27-341 — 9-27-345 the Arkansas Juvenile Code, § 9-35-101 et
seq., and, when the context requires, means the court of any other state
empowered to grant petitions for adoption;

SECTION 16. Arkansas Code § 9-9-205(a)(3)(A), concerning jurisdiction
of an adoption when the juvenile is the subject matter of an open case under
the Arkansas Juvenile Code of 1989, § 9-27-301 et seq., is amended to read as
follows:
(3)(A) If the juvenile is the subject matter of an open case
filed under the Arkansas Juvenile Code of 1989, § 9-27-301 et seq. Arkansas
Juvenile Code, § 9-35-101 et seq., the adoption petition shall be filed in
that case.

SECTION 17. Arkansas Code § 9-9-207(a), concerning when consent is not
required for adoption of a minor, is amended to read as follows:
(a) Consent to adoption is not required of:
(1) a parent who has deserted a child without affording means of
identification or who has abandoned a child;
(2) a parent of a child in the custody of another, if the parent
for a period of at least one (1) year has failed significantly without
161 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
justifiable cause (i) to communicate with the child or (ii) to provide for
the care and support of the child as required by law or judicial decree;
(3) the father of a minor if the father's consent is not
required by § 9-9-206(a)(2);
(4) a parent who has relinquished his or her right to consent
under § 9-9-220;
(5) a parent whose parental rights have been terminated by order
of court under § 9-9-220 or § 9-27-341 § 9-35-325;
(6) a parent judicially declared incompetent or mentally
defective if the court dispenses with the parent's consent;
(7) any parent of the individual to be adopted, if the
individual is an adult;
(8) any legal guardian or lawful custodian of the individual to
be adopted, other than a parent, who has failed to respond in writing to a
request for consent for a period of sixty (60) days or who, after examination
of his or her written reasons for withholding consent, is found by the court
to be withholding his or her consent unreasonably;
(9) the spouse of the individual to be adopted, if the failure
of the spouse to consent to the adoption is excused by the court by reason of
prolonged unexplained absence, unavailability, incapacity, or circumstances
constituting an unreasonable withholding of consent;
(10) a putative father of a minor who signed an acknowledgement
of paternity but who failed to establish a significant custodial, personal,
or financial relationship with the juvenile prior to the time the petition
for adoption is filed; or
(11) a putative father of a minor who is listed on the Putative
Father Registry but who failed to establish a significant custodial,
personal, or financial relationship with the juvenile prior to the time the
petition for adoption is filed.

SECTION 18. Arkansas Code § 9-9-212(f), concerning notification of
adoption proceedings for a minor when one (1) parent of a child is deceased
and the parent-child relationship was not eliminated at the time of the
parent's death, is amended to read as follows:
(f) When one (1) parent of a child or children is deceased, and the
parent-child relationship has not been eliminated at the time of death, and
162 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
adoption proceedings are instituted subsequent to such decease, the parents
of the deceased parent shall be notified under the procedures prescribed in
this subchapter of such adoption proceedings, except when the surviving
parent-child relationship has been terminated pursuant to § 9-27-341 § 9-35-
325.

SECTION 19. Arkansas Code § 9-9-217(a)(1)(B), concerning when a member
of the General Assembly may attend an adoption hearing held under the
Arkansas Juvenile Code of 1989, § 9-27-301 et seq., is amended to read as
follows:
(B)(i) A member of the General Assembly may attend an
adoption hearing related to a juvenile case that is held under the Arkansas
Juvenile Code of 1989, § 9-27-301 et seq. Arkansas Juvenile Code, § 9-35-101
et seq., unless the court excludes the member of the General Assembly based
on the:
(a) Best interest of the child; or
(b) Court's authority under the Arkansas Rules
of Civil Procedure or the Arkansas Rules of Evidence.

SECTION 20. Arkansas Code § 9-9-217(a)(1)(C)(i)(a), concerning when a
Child Welfare Ombudsman may attend an adoption hearing held under the
Arkansas Juvenile Code of 1989, § 9-27-301 et seq., is amended to read as
follows:
(C)(i)(a) A Child Welfare Ombudsman may attend an adoption
hearing related to a juvenile case under the Arkansas Juvenile Code of 1989,
§ 9-27-301 et seq. Arkansas Juvenile Code, § 9-35-101 et seq.

SECTION 21. Arkansas Code § 9-9-217(a)(2)(B)(i), concerning the
confidentiality of adoption hearings and records when an adoption is heard or
filed under the Arkansas Juvenile Code of 1989, § 9-27-301 et seq., is
amended to read as follows:
(B)(i) When an adoption is filed or heard pursuant to the
Arkansas Juvenile Code of 1989, § 9-27-301 et seq. Arkansas Juvenile Code, §
9-35-101 et seq., any portion of the court file relating to the adoption
shall be maintained separately from the file of other pending juvenile
matters concerning the juvenile who is the subject of the adoption or the
163 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
family of the juvenile.

SECTION 22. Arkansas Code § 9-9-407(d), concerning when a family is
eligible for an adoption subsidy for a child in foster care, is amended to
read as follows:
(d) State-funded subsidies may be available, as determined by the
department, for an adult who:
(1) Is in foster care at eighteen (18) years of age;
(2) Participates in an extended foster care program under § 9-
27-306 or § 9-28-114 § 9-35-302; and
(3) Is not Title IV-E eligible.

SECTION 23. Arkansas Code § 9-10-102(h)(1), concerning jurisdiction
over a paternity hearing when an interested person is a parent or putative
father as defined under the Arkansas Juvenile Code of 1989, § 9-27-301 et
seq., is amended to read as follows:
(h)(1) If the child or children at issue are subjects of an open
dependency-neglect action filed under the Arkansas Juvenile Code of 1989, §
9-27-301 et seq. Arkansas Juvenile Code, § 9-35-101 et seq., the
determination or disestablishment of paternity shall be addressed in that
suit with a determination to be made as to whether the interested person is a
parent or a putative father as defined in § 9-27-303 § 9-35-102.

SECTION 24. Arkansas Code § 9-13-103(i), concerning when provisions of
law related to grandparent visitation are not applicable to a certain child,
is amended to read as follows:
(i) This section does not apply to dependency-neglect proceedings
conducted under the Arkansas Juvenile Code of 1989, § 9-27-301 et seq.
Arkansas Juvenile Code, § 9-35-101 et seq.

SECTION 25. Arkansas Code § 9-27-401(b)(5)(A)(i), concerning appointed
counsel for a parent in a dependency-neglect proceeding, is amended to read
as follows:
(5)(A)(i) In the transition to a state-funded system of
dependency-neglect representation, it is the intent of the General Assembly
to provide an appropriate and adequate level of representation to all
164 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
children in dependency-neglect proceedings as required under federal and
state law pursuant to under § 9-27-316 § 9-35-208.

SECTION 26. Arkansas Code § 9-27-505(g)(2), concerning when
alternative dispositions apply to a juvenile who is adjudicated delinquent
when the offense would not have subjected him or her to extended juvenile
jurisdiction adjudication, is amended to read as follows:
(2) If the juvenile is adjudicated delinquent for an offense
that would not have subjected him or her to extended juvenile jurisdiction,
the court shall enter any of the dispositions available under § 9-27-330 § 9-
35-423.

SECTION 27. Arkansas Code § 9-27-506 is amended to read as follows:
9-27-506. Extended juvenile jurisdiction disposition hearing.
If a juvenile is found delinquent as an extended juvenile jurisdiction
offender, the circuit court shall enter the following dispositions:
(1) Order any of the juvenile dispositions authorized by § 9-27-
330 § 9-35-423; and
(2) Suspend the imposition of an adult sentence pending court
review.

SECTION 28. Arkansas Code § 9-27-507(b), concerning when a circuit
court may amend a juvenile disposition or impose an adult sentence in an
extended juvenile jurisdiction review hearing, is amended to read as follows:
(b) If the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that the
juvenile has violated a juvenile disposition order, has been found delinquent
or guilty of committing a new offense, or is not amenable to rehabilitation
in the juvenile system, the court may:
(1) Amend or add any juvenile disposition authorized by § 9-27-
330 § 9-35-423; or
(2)(A)(i) Exercise its discretion to impose the full range of
adult sentencing available in the criminal division of circuit court,
including probation, suspended imposition of sentence, and imprisonment.
(ii) However, a sentence of imprisonment shall not
exceed forty (40) years except for juveniles adjudicated for capital murder,
§ 5-10-101, and murder in the first degree, § 5-10-102, who may be sentenced
165 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
for any term, up to and including life.
(B) Statutory provisions prohibiting or limiting probation
or suspended imposition of sentence, parole, or post-release transfer for
offenses when committed by an adult shall not apply to juveniles sentenced as
extended juvenile jurisdiction offenders.
(C) A juvenile shall receive credit for time served in a
juvenile detention facility or any juvenile facility.
(D)(i) A court may not order an absolute release of an
extended juvenile jurisdiction offender who has been adjudicated delinquent
for capital murder, § 5-10-101, or murder in the first degree, § 5-10-102.
(ii) If release is ordered, the court shall impose a
period of probation for not less than three (3) years.

SECTION 29. Arkansas Code § 9-27-602(d)(2), concerning when a court
determines that a parent, guardian, or custodian of a juvenile can pay for
court-ordered mental health services, is amended to read as follows:
(2) If the court determines an ability to pay, the court shall
enter such an order for payment pursuant to under § 9-27-333(e) § 9-35-
213(e).

SECTION 30. Arkansas Code § 9-27-702 is amended to read as follows:
9-27-702. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter, “parent” means the same as under § 9-27-303
§ 9-35-102, and “parent” also includes a guardian as defined under § 9-27-303
§ 9-35-102 and a custodian as defined under § 9-27-303 § 9-35-102.

SECTION 31. Arkansas Code § 9-27-803(e)(1) and (2), concerning
services that may be ordered by a family treatment specialty court
supplemental to services provided by the Department of Human Services, are
amended to read as follows:
(e)(1) Services ordered by a family treatment specialty court
program shall be supplemental to the services provided by the Department of
Human Services, including without limitation:
(A) Cash assistance and family services authorized under §
9-27-303 § 9-35-102; and
(B) Other dispositions authorized under § 9-27-334 § 9-35-
166 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
320.
(2) A family treatment specialty court must shall comply with §
9-27-335 § 9-35-321 before ordering services.

SECTION 32. Arkansas Code § 9-27-805(b), concerning eligibility for
participation in a family treatment specialty court when the person is a
parent, guardian, custodian, or other caretaker of a juvenile found to be
dependent or dependent-neglected, is amended to read as follows:
(b) A person is eligible for participation in a family treatment
specialty court program if:
(1) The person is a parent, guardian, custodian, or other
caretaker of a juvenile found by the court to be dependent or dependent-
neglected; and
(2) The person agrees to comply with the policies and procedures
developed by the family treatment specialty court program, as well as the
Arkansas Juvenile Code of 1989, § 9-27-301 et seq. Arkansas Juvenile Code, §
9-35-101 et seq.

SECTION 33. Arkansas Code § 9-28-111 is amended to read as follows:
9-28-111. Case plans — Definition.
(a) The Department of Human Services shall be responsible for
developing case plans in all dependency-neglect cases and in family-in-need-
of-services cases when custody is transferred to the department under § 9-27-
328 § 9-35-318. The case plan shall be:
(1)(A) Developed in consultation with the juvenile's parent,
guardian, or custodian and, if appropriate, the juvenile, the juvenile's
foster parents, the court-appointed special advocate, the juvenile's attorney
ad litem, and all parties' attorneys.
(B) If the parents are unwilling or unable to participate
in the development of the case plan, the department shall document the
parents' unwillingness or inability to participate and provide a copy of the
written documentation to the parent, if available. The department shall then
prepare a case plan conforming as nearly as possible with the requirements
set forth in this section.
(C) A parent's incarceration, by itself, does not make a
parent unavailable to participate in the development of a case plan.
167 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(D)(i) The parent, guardian, or custodian and juvenile may
choose additional members to be part of the case planning team.
(ii) The department may reject a selected individual
for good cause;
(2)(A) Developed and filed with the court no later than thirty
(30) days after the date the petition was filed or the juvenile was first
placed out of home, whichever is sooner.
(B) If the department does not have sufficient information
before the adjudication hearing to complete all of the case plan, the
department shall complete those parts for which information is available.
(C) All parts of the case plan shall be completed and
filed with the court thirty (30) days after the adjudication hearing;
(3) Signed by and distributed to all parties and distributed to
the juvenile's attorney ad litem, court-appointed special advocate, and
foster parents, if available; and
(4)(A) Subject to modification based on changing circumstances.
(B) All parties to the case plan shall be notified of any
substantive change to the case plan.
(C) A substantive change to a case plan includes without
limitation a change in the placement of the juvenile, the family time rights
of any party, or the goal of the case plan.
(b) When a juvenile is receiving services in the home of the parent,
guardian, or custodian, the case plan shall include the requirements listed
in subsection (a) of this section and:
(1) A description of the problems being addressed;
(2) A description of the services to be provided to the family
and juvenile specifically addressing the identified problems and time frames
for providing services;
(3) A description of any reasonable accommodations made to
parents in accordance with the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, 42
U.S.C. § 12101 et seq., to assure to all the parents meaningful access to
reunification and family preservation services;
(4) The name of an individual who the petitioner, parent,
guardian, or custodian knows is claiming to be or who is named as the father
or possible father of the juvenile and whose paternity of the juvenile has
not been judicially determined; and
168 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(5) A description of how the health and safety of the juvenile
will be protected.
(c) When a juvenile is receiving services in an out-of-home placement,
the case plan must include the requirements in subsections (a) and (b) of
this section and:
(1)(A) A description of the permanency goal.
(B) If adoption is not the goal at the permanency planning
and fifteenth-month hearing, the department shall document in the case plan a
compelling reason why filing a petition to terminate parental rights is not
in the best interest of the juvenile;
(2) The specific reasons for the placement of the juvenile
outside the home, including a description of the problems or conditions in
the home of the parent, guardian, or custodian that required removal of the
juvenile and the remediation of which will determine the return of the
juvenile to the home;
(3) A description of the type of out-of-home placement selected
for the juvenile, including a discussion of the appropriateness of the
placement;
(4) A plan for addressing the needs of the juvenile while in the
placement, with emphasis on the health, safety, and well-being of the
juvenile, including a discussion of the services provided over the previous
six (6) months;
(5)(A) The specific actions to be taken by the parent, guardian,
or custodian of the juvenile to eliminate or correct the identified problems
or conditions and the time period during which the specific actions are to be
taken.
(B) The plan may include any person or agency who agrees
to be responsible for the provision of social and other family services to
the juvenile or the parent, guardian, or custodian of the juvenile;
(6) The family time rights and obligations of the parent,
guardian, or custodian and the state agency during the time period the
juvenile is in the out-of-home placement;
(7) The social and other family services to be provided to the
parent, guardian, or custodian of the juvenile, and foster parent, if any,
during the time period the juvenile is in placement and a timetable for
providing the services, the purposes of which are to promote a continuous and
169 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
stable living environment for the juvenile, promote family autonomy,
strengthen family life when possible, and promote the reunification of the
juvenile with the parent, guardian, or custodian;
(8) To the extent available and accessible, the health and
education records of the juvenile, under 42 U.S.C. § 675(1);
(9) A description of the financial support obligation to the
juvenile, including health insurance of the parent, parents, or guardian of
the juvenile;
(10)(A) A description of the location of siblings;
(B) Documentation of the efforts made to place siblings
removed from their home in the same placement, unless the department
documents that a joint placement would be contrary to the safety or well-
being of any of the siblings; and
(C) Documentation of the efforts made to provide for
frequent family time or other ongoing interaction between the siblings in the
case of siblings removed from their home who are not placed together, unless
the department documents that frequent family time or other ongoing
interaction would be contrary to the safety or well-being of any of the
siblings;
(11) When appropriate for a juvenile sixteen (16) years of age
and over, the case plan shall include a written description of the programs
and services that will help the juvenile prepare for the transition from
foster care to independent living;
(12) A written notice to the parent or parents that failure of
the parent or parents to substantially comply with the case plan may result
in the termination of parental rights and that a material failure to
substantially comply may result in the filing of a petition for termination
of parental rights sooner than the compliance periods stated in the case
plan;
(13)(A) A plan for ensuring the placement of the child in foster
care that takes into account the appropriateness of the current educational
setting and the proximity of the school in which the child is enrolled at the
time of placement, as required under § 9-27-103 [repealed]; and
(B)(i) An assurance that the department has coordinated
with appropriate local educational agencies to ensure that the child remains
at the school where the child is enrolled at the time of placement; or
170 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(ii) If remaining at the school is not in the best
interest of the child, assurances by the department and the local educational
agencies to provide immediate and appropriate enrollment in a new school,
with all of the educational records of the child provided to the new school;
and
(C)(i) An assurance that each child who has attained the
minimum age for compulsory school attendance is a full-time elementary or
secondary school student or has completed secondary school.
(ii) For purposes of this section, “elementary or
secondary school student” means, with respect to a child, that the child is:
(a) Enrolled, or in the process of enrolling,
in a public elementary or secondary school;
(b) Home schooled under § 6-15-501 et seq.;
(c) Enrolled in a private elementary or
secondary school; or
(d) Incapable of attending school on a full-
time basis due to the medical condition of the child, and the medical
condition incapability is supported by regularly updated information in the
case plan;
(14) The department, in conjunction with other representatives of
the juvenile, shall provide the juvenile with assistance and support in
developing a transition plan that is personalized at the direction of the
juvenile and includes specific options on housing, health insurance,
educational opportunities, local opportunities for mentors and continuing
support services, and workforce supports and employment services, and is as
detailed as the juvenile may elect as required under § 9-27-363 § 9-35-334;
and
(15) When a juvenile is fourteen (14) years of age or older, the
juvenile shall be provided a:
(A) Separate document that describes:
(i) The rights of the juvenile concerning education,
health, visitation, and court participation;
(ii) The right to obtain a copy of a credit report
each year the juvenile remains in the custody of the department at no cost to
the juvenile; and
(iii) The right of the juvenile to receive assistance
171 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
in interpreting and resolving inaccuracies in the credit report; and
(B) A signed acknowledgement by the juvenile that:
(i) The juvenile has been provided with a copy of
the document required under subdivision (c)(15)(A) of this section; and
(ii) The department explained the rights to the
juvenile in a developmentally appropriate and age-appropriate way.
(d) The case plan is subject to court review and approval.
(e) The participation of a parent, guardian, or custodian in the
development of a case plan or the acceptance of a case plan shall not
constitute an admission of dependency-neglect.

SECTION 34. Arkansas Code § 9-28-120(c)(1), concerning public
disclosure of information on child maltreatment and child deaths when the
child was in an out-of-home placement as defined under § 9-27-303(40), is
amended to read as follows:
(c)(1) Upon request, the department shall release the following
information when a child dies if that child was in an out-of-home placement
as defined under § 9-27-303(40) § 9-35-102(41):
(A) Age, race, and gender of the child;
(B) Date of the child's death;
(C) Preliminary cause of death;
(D) County and type of placement of the child at the time
of the incident; and
(E) Action by the department.

SECTION 35. Arkansas Code § 9-28-203(b), concerning services provided
by the Division of Youth Services, is amended to read as follows:
(b) In addition to other duties enumerated in this subchapter, the
Division of Youth Services shall provide services as follows:
(1) The Civilian Student Training Program shall provide services
to youths that shall consist of, but not be limited to, school reintegration,
counseling, tutoring, job placement counseling, corrective behavior skill
counseling, and training;
(2)(A) Case management services shall include, but not be
limited to:
(i) Making placement recommendations to court
172 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
authorities; and
(ii) Arrangement, coordination, and monitoring of
services for a juvenile.
(B) These services may be acquired by agreement with
community providers, other agencies, or individuals as necessary;
(3)(A) Client-specific services shall consist of, but not be
limited to:
(i) Independent living, tracker, or proctor
services;
(ii) Family or individual therapy; and
(iii) Individualized treatment or supportive care
services.
(B) These services may be acquired by agreement with
comprehensive community-based providers capable of delivering the required
continuum of services;
(4)(A) Reduction-in-commitment services shall include services
to address public safety, supervision, and rehabilitative needs of youths who
may otherwise be detained, incarcerated, or committed to the Division of
Youth Services.
(B) Reduction-in-commitment services may include without
limitation:
(i) Electronic monitoring;
(ii) Family or individual therapy;
(iii) Day treatment services;
(iv) Residential or outpatient mental health
counseling, sex offender counseling, or substance abuse counseling;
(v) Parenting classes for youths or custodians;
(vi) Respite care; and
(vii) Emergency shelter services.
(C) These services may be acquired by agreement with
comprehensive community-based providers capable of delivering the required
continuum of services.
(D) [Repealed.];
(5)(A) Serious offender programs for youths charged with violent
offenses shall consist of appropriate residential treatment programs at any
of the youth services centers or facilities.
173 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(B) Serious offender programs or community-based programs
may be acquired by agreements with entities or agencies deemed appropriate
and capable of providing such services;
(6) Less restrictive community-based programs selected by the
Director of the Division of Youth Services for youths not deemed at risk of
performing violent offenses;
(7)(A) Observation and assessment services shall consist of, but
not be limited to, those activities necessary to ensure appropriate
recommendations for intervention, services, and placement of low-risk and
medium-risk juveniles.
(B) Observation and assessment services may be acquired by
agreements with community providers or other agencies or individuals deemed
to have the appropriate level of expertise to perform observation and
assessment or diagnosis and evaluation.
(C)(i) The Division of Youth Services shall use validated
risk assessments for all juveniles committed to the Division of Youth
Services.
(ii) The Division of Youth Services shall provide
individualized treatment and placement decisions, with measureable goals and
regular reassessments, based on the results of an initial assessment and the
risk level assigned to the juvenile by the validated risk assessment used in
the court's commitment decision under § 9-27-330(a)(1)(B) § 9-35-
423(a)(1)(B);
(8)(A) Residential observation and assessment services shall
consist of, but not be limited to, those activities necessary to ensure
appropriate recommendations for intervention, services, and placement of
high-risk juveniles.
(B) Residential observation and assessment services may be
performed by or at appropriate state-operated facilities or by agreement with
appropriate agencies or individuals deemed to have the appropriate level of
expertise to perform residential observation and assessment or diagnosis and
evaluation.
(C)(i) The Division of Youth Services shall use validated
risk assessments for all juveniles committed to the Division of Youth
Services.
(ii) The Division of Youth Services shall provide
174 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
individualized treatment and placement decisions, with measurable goals and
regular reassessments, based on the results of an initial assessment and the
risk level assigned to the juvenile by the validated risk assessment used in
the court's commitment decision under 9-27-330(a)(1)(B) § 9-35-423(a)(1)(B);
(9)(A)(i) Community-based alternative basic services shall
consist of, but not be limited to, prevention, intervention, casework,
treatment, counseling, observation and assessment, case management, and
residential services.
(ii) Community-based alternative basic services shall
be provided through a treatment model that is evidence-based, developmentally
appropriate, family-centered, strength-based, and trauma-informed.
(iii) Primary goals for community-based alternative
basic services shall be the prevention of youths from entering the juvenile
justice system and the provision of professional, community-based, least-cost
services to youths.
(B) These services may be acquired by agreements with
comprehensive community-based providers capable of delivering the required
continuum of services;
(10)(A) Expanded services may consist of, but not be limited to:
(i) Expansion of existing programs;
(ii) Specific programs for alcohol, drug, or sex
offenders;
(iii) Special therapeutic treatment programs or
client-specific services in which a consistent population has been defined as
in need of multidiscipline care and services;
(iv) Expansion of proven, effective, early
intervention and prevention program activities; and
(v) Restoration of previously proven effective
interventions that prevent incarceration.
(B) Utilization of funds appropriated for expanded
services shall be as directed by the director; and
(11) The Division of Youth Services shall provide monitoring and
technical assistance to review the quality and consistency of reforms to the
juvenile justice system.

SECTION 36. Arkansas Code § 9-28-208(b)(1), concerning entry of an
175 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
order of detention and commitment to a youth services center, is amended to
read as follows:
(b)(1) Upon entry of an order of detention and commitment to a youth
services center pursuant to under § 9-27-330 § 9-35-423 or § 9-27-509, a
court shall transmit to the Division of Youth Services:
(A) A copy of the commitment order;
(B) A copy of the validated risk assessment instrument;
and
(C) Records or information pertaining to the juvenile
compiled by the intake officer or juvenile probation officer that shall
include:
(i) Information on the juvenile's background,
history, behavioral tendencies, and family status;
(ii) The reasons for the juvenile's commitment;
(iii) The name of the school in which the juvenile is
currently or was last enrolled;
(iv) The juvenile's offense history;
(v) The juvenile's placement history;
(vi) A copy of all psychological or psychiatric
evaluations or examinations performed on the juvenile admitted into evidence
or ordered by the court while under the jurisdiction of the court or the
supervision of the court staff;
(vii) A comprehensive list of all current medications
taken by the juvenile; and
(viii) A comprehensive list of all medical treatment
currently being provided to the juvenile.

SECTION 37. Arkansas Code § 9-28-402(6), concerning the definition of
"child" under the Child Welfare Agency Licensing Act, § 9-28-401 et seq., is
amended to read as follows:
(6) “Child” means a person who is:
(A) From birth to eighteen (18) years of age; or
(B) Adjudicated dependent-neglected, dependent, or a
member of a family in need of services before eighteen (18) years of age and
for whom the juvenile division of a circuit court retains jurisdiction under
the Arkansas Juvenile Code of 1989, § 9-27-301 et seq. Arkansas Juvenile
176 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
Code, § 9-35-101 et seq.;

SECTION 38. Arkansas Code § 9-28-407(h)(1), concerning materials
compiled or received by a licensee or state agency in placing a child under
the Child Welfare Agency Licensing Act, § 9-28-401 et seq., is amended to
read as follows:
(h)(1) Reports, correspondence, memoranda, case histories, or other
materials, including protected health information, compiled or received by a
licensee or a state agency engaged in placing a child, including both foster
care and protective services records, shall be confidential and shall not be
released or otherwise made available except to the extent permitted by
federal law and only:
(A) To the Director of the Child Welfare Agency Review
Board as required by rule;
(B) For adoptive placements as provided by the Revised
Uniform Adoption Act, § 9-9-201 et seq.;
(C) To multidisciplinary teams under § 12-18-106(a);
(D)(i) To the child's parent, guardian, or custodian.
(ii) However, the licensee or state agency may redact
information from the record such as the name or address of foster parents or
providers when it is in the best interest of the child.
(iii) The licensee or state agency may redact
counseling records, psychological or psychiatric evaluations, examinations,
or records, drug screens or drug evaluations, or similar information
concerning a parent if the other parent is requesting a copy of a record;
(E) To the child;
(F)(i) To healthcare providers to assist in the care and
treatment of the child at the discretion of the licensee or state agency and
if deemed to be in the best interest of the child.
(ii) “Healthcare providers” includes doctors, nurses,
emergency medical technicians, counselors, therapists, mental health
professionals, and dentists;
(G) To school personnel and daycare centers caring for the
child at the discretion of the licensee or state agency and if deemed to be
in the best interest of the child;
(H)(i) To foster parents, the foster care record for
177 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
children in foster care currently placed in their home.
(ii) However, information about the parents or
guardians and any siblings not in the foster home shall not be redisclosed by
a foster parent and shall only be used to assist the foster parent in the
care of the child;
(I)(i) To the board.
(ii) However, at any board meeting no information
that identifies by name or address any protective services recipient or
foster care child shall be orally disclosed or released in written form to
the general public;
(J) To the Division of Child Care and Early Childhood
Education;
(K) For any audit or similar activity conducted in
connection with the administration of any such plan or program by any
governmental agency that is authorized by law to conduct the audit or
activity;
(L) Upon presentation of an order of appointment, to a
court-appointed special advocate;
(M) To the attorney ad litem for the child;
(N) For law enforcement or the prosecuting attorney upon
request;
(O) To circuit courts, as provided for in the Arkansas
Juvenile Code of 1989, § 9-27-301 et seq. Arkansas Juvenile Code, § 9-35-101
et seq.;
(P) In a criminal or civil proceeding conducted in
connection with the administration of any such plan or program;
(Q) For purposes directly connected with the
administration of any of the state plans as outlined at 42 U.S.C. §
671(a)(8), as in effect January 1, 2001;
(R) For the administration of any other federal or
federally assisted program that provides assistance, in cash or in kind, or
services, directly to individuals on the basis of need;
(S)(i) To individual federal and state representatives and
senators in their official capacity and their staff members with no
redisclosure of information.
(ii) No disclosure shall be made to any committee or
178 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
legislative body of any information that identifies by name or address any
recipient of services;
(T) To a grand jury or court upon a finding that
information in the record is necessary for the determination of an issue
before the court or grand jury;
(U) To a person, provider, or government entity identified
by the licensee or the state agency as having services needed by the child or
his or her family;
(V) To volunteers authorized by the licensee or the state
agency to provide support or services to the child or his or her family at
the discretion of the licensee or the state agency and only to the extent
information is needed to provide the support or services;
(W)(i) To a person, agency, or organization engaged in a
bona fide research or evaluation project that is determined by the Division
of Children and Family Services to have value for the evaluation or
development of policies and programs within the Division of Children and
Family Services.
(ii) Any confidential information provided by the
department for a research or evaluation project under this subdivision
(h)(1)(W) shall not be redisclosed or published;
(X) To a child fatality review panel as authorized by the
department;
(Y) To the Child Welfare Ombudsman; or
(Z)(i) To a currently or previously licensed foster
parent.
(ii) A foster parent shall only receive records:
(a) Concerning a child who was previously
placed in the home of the foster parent and that are relevant to the period
of time in which the child was placed in the home of the foster parent; and
(b) For which the foster parent has a
legitimate need as determined by the licensee or department.
(2) Foster home and adoptive home records are confidential and
shall not be released except:
(A) To the foster parents or adoptive parents;
(B) For purposes of review or audit, by the appropriate
federal or state agency;
179 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(C) Upon allegations of child maltreatment in the foster
home or adoptive home, to the investigating agency;
(D) To the board;
(E) To the Division of Children and Family Services and
the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education, including child welfare
agency licensing specialists;
(F) To law enforcement or the prosecuting attorney upon
request;
(G) To a grand jury or court upon a finding that
information in the record is necessary for the determination of an issue
before the court or grand jury;
(H)(i) To individual federal and state representatives and
senators in their official capacity and their staff members with no
redisclosure of information.
(ii) No disclosure shall be made to any committee or
legislative body of any information that identifies by name or address any
recipient of services;
(I) To the attorney ad litem and court-appointed special
advocate, the home studies on the potential adoptive families selected by the
department to adopt the juvenile or as ordered by the court; or
(J)(i) To a person, agency, or organization engaged in a bona
fide research or evaluation project that is determined by the Division of
Children and Family Services to have value for the evaluation or development
of policies and programs within the Division of Children and Family Services.
(ii) Any confidential information provided by the
department for a research or evaluation project under this subdivision
(h)(2)(J) shall not be redisclosed or published.
(3)(A) Any person or agency to whom disclosure is made shall not
disclose to any other person reports or other information obtained pursuant
to this subsection.
(B) Any person disclosing information in violation of this
subsection shall be guilty of a Class C misdemeanor.
(C) Nothing in this subchapter shall be construed to
prevent subsequent disclosure by the child or his or her parent or guardian.
(D) Any data, records, reports, or documents released
under this section to a law enforcement agency, the prosecuting attorney, or
180 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
a court by the department are confidential and shall be sealed and not
redisclosed without a protective order to ensure that items of evidence for
which there is a reasonable expectation of privacy are not distributed to
persons or institutions without a legitimate interest in the evidence.

SECTION 39. Arkansas Code § 9-32-203(g)(1), concerning when the
Department of Human Services shall report a child death, is amended to read
as follows:
(g)(1) The department shall report when a child dies if that child was
in an out-of-home placement as defined under § 9-27-303 § 9-35-102.

SECTION 40. Arkansas Code § 9-32-204(f)(1), concerning when the
Department of Human Services shall report a child death, is amended to read
as follows:
(f)(1) The department shall report when a child dies if that child was
in an out-of-home placement as defined under § 9-27-303 § 9-35-102.

SECTION 41. Arkansas Code § 9-34-202(b)(3)(A), concerning delivery of
a child who is thirty (30) days of age or younger to a medical provider, law
enforcement agency, fire department, or in a newborn safety device and when
the identity of that child or surrendering parent is released, is amended to
read as follows:
(3)(A) If the identity of a parent or child is released or made
known to the Department of Human Services in violation of subdivision (b)(2)
of this section, the case shall proceed as a dependency-neglect action as
defined under § 9-27-303 § 9-35-102, but with the same protections from
liability as if an anonymous surrender was made under this section.

SECTION 42. Arkansas Code § 9-34-202(b)(3)(B)(i), concerning when a
parent shall not be held criminally liable when surrendering a child who is
thirty (30) days of age or younger to a medical provider, law enforcement
agency, fire department, or in a newborn safety device, is amended to read as
follows:
(B)(i) If the child is relinquished at a location defined
in § 9-34-201, the parent shall not be held criminally liable for the
relinquishment or have a true finding of maltreatment or abandonment entered
181 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
against the parent if the parent's identity is known and the Department of
Human Services proceeds under § 9-27-341 § 9-35-325.

SECTION 43. Arkansas Code § 9-34-203(b), concerning care of a child
and a child's permanency plan when the child is thirty (30) days of age or
younger to a medical provider, law enforcement agency, fire department, or in
a newborn safety device, is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1) The law enforcement officer, employee of the fire
department, or employee of the hospital shall immediately notify the Division
of Children and Family Services, which shall initiate a dependency-neglect
petition under the Arkansas Juvenile Code of 1989, § 9-27-301 et seq.
Arkansas Juvenile Code, § 9-35-101 et seq., and shall proceed under § 9-27-
341 § 9-35-325.
(2)(A) Within fourteen (14) days of filing a dependency-neglect
petition, the Department of Human Services shall publish a notification by
warning order in a newspaper having general circulation in the county where
the proceeding was filed one (1) time a week for four (4) weeks.
(B) The notification shall contain:
(i) The caption of the pleadings in the dependency-
neglect case;
(ii) The location where the child was delivered;
(iii) The date the child was delivered; and
(iv) Notice that a dependency-neglect proceeding has
been filed, and that any parent claiming rights to the child must file a
responsive pleading or motion and appear before the court hearing the case to
defend the parent's claim within thirty (30) days from the date of last
publication.
(C) If the identity of a parent or child is released or
made known to the Department of Human Services in violation of § 9-34-
202(b)(2), the case shall proceed as a dependency-neglect action as defined
under § 9-27-303 § 9-35-102, but with the same protections from liability as
if an anonymous surrender was made under this section.
(D) If no responsive pleadings are filed by the parent
within thirty (30) days from the date of last publication and there are
prospective adoptive parents seeking to adopt the child, the Department of
Human Services may proceed with the filing of an adoption petition without
182 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
further notice.

SECTION 44. Arkansas Code Title 9 is amended to add an additional
chapter to read as follows:

Chapter 35 — Arkansas Juvenile Code

Subchapter 1 — General Provisions

9-35-101. Title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Arkansas Juvenile
Code".

9-35-102. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Abandoned infant” means a juvenile less than nine (9)
months of age whose parent, guardian, or custodian left the child alone or in
the possession of another person without identifying information or with an
expression of intent by words, actions, or omissions not to return for the
infant;
(2)(A) “Abandonment” means:
(i) The failure of the parent to provide reasonable
support for a juvenile and to maintain regular contact with a juvenile
through statement or contact when the failure is accompanied by an intention
on the part of the parent to permit the condition to continue for an
indefinite period in the future;
(ii) The failure of a parent to support or maintain
regular contact with a child without just cause; or
(iii) An articulated intent to forego parental
responsibility.
(B) “Abandonment” does not include a situation in which a
child has disrupted his or her adoption and the adoptive parent has exhausted
the available resources;
(3)(A) “Abuse” means any of the following acts or omissions by a
parent, guardian, custodian, foster parent, person eighteen (18) years of age
or older living in the home with a child, whether related or unrelated to the
183 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
child, or any person who is entrusted with the juvenile's care by a parent,
guardian, custodian, or foster parent, including, but not limited to, an
agent or employee of a public or private residential home, childcare
facility, public or private school, or any person legally responsible for the
juvenile's welfare:
(i) Extreme or repeated cruelty to a juvenile;
(ii) Engaging in conduct creating a realistic and
serious threat of death, permanent or temporary disfigurement, or impairment
of any bodily organ;
(iii) Injury to a juvenile's intellectual,
emotional, or psychological development as evidenced by observable and
substantial impairment of the juvenile's ability to function within the
juvenile's normal range of performance and behavior;
(iv) Any injury that is at variance with the history
given;
(v) Any nonaccidental physical injury;
(vi) Any of the following intentional or knowing
acts, with physical injury and without justifiable cause:
(a) Throwing, kicking, burning, biting, or
cutting a child;
(b) Striking a child with a closed fist;
(c) Shaking a child; or
(d) Striking a child on the face;
(vii) Any of the following intentional or knowing
acts, with or without physical injury:
(a) Striking a child six (6) years of age or
younger on the face or head;
(b) Shaking a child three (3) years of age or
younger;
(c) Interfering with a child's breathing;
(d) Urinating or defecating on a child;
(e) Pinching, biting, or striking a child in
the genital area;
(f) Tying a child to a fixed or heavy object
or binding or tying a child's limbs together;
(g) Giving a child or permitting a child to
184 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
consume or inhale a poisonous or noxious substance not prescribed by a
physician that has the capacity to interfere with normal physiological
functions;
(h) Giving a child or permitting a child to
consume or inhale a substance not prescribed by a physician that has the
capacity to alter the mood of the child, including, but not limited to, the
following:
(1) Marijuana;
(2) Alcohol, excluding alcohol given to
a child during a recognized and established religious ceremony or service;
(3) Narcotics; or
(4) Over-the-counter drugs if a person
purposely administers an overdose to a child or purposely gives an
inappropriate over-the-counter drug to a child and the child is detrimentally
impacted by the overdose or over-the-counter drug;
(i) Exposing a child to chemicals that have
the capacity to interfere with normal physiological functions, including, but
not limited to, chemicals used or generated during the manufacturing of
methamphetamine; or
(j) Subjecting a child to Munchausen syndrome
by proxy, also known as “factitious illness by proxy”, when reported and
confirmed by medical personnel or a medical facility; or
(viii) Recruiting, harboring, transporting, or
obtaining a child for labor or services, through force, fraud, or coercion
for the purpose of subjection to involuntary servitude, peonage, debt
bondage, or slavery.
(B)(i) The list in subdivision (3)(A) of this section is
illustrative of unreasonable action and is not intended to be exclusive.
(ii) No unreasonable action shall be construed to
permit a finding of abuse without having established the elements of abuse.
(C)(i) “Abuse” shall not include:
(a) Physical discipline of a child when it is
reasonable and moderate and is inflicted by a parent or guardian for purposes
of restraining or correcting the child; or
(b) Instances when a child suffers transient
pain or minor temporary marks as the result of a reasonable restraint if:
185 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(1) The person exercising the restraint
is an employee of a residential childcare facility licensed or exempted from
licensure under the Child Welfare Agency Licensing Act, § 9-28-401 et seq.;
(2) The person exercising the restraint
is acting in his or her official capacity while on duty at a residential
childcare facility or the residential childcare facility is exempt from
licensure under the Child Welfare Agency Licensing Act, § 9-28-401 et seq.;
(3) The agency has policies and
procedures regarding restraints;
(4) Other alternatives do not exist to
control the child except for a restraint;
(5) The child is in danger of hurting
himself or herself or others;
(6) The person exercising the restraint
has been trained in properly restraining children, de-escalation, and
conflict resolution techniques; and
(7) The restraint is:
(A) For a reasonable period of
time; and
(B) In conformity with training
and agency policy and procedures.
(ii) Reasonable and moderate physical discipline
inflicted by a parent or guardian shall not include any act that is likely to
cause and that does cause injury more serious than transient pain or minor
temporary marks.
(iii) The age, size, and condition of the child and
the location of the injury and the frequency or recurrence of injuries shall
be considered when determining whether the physical discipline is reasonable
or moderate;
(4) “Adjudication hearing” means a hearing to determine whether
the allegations in a petition are substantiated by the proof;
(5) “Adult sentence” means punishment authorized by the Arkansas
Criminal Code, § 5-1-101 et seq., subject to the limitations in § 9-27-507,
for the act or acts for which the juvenile was adjudicated delinquent as an
extended juvenile jurisdiction offender;
(6) “Aggravated circumstances” means:
186 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(A) A child has been abandoned, chronically abused,
subjected to extreme or repeated cruelty, sexually abused, sexually
exploited, or a determination has been or is made by a judge that there is
little likelihood that services to the family will result in successful
reunification;
(B) A child has been removed from the custody of the
parent or guardian and placed in foster care or in the custody of another
person three (3) or more times in the last fifteen (15) months; or
(C) A child or a sibling has been neglected or abused such
that the abuse or neglect could endanger the life of the child;
(7) “Attorney ad litem” means an attorney appointed to represent
the best interest of a juvenile;
(8) “Caretaker” means a parent, guardian, custodian, foster
parent, significant other of the child's parent, or any person fourteen (14)
years of age or older who is entrusted with a child's care by a parent,
guardian, custodian, or foster parent, including, but not limited to, an
agent or employee of a public or private residential home, childcare
facility, public or private school, or any person responsible for a child's
welfare;
(9) “Case plan” means a document setting forth the plan for
services for a juvenile and his or her family, as described in § 9-27-402;
(10)(A) “Cash assistance” means short-term financial assistance.
(B) “Cash assistance” does not include:
(i) Long-term financial assistance or financial
assistance that is the equivalent of the board payment, adoption subsidy, or
guardianship subsidy; or
(ii) Financial assistance for car insurance;
(11) “Commitment” means an order of the court that places a
juvenile in the physical custody of the Division of Youth Services for
placement in a youth services facility;
(12) “Court” means the juvenile division of circuit court;
(13) “Court-appointed special advocate” means a volunteer
appointed by the court to advocate for the best interest of juveniles in
dependency-neglect proceedings;
(14)(A) “Custodian” means a person other than a parent or legal
guardian who stands in loco parentis to the juvenile or a person, agency, or
187 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
institution to whom a court of competent jurisdiction has given custody of a
juvenile by court order.
(B) For the purposes of who has a right to counsel under §
9-35-311, “custodian” includes a person to whom a court of competent
jurisdiction has given custody, including a legal guardian;
(15) “Delinquent juvenile” means:
(A) A juvenile ten (10) years of age or older who:
(i) Has committed an act other than a traffic
offense or game and fish violation that, if the act had been committed by an
adult, would subject the adult to prosecution for a felony, misdemeanor, or
violation under the applicable criminal laws of this state;
(ii) Has violated § 5-73-119; or
(iii) Has violated § 5-71-217(d)(2), cyberbullying
of a school employee; or
(B) Any juvenile charged with capital murder, § 5-10-101,
or murder in the first degree, § 5-10-102, subject to extended juvenile
jurisdiction;
(16) “Dependent juvenile” means:
(A)(i) A child whose parent or guardian is incarcerated
and the parent or guardian has no appropriate relative or friend willing or
able to provide care for the child.
(ii) If the reason for the incarceration is related
to the health, safety, or welfare of the child, the child is not a dependent
juvenile but may be dependent-neglected;
(B) A child whose parent or guardian is incapacitated,
whether temporarily or permanently, so that the parent or guardian cannot
provide care for the juvenile and the parent or guardian has no appropriate
relative or friend willing or able to provide care for the child;
(C) A child whose custodial parent dies and no appropriate
relative or friend is willing or able to provide care for the child;
(D) A child who is an infant relinquished to the custody
of the Department of Human Services for the sole purpose of adoption;
(E) A safe haven baby, § 9-34-201 et seq.;
(F) A child who has disrupted his or her adoption, and the
adoptive parents have exhausted resources available to them; or
(G)(i) A child who has been a victim of human trafficking.
188 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(ii) If the parent knew or should have known the
child was a victim of human trafficking, the child is not a dependent
juvenile but may be dependent-neglected;
(17)(A) “Dependent-neglected juvenile” means any juvenile who is
at substantial risk of serious harm as a result of the following acts or
omissions to the juvenile, a sibling, or another juvenile:
(i) Abandonment;
(ii) Abuse;
(iii) Sexual abuse;
(iv) Sexual exploitation;
(v) Neglect;
(vi) Parental unfitness; or
(vii) Being present in a dwelling or structure
during the manufacturing of methamphetamine with the knowledge of his or her
parent, guardian, or custodian.
(B) “Dependent-neglected juvenile” includes dependent
juveniles;
(18) “Detention” means the temporary care of a juvenile in a
physically restricting facility other than a jail or lock-up used for the
detention of adults prior to an adjudication hearing for delinquency or
pending commitment pursuant to an adjudication of delinquency;
(19) “Detention hearing” means a hearing held to determine
whether a juvenile accused or adjudicated of committing a delinquent act or
acts should be released or held prior to adjudication or disposition;
(20) “Deviant sexual activity” means any act of sexual
gratification involving:
(A) Penetration, however slight, of the anus or mouth of
one (1) person by the penis of another person; or
(B) Penetration, however slight, of the labia majora or
anus of one (1) person by any body member or foreign instrument manipulated
by another person;
(21) “Disposition hearing” means a hearing held following an
adjudication hearing to determine what action will be taken in delinquency,
family in need of services, or dependency-neglect cases;
(22) “Extended juvenile jurisdiction offender” means a juvenile
designated to be subject to juvenile disposition and an adult sentence
189 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
imposed by the court;
(23) “Family in need of services” means any family whose
juvenile evidences behavior that includes, but is not limited to, the
following:
(A) Being habitually and without justification absent from
school while subject to compulsory school attendance;
(B) Being habitually disobedient to the reasonable and
lawful commands of his or her parent, guardian, or custodian; or
(C) Having absented himself or herself from the juvenile's
home without sufficient cause, permission, or justification;
(24)(A) “Family services” means relevant services provided to a
juvenile or his or her family, including, but not limited to:
(i) Child care;
(ii) Homemaker services;
(iii) Crisis counseling;
(iv) Cash assistance;
(v) Transportation;
(vi) Family therapy;
(vii) Physical, psychiatric, or psychological
evaluation;
(viii) Counseling;
(ix) Treatment; or
(x) Post-adoptive services.
(B) Family services are provided in order to:
(i) Prevent a juvenile from being removed from a
parent, guardian, or custodian;
(ii) Reunite the juvenile with the parent, guardian,
or custodian from whom the juvenile has been removed;
(iii) Implement a permanent plan of adoption or
guardianship for a juvenile in a dependency-neglect case; or
(iv) Rehabilitate a juvenile in a delinquency or
family in need of services case;
(25) “Fast track” means that reunification services will not be
provided or will be terminated before twelve (12) months of services;
(26)(A) “Fictive kin” means a person selected by the Division of
Children and Family Services who:
190 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(i) Is not related to a child by blood or marriage;
and
(ii) Has a strong, positive, and emotional tie or
role in the:
(a) Child's life; or
(b) Child's parent's life if the child is an
infant.
(B) The Director of the Division of Children and Family
Services or his or her designee shall approve a fictive kin for an infant;
(27)(A) “Forcible compulsion” means physical force,
intimidation, or a threat, express or implied, of death, physical injury to,
rape, sexual abuse, or kidnapping of any person.
(B) If the act was committed against the will of the
juvenile, then forcible compulsion has been used.
(C) The age, developmental stage, and stature of the
victim and the relationship of the victim to the assailant, as well as the
threat of deprivation of affection, rights, and privileges from the victim by
the assailant shall be considered in weighing the sufficiency of the evidence
to prove compulsion;
(28)(A) “Grooming” means to knowingly disseminate to a child
thirteen (13) years of age or younger with or without consideration a visual
or print medium depicting sexually explicit content with the purpose to
entice, induce, or groom the child to engage in the following with a person:
(i) Sexual intercourse;
(ii) Sexually explicit conduct; or
(iii) Deviant sexual activity.
(B) As used in subdivision (28)(A) of this section,
“disseminate” means to allow to view, expose, furnish, present, sell, or
otherwise distribute, including on an electronic device or virtual platform,
and is not limited to an act that takes place in the physical presence of a
child.
(C) It is an affirmative defense to an allegation of
grooming that the actor is not more than three (3) years older than the
victim;
(29) “Guardian” means any person, agency, or institution, as
defined by § 28-65-101 et seq., whom a court of competent jurisdiction has so
191 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
appointed;
(30)(A) “Home study” means a written report that is obtained
after an investigation of a home by the department or other appropriate
persons or agencies and that shall conform to rules established by the
department.
(B)(i) An in-state home study, excluding the results of a
criminal records check, shall be completed and presented to the requesting
court within thirty (30) working days of the receipt of the request for the
home study.
(ii) The results of the criminal records check shall
be provided to the court as soon as they are received.
(iii) The circuit clerk of the county court shall:
(a) Keep a record of the national fingerprint-
based criminal background checks performed by the Federal Bureau of
Investigation for the court;
(b) Permit only the court and the employees of
the clerk's office with an official reason to view the information in the
national fingerprint-based criminal background check;
(c) Not permit anyone to obtain a copy of the
national fingerprint-based criminal background check; and
(d) Permit a person specifically ordered by
the court to view the information in the national fingerprint-based criminal
background check.
(iv)(a) The department shall share the
information obtained from the criminal records check and the national
fingerprint-based criminal background checks only with employees of the
department who have an official business reason to see the information.
(b) Unless specifically ordered to do so by
the court, the department shall not share the information obtained from the
criminal records check and the national fingerprint-based criminal background
checks with persons not employed by the department.
(C)(i) The department may obtain a criminal background
check on any person in the household sixteen (16) years of age and older,
including a fingerprint-based check of national crime information databases.
(ii) Upon request, local law enforcement shall
provide the department with criminal background information on any person in
192 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
the household sixteen (16) years of age and older;
(31) “Imminent harm” means an act of harm that is a danger:
(A) To the physical, mental, or emotional health of a
juvenile;
(B) That is constrained by time; and
(C) That may only be prevented by immediate intervention
by a court;
(32) “Indecent exposure” means the exposure by a person of the
person's sexual organs for the purpose of arousing or gratifying the sexual
desire of the person or any other person, under circumstances in which the
person knows the conduct is likely to cause affront or alarm;
(33) “Independence” means a permanency planning hearing
disposition known as “Another Planned Permanent Living Arrangement (APPLA)”
for the juvenile who will not be reunited with his or her family and because
another permanent plan is not in the juvenile's best interest;
(34) “Juvenile” means an individual who is:
(A) From birth to eighteen (18) years of age, whether
married or single; or
(B) Adjudicated delinquent, a juvenile member of a family
in need of services, or dependent or dependent-neglected by the juvenile
division of circuit court prior to eighteen (18) years of age and for whom
the juvenile division of circuit court retains jurisdiction;
(35) “Juvenile detention facility” means any facility for the
temporary care of juveniles alleged to be delinquent or adjudicated
delinquent and awaiting disposition, who require secure custody in a
physically restricting facility designed and operated with all entrances and
exits under the exclusive control of the facility's staff, so that a juvenile
may not leave the facility unsupervised or without permission;
(36) “Law enforcement officer” means any public servant vested
by law with a duty to maintain public order or to make arrests for offenses;
(37) “Miranda rights” means the requirement set out in Miranda
v. Arizona, 384 U.S. 436 (1966), for law enforcement officers to clearly
inform an accused, including a juvenile taken into custody for a delinquent
act or a criminal offense, that the juvenile has the right to remain silent,
that anything the juvenile says will be used against him or her in court,
that the juvenile has the right to consult with a lawyer and to have the
193 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
lawyer with him or her during interrogation, and that, if the juvenile is
indigent, a lawyer will be appointed to represent him or her;
(38)(A) “Neglect” means those acts or omissions of a parent,
guardian, custodian, foster parent, or any person who is entrusted with the
juvenile's care by a parent, custodian, guardian, or foster parent,
including, but not limited to, an agent or employee of a public or private
residential home, childcare facility, public or private school, or any person
legally responsible under state law for the juvenile's welfare, that
constitute:
(i) Failure or refusal to prevent the abuse of the
juvenile when the person knows or has reasonable cause to know the juvenile
is or has been abused;
(ii) Failure or refusal to provide the necessary
food, clothing, shelter, or medical treatment necessary for the juvenile's
well-being, except when the failure or refusal is caused primarily by the
financial inability of the person legally responsible and no services for
relief have been offered;
(iii) Failure to take reasonable action to protect
the juvenile from abandonment, abuse, sexual abuse, sexual exploitation, or
neglect when the existence of this condition was known or should have been
known, and, if for abuse or neglect, the failure to take reasonable action to
protect the juvenile causes the juvenile serious bodily injury;
(iv) Failure or irremediable inability to provide
for the essential and necessary physical, mental, or emotional needs of the
juvenile, including failure to provide a shelter that does not pose a risk to
the health or safety of the juvenile;
(v) Failure to provide for the juvenile's care and
maintenance, proper or necessary support, or medical, surgical, or other
necessary care;
(vi) Failure, although able, to assume
responsibility for the care and custody of the juvenile or to participate in
a plan to assume the responsibility;
(vii) Failure to appropriately supervise the
juvenile that results in the juvenile's being left alone:
(a) At an inappropriate age, creating a
dangerous situation; or
194 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(b) In inappropriate circumstances, creating a
dangerous situation;
(viii) Failure to appropriately supervise the
juvenile that results in the juvenile being placed in inappropriate
circumstances, creating a dangerous situation; or
(ix)(a) Failure to ensure a child between six
(6) years of age and seventeen (17) years of age is enrolled in school or is
being legally home-schooled; or
(b) As a result of an act or omission by the
parent, custodian, or guardian of a child, the child is habitually and
without justification absent from school.
(B)(i) “Neglect” shall also include:
(a) Causing a child to be born with an illegal
substance present in the child's bodily fluids or bodily substances as a
result of the pregnant mother's knowingly using an illegal substance before
the birth of the child; or
(b) At the time of the birth of a child, the
presence of an illegal substance in the mother's bodily fluids or bodily
substances as a result of the pregnant mother's knowingly using an illegal
substance before the birth of the child.
(ii) For the purposes of this subdivision (38)(B),
“illegal substance” means a drug that is prohibited to be used or possessed
without a prescription under the Arkansas Criminal Code, § 5-1-101 et seq.
(iii) A test of the child's bodily fluids or bodily
substances may be used as evidence to establish neglect under subdivision
(38)(B)(i)(a) of this section.
(iv) A test of the mother's bodily fluids or bodily
substances or the child's bodily fluids or bodily substances may be used as
evidence to establish neglect under subdivision (38)(B)(i)(b) of this
section;
(39)(A) “Notice of hearing” means a notice that describes the
nature of the hearing, the time, date, and place of hearing, the right to be
present, heard, and represented by counsel, and instructions on how to apply
to the court for appointment of counsel, if indigent, or a uniform notice as
developed and prescribed by the Supreme Court.
(B) The notice of hearing shall be served in the manner
195 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
provided for service under the Arkansas Rules of Civil Procedure;
(40) “Order to appear” means an order issued by the court
directing a person who may be subject to the court's jurisdiction to appear
before the court at a date and time as set forth in the order;
(41)(A) “Out-of-home placement” means:
(i) Placement in a home or facility other than
placement in a youth services center, a detention facility, or the home of a
parent or guardian of the juvenile; or
(ii) Placement in the home of an individual other
than a parent or guardian, not including any placement when the court has
ordered that the placement be made permanent and ordered that no further
reunification services or six-month reviews are required.
(B) “Out-of-home placement” shall not include placement in
a youth services center or detention facility as a result of a finding of
delinquency;
(42) “Parent” means:
(A) A biological mother;
(B) An adoptive parent; or
(C) A man:
(i) To whom the biological mother was married at the
time of conception or birth;
(ii) Who has signed an acknowledgment of paternity
pursuant to § 9-10-120;
(iii) Who has been found by a court of competent
jurisdiction to be the biological father of the juvenile or to have otherwise
established paternity; or
(iv) Who is listed as the parent on the birth
certificate of the child;
(43) “Paternity hearing” means a legal proceeding to determine
the biological father of a juvenile;
(44) “Permanent custody” means custody that is transferred to a
person as a permanency disposition in a juvenile case and the case is closed;
(45) “Pornography” means:
(A) Pictures, movies, and videos lacking serious literary,
artistic, political, or scientific value that when taken as a whole and
applying contemporary community standards would appear to the average person
196 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
to appeal to the prurient interest;
(B) Material that depicts sexual conduct in a patently
offensive manner lacking serious literary, artistic, political, or scientific
value; or
(C) Obscene or licentious material;
(46)(A) “Predisposition report” means a report concerning the
juvenile, the family of the juvenile, all possible disposition alternatives,
the location of the school in which the juvenile is or was last enrolled,
whether the juvenile has been tested for or has been found to have any
disability, the name of the juvenile's attorney and, if appointed by the
court, the date of the appointment, any participation by the juvenile or his
or her family in counseling services previously or currently being provided
in conjunction with adjudication of the juvenile, and any other matters
relevant to the efforts to provide treatment to the juvenile or the need for
treatment of the juvenile or the family.
(B) The predisposition report shall include a home study
of any out-of-home placement that may be part of the disposition;
(47) “Prosecuting attorney” means an attorney who is elected as
district prosecuting attorney, the duly appointed deputy prosecuting
attorney, or any city prosecuting attorney;
(48) “Protection plan” means a written plan developed by the
department in conjunction with the family and support network to protect the
juvenile from harm and which allows the juvenile to remain safely in the
home;
(49) “Putative father” means any man not deemed or adjudicated
under the laws of the jurisdiction of the United States to be the biological
father of a juvenile who claims to be or is alleged to be the biological
father of the juvenile;
(50)(A)(i) “Reasonable efforts” means efforts to preserve the
family before the placement of a child in foster care to prevent the need for
removing the child from his or her home and efforts to reunify a family made
after a child is placed out of his or her home to make it possible for him or
her to safely return home.
(ii) Reasonable efforts shall also be made to obtain
permanency for a child who has been in an out-of-home placement for more than
twelve (12) months or for fifteen (15) of the previous twenty-two (22)
197 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
months.
(iii) In determining whether or not to remove a
child from a home or return a child back to a home, the child's health and
safety shall be the paramount concern.
(iv) The department or other appropriate agency
shall exercise reasonable diligence and care to utilize all available
services related to meeting the needs of the juvenile and the family.
(v)(a) “Reasonable efforts” includes efforts to
involve an incarcerated parent.
(b) The department shall:
(1) Involve an incarcerated parent in
case planning;
(2) Monitor compliance with services
offered by the Division of Correction to the extent permitted by federal law;
and
(3) Offer visitation in accordance with
the policies of the Division of Correction if visitation is appropriate and
in the best interest of the child.
(B) The juvenile division of circuit court may deem that
reasonable efforts have been made when the court has found that the first
contact by the department occurred during an emergency in which the child
could not safely remain at home, even with reasonable services being
provided.
(C) Reasonable efforts to reunite a child with his or her
parent or parents shall not be required in all cases. Specifically,
reunification shall not be required if a court of competent jurisdiction,
including the juvenile division of circuit court, has determined by clear and
convincing evidence that the parent has:
(i) Subjected the child to aggravated circumstances;
(ii) Committed murder of any child;
(iii) Committed manslaughter of any child;
(iv) Aided or abetted, attempted, conspired, or
solicited to commit the murder or the manslaughter;
(v) Committed a felony battery that results in
serious bodily injury to any child;
(vi) Had the parental rights involuntarily
198 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
terminated as to a sibling of the child;
(vii) Abandoned an infant such that the juvenile is
an abandoned infant as defined in subdivision (1) of this section; or
(viii) Registered with a sex offender registry under
the Adam Walsh Child Protection and Safety Act of 2006, Pub. L. No. 109-248.
(D) Reasonable efforts to place a child for adoption or
with a legal guardian or permanent custodian may be made concurrently with
reasonable efforts to reunite a child with his or her family;
(51) “Residence” means:
(A) The place where the juvenile is domiciled; or
(B) The permanent place of abode where the juvenile spends
an aggregate of more than six (6) months of the year;
(52)(A) “Restitution” means actual economic loss sustained by an
individual or entity as a proximate result of the delinquent acts of a
juvenile.
(B) Such economic loss shall include, but not be limited
to, medical expenses, funeral expenses, expenses incurred for counseling
services, lost wages, and expenses for repair or replacement of property;
(53) “Safety plan” means a plan ordered by the court to be
developed for an adjudicated delinquent sex offender under § 9-35-434 who is
at moderate or high risk of reoffending for the purposes of § 9-35-204, § 9-
35-304, and § 9-35-405;
(54) “Sexual abuse” means:
(A) By a person fourteen (14) years of age or older to a
person younger than eighteen (18) years of age:
(i) Sexual intercourse, deviant sexual activity, or
sexual contact by forcible compulsion;
(ii) Attempted sexual intercourse, attempted deviant
sexual activity, or attempted sexual contact by forcible compulsion;
(iii) Indecent exposure; or
(iv) Forcing the watching of pornography or live
sexual activity;
(B) By a person eighteen (18) years of age or older to a
person who is younger than fifteen (15) years of age and is not his or her
spouse:
(i) Sexual intercourse, deviant sexual activity, or
199 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
sexual contact;
(ii) Attempted sexual intercourse, attempted deviant
sexual activity, or attempted sexual contact; or
(iii) Solicitation of sexual intercourse,
solicitation of deviant sexual activity, or solicitation of sexual contact;
(C) By a person twenty (20) years of age or older to a
person who is younger than sixteen (16) years of age who is not his or her
spouse:
(i) Sexual intercourse, deviant sexual activity, or
sexual contact;
(ii) Attempted sexual intercourse, attempted deviant
sexual activity, or attempted sexual contact; or
(iii) Solicitation of sexual intercourse,
solicitation of deviant sexual activity, or solicitation of sexual contact;
(D) By a caretaker to a person younger than eighteen (18)
years of age:
(i) Sexual intercourse, deviant sexual activity, or
sexual contact;
(ii) Attempted sexual intercourse, attempted deviant
sexual activity, or attempted sexual contact;
(iii) Forcing or encouraging the watching of
pornography;
(iv) Forcing, permitting, or encouraging the
watching of live sexual activity;
(v) Forcing listening to a phone sex line;
(vi) An act of voyeurism; or
(vii) Solicitation of sexual intercourse, deviant
sexual activity, or sexual contact;
(E) By a person younger than fourteen (14) years of age to
a person younger than eighteen (18) years of age:
(i) Sexual intercourse, deviant sexual activity, or
sexual contact by forcible compulsion; or
(ii) Attempted sexual intercourse, attempted deviant
sexual activity, or attempted sexual contact by forcible compulsion;
(F) By a person eighteen (18) years of age or older to a
person who is younger than eighteen (18) years of age, the recruiting,
200 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
harboring, transporting, obtaining, patronizing, or soliciting of a child for
the purpose of a commercial sex act; and
(G) Grooming, by a:
(i) Person eighteen (18) years of age or older to a
person not his or her spouse who is younger than fourteen (14) years of age;
or
(ii) Caretaker to a person younger than fourteen
(14) years of age;
(55)(A) “Sexual contact” means any act of sexual gratification
involving:
(i) Touching, directly or through clothing, of the
sex organs, buttocks, or anus of a juvenile or the breast of a female
juvenile;
(ii) Encouraging the juvenile to touch the offender
in a sexual manner; or
(iii) Requesting the offender to touch the juvenile
in a sexual manner.
(B) Evidence of sexual gratification may be inferred from
the attendant circumstances surrounding the investigation of the specific
complaint of child maltreatment.
(C) This subdivision (55) shall not permit normal,
affectionate hugging to be construed as sexual contact;
(56) “Sexual exploitation” includes:
(A) Allowing, permitting, or encouraging participation or
depiction of the juvenile in:
(i) Prostitution;
(ii) Obscene photographing; or
(iii) Obscene filming; and
(B) Obscenely depicting, obscenely posing, or obscenely
posturing a juvenile for any use or purpose;
(57) “Shelter care” means the temporary care of a juvenile in
physically unrestricting facilities under an order for placement pending or
under an adjudication of dependency-neglect or family in need of services;
(58) “Significant other” means a person:
(A) With whom the parent shares a household; or
(B) Who has a relationship with the parent that results in
201 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
the person acting in loco parentis with respect to the parent's child or
children, regardless of living arrangements;
(59) “Temporary custody” means custody that is transferred to a
person during the pendency of the juvenile court case when services are being
provided to achieve the goal of the case plan;
(60) “Trial placement” means that custody of the juvenile
remains with the department, but the juvenile is returned to the home of a
parent or the person from whom custody was removed for a period not to exceed
sixty (60) days;
(61) “UCCJEA” means the Uniform Child-Custody Jurisdiction and
Enforcement Act, § 9-19-101 et seq.;
(62) “UIFSA” means the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act, §
9-17-101 et seq.;
(63) “Victim” means any person or entity entitled to restitution
as defined in subdivision (52) of this section as the result of a delinquent
act committed by a juvenile adjudicated delinquent;
(64) “Victim of human trafficking” means a child who has been
subjected to trafficking of persons as defined in § 5-18-103;
(65)(A) “Voyeurism” means looking for the purpose of sexual
arousal or gratification into a private location or place in which a juvenile
may reasonably be expected to be nude or partially nude.
(B) "Voyeurism" does not apply to delinquency actions;
(66) “Youth services center” means a youth services facility
operated by the state or a contract provider; and
(67) “Youth services facility” means a facility operated by the
state or its designee for the care of juveniles who have been adjudicated
delinquent or convicted of a crime and who require secure custody in either a
physically restrictive facility or a staff-secured facility operated so that
a juvenile may not leave the facility unsupervised or without supervision.

9-35-103. Provisions supplemental.
Unless this chapter provides otherwise, nothing in this chapter shall
be construed to be:
(1) In conflict with, repeal, or prevent proceedings under any
act or statute of this state that may otherwise define any specific act of
any person as a crime or misdemeanor, which act might also constitute
202 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
contributing to the delinquency or dependency of a juvenile, or to prevent or
to interfere with proceedings under any such act; or
(2) Inconsistent with or to repeal:
(A) Any act providing for the support by a parent of his
or her minor child, the taking of indecent liberties with children, or
selling liquor, tobacco, or firearms, to children, or permitting children in
prohibited spaces; or
(B) This chapter or prevent proceedings under this
chapter.

9-35-104. Applicability.
Any juvenile within this state may be subjected to the care, custody,
control, and jurisdiction of the circuit court.

9-35-105. Monthly report.
The circuit court shall submit monthly to the Director of the
Administrative Office of the Courts a report in writing upon forms to be
furnished by the director showing the number and disposition of juveniles
brought before the juvenile division of circuit court together with such
other information regarding those cases as may be requested by the director.

9-35-106. Support orders.
(a) If it appears at the adjudication or disposition hearing in any
case brought under this chapter that the parents or any other person named in
the petition who is by law required to provide support for the juvenile is
able to contribute to the support of the juvenile, the court shall issue an
order requiring the person to pay a reasonable sum pursuant to the guidelines
for child support and the family support chart for the support, maintenance,
or education of the juvenile to any person, agency, or institution to whom
custody is awarded.
(b) The court, upon proper motion, may make such adjustments and
modifications of the order as may appear reasonable and proper.
(c) The court shall also order the persons required by law to support
a juvenile to disclose their places of employment and the amounts earned by
them. Anyone who refuses to disclose such information may be cited for
contempt of court.
203 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320

9-35-107. Publication of proceedings.
No information by which the name or identity of a juvenile who is the
subject of proceedings under this chapter may be ascertained shall be
published by the news media without written order of the circuit court.

9-35-108. Compact to share costs.
Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit two (2) or more counties,
cities, or school districts of this state from agreeing by compact to share
the costs of court personnel or juvenile facilities to serve both or all of
the counties so agreeing.

9-35-109. Emancipation of juveniles.
(a) A petition for emancipation may be filed in a circuit court by any
party to a dependency-neglect, dependency, family in need of services, or
delinquency case.
(b) The petition shall be served along with a notice of hearing to the
juvenile's parent, legal guardian, or legal custodian.
(c) The circuit court may emancipate a juvenile in a dependency-
neglect, dependency, family in need of services, or delinquency case.
(d)(1) The court may emancipate the juvenile after a hearing on the
petition if the petitioner shows by a preponderance of the evidence that:
(A) The juvenile is at least seventeen (17) years of age;
(B) The juvenile is willing to live separate and apart
from his or her parent, legal guardian, or legal custodian;
(C) The juvenile has an appropriate place to live;
(D) The juvenile has been managing or has the ability to
manage his or her own financial affairs;
(E) The juvenile has a legal source of income, such as
employment or a trust fund;
(F) The juvenile has healthcare coverage or a realistic
plan on how to meet his or her health needs;
(G) The juvenile agrees to comply with the compulsory
school attendance laws; and
(H) Emancipation is in the best interest of the juvenile.
(2) The court shall consider the wishes of the parent, legal
204 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
guardian, or legal custodian in making its decision.
(3) If the juvenile has an attorney ad litem, the court shall
consider the recommendation of the attorney ad litem.
(e) An order of emancipation has the following effects:
(1) The juvenile has the right to obtain and consent to all
medical care, including counseling;
(2) The juvenile has the right to enter into contracts;
(3) The juvenile has the right to enroll himself or herself in
school, college, or other educational programs;
(4) The juvenile has the right to obtain a driver's license
without consent of a parent or other adult so long as the juvenile complies
with the remaining requirements of the driver's license law;
(5) The juvenile's parent, legal guardian, or legal custodian is
no longer legally responsible for the juvenile;
(6) The juvenile may still be charged with a delinquency and
prosecuted in juvenile court;
(7) The juvenile may not marry without parental or guardian
consent pursuant to § 9-11-102;
(8) The juvenile is not relieved from compulsory school
attendance;
(9) The Department of Human Services is not relieved from the
responsibility of providing independent living services and funding for which
the juvenile is eligible upon request by the juvenile;
(10) Child support orders are not terminated but may cease upon
entry of an order from the court that issued the order of child support;
(11) Until the juvenile reaches the age of majority, the juvenile
remains eligible for federal programs and services as a juvenile;
(12) The juvenile is not permitted to obtain items prohibited for
sale to or possession by a minor, such as tobacco or alcohol;
(13) The juvenile remains subject to state and federal laws
enacted for the protection of persons under eighteen (18) years of age such
as the prohibition against a juvenile's obtaining a tattoo; and
(14) No statute of limitations is affected.

Subchapter 2 — Family in Need of Services

205 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
9-35-201. Purpose — Construction.
This subchapter shall be liberally construed to ensure that:
(1) The provisions of this subchapter are executed and enforced;
and
(2) Each party is assured:
(A) A fair hearing; and
(B) That his or her constitutional and other legal rights
are recognized and enforced.

9-35-202. Jurisdiction.
(a) The circuit court shall have exclusive jurisdiction of and be the
sole court for the following proceedings governed by this subchapter,
including without limitation:
(1) Proceedings in which a family is alleged to be in need of
services as defined by this subchapter, including without limitation a
juvenile from birth to eighteen (18) years of age, except for the following:
(A) A juvenile whose family has been adjudicated as a
family in need of services and who is in foster care before he or she reaches
eighteen (18) years of age may request that the court continue jurisdiction
until the juvenile reaches twenty-one (21) years of age if the requirements
in § 9-35-302 are met;
(B) The court shall retain jurisdiction only if the
juvenile meets or has a viable plan to meet the requirements in § 9-35-302;
or
(C) The court shall discontinue jurisdiction upon request
of the juvenile or when the juvenile completes or is discontinued from the
requirements to receive independent living services; and
(2) Proceedings in family in need of services matter to set
aside an order of permanent custody upon the disruption of the placement.
(b)(1) A juvenile shall not under any circumstances remain under the
court's jurisdiction after the juvenile reaches twenty-one (21) years of age.
(2) The court shall retain jurisdiction to issue an order of
adoption, interlocutory or final, if a juvenile is placed outside of the
State of Arkansas.
(c) The assignment of cases to the juvenile division of circuit court
shall be as described by the Supreme Court in Administrative Order Number 14,
206 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
originally issued on April 6, 2001.
(d)(1) The circuit court shall have concurrent jurisdiction with the
district court over a juvenile curfew violation.
(2) The prosecutor may file a family in need of services
petition in circuit court or a citation in district court for a juvenile
curfew violation.
(e) The circuit court shall have jurisdiction to hear proceedings
commenced in any court of this state or court of comparable jurisdiction of
another state that are transferred to it under the Uniform Child-Custody
Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act, § 9-19-101 et seq.

9-35-203. Venue.
(a)(1) Except as provided in subdivisions (a)(2)-(4) of this section,
a proceeding under this subchapter shall be commenced in the circuit court of
the county in which the juvenile resides.
(2) A proceeding under the Uniform Child-Custody Jurisdiction
and Enforcement Act, § 9-19-101 et seq., shall be commenced in the court
provided by the Uniform Child-Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act, § 9-
19-101 et seq.
(3) An adoption or guardianship may be filed in the juvenile
division of a circuit court that has previously asserted continuing
jurisdiction of the juvenile.
(4) An adult or family member who files a family in need of
services petition shall file a motion to transfer if the adult or family
member:
(A) Receives information indicating that the juvenile
involved in the family in need of services case has relocated to a county in
another judicial district; and
(B) Knows the address of the juvenile in the county to
which the juvenile has relocated.
(b)(1) Before transferring a case to another venue, the court shall
contact the judge in the other venue to confirm that the judge in the other
venue will accept the transfer.
(2)(A) Upon confirmation that the judge will accept the transfer
of venue, the transferring judge shall enter the transfer order.
(B) The transfer order shall:
207 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(i) Indicate that the judge has accepted the
transfer;
(ii) State the location of the court in the new
venue;
(iii) Set the time and date of the next hearing;
(iv) Be provided to all parties and attorneys to the
case; and
(v) Be transmitted immediately to the judge accepting
the transfer.
(3) The transferring court shall also ensure that all court
records are copied and sent to the judge in the new venue.

9-35-204. Confidentiality of records — Definition.
(a)(1) Except as provided in subdivision (a)(2) of this section, all
records may be closed and confidential within the discretion of the circuit
court.
(2) Adoption records, including any part of a dependency-neglect
record that includes adoption records, shall be closed and confidential as
provided in the Revised Uniform Adoption Act, § 9-9-201 et seq.
(b)(1) The court:
(A) May expunge other juvenile records at any time; and
(B) Shall expunge all the records of a juvenile upon his
or her twenty-first birthday in a family in need of services case.
(2) As used in this section, “expunge” means to destroy.
(c) This section does not apply to nor restrict the use or publication
of statistics, data, or other materials that summarize or refer to any
records, reports, statements, notes, or other information in the aggregate
and that do not refer to or disclose the identity of any juvenile defendant
in any proceeding when only used for the purpose of research and study.
(d) Records of proceedings under this subchapter and the records of an
investigation that is conducted when the alleged offender is an adult and
relates to an offense that occurred when the alleged offender was a juvenile
shall:
(1) Be confidential; and
(2) Not be subject to disclosure under the Freedom of
Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq., unless authorized by a written
208 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
order of the juvenile division of circuit court.
(e) Information regarding a proceeding under this subchapter shall be
confidential unless the exchange of information is:
(1) For the purpose of obtaining services for the juvenile, to
ensure school safety, or to ensure public safety;
(2) Reasonably necessary to achieve one (1) or more purposes;
and
(3) Under a written order by the circuit court.
(f)(1) The information regarding a proceeding under this subchapter
may be given only to the following persons:
(A) A school counselor;
(B) A juvenile court probation officer or caseworker;
(C) A law enforcement officer;
(D) A spiritual representative designated by the juvenile
or his or her parents or legal guardian;
(E) A Department of Human Services caseworker;
(F) A community-based provider designated by the court,
the school, or the parent or legal guardian of the juvenile;
(G) A Department of Health representative;
(H) The juvenile's attorney ad litem or other court-
appointed special advocate; or
(I)(i) A school superintendent or the designee of the
superintendent of the school district to which the juvenile transfers, in
which the juvenile is enrolled, or from which the juvenile receives services.
(ii) A school superintendent or the designee of the
superintendent of the school district in which the juvenile is enrolled or
from which the juvenile receives services shall immediately notify the
following persons of information he or she obtains under subdivision
(f)(1)(I)(i) of this section:
(a) The principal of the school;
(b) The resource officer of the school; and
(c) Any other school official with a
legitimate educational interest in the juvenile.
(2) The persons listed in subdivision (f)(1) of this section may
meet to:
(A) Exchange information;
209 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(B) Discuss options for assistance to the juvenile;
(C) Develop and implement a plan of action to assist the
juvenile; and
(D) Ensure school safety and public safety.
(3) The juvenile and his or her parent or legal guardian:
(A) Shall be notified within a reasonable time before a
meeting; and
(B) May attend any meeting of the persons referred to in
subdivision (f)(1) of this section when three (3) or more individuals meet to
discuss assistance for the juvenile or protection of the public due to the
juvenile's behavior.
(4) Medical records, psychiatric records, psychological records,
and related information shall remain confidential unless the juvenile's
parent or legal guardian waives confidentiality in writing specifically
describing the records to be disclosed between the persons listed in
subdivision (f)(1) of this section and the purpose for the disclosure.
(5) Persons listed in subdivision (f)(1) of this section who
exchange any information referred to in this section may be held civilly
liable for disclosure of the information if the person does not comply with
limitations set forth in this section.
(g)(1) When a court orders that a juvenile have a safety plan that
restricts or requires supervised contact with another juvenile or juveniles
as it relates to student or school safety, the court shall direct that a copy
of the safety plan and a copy of the court order regarding the safety plan
concerning student or school safety be provided to the school superintendent
and principal of the school district:
(A) To which the juvenile transfers;
(B) In which the juvenile is enrolled; or
(C) From which the juvenile receives services.
(2) When a court order amends or removes any safety plan
outlined in subdivision (g)(1) of this section, the court shall direct that a
copy of the safety plan and a copy of the court order regarding the safety
plan, as it relates to student or school safety, be provided to the school
superintendent and principal of the school district:
(A) To which the juvenile transfers;
(B) In which the juvenile is enrolled; or
210 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(C) From which the juvenile receives services.
(3)(A) The superintendent or principal of the school district in
which the juvenile is enrolled or from which the juvenile receives services
shall provide verbal notification only to school officials who are necessary
to implement the safety plan as ordered by the court to ensure student
safety.
(B) The verbal notification under subdivision (g)(3)(A) of
this section may be provided only to assistant principals, counselors,
resource officers, and the school employees who are primarily responsible for
the supervision of the juvenile or responsible for the learning environment
of the juvenile in the school district in which the juvenile is enrolled or
from which the juvenile receives services, and to bus drivers, if applicable.
(4) School officials that receive a court order and safety plan
or information concerning the court order and safety plan shall:
(A) Keep the information confidential and sign a statement
not to disclose the information concerning the court order and safety plan
that shall be kept by the superintendent or principal along with the court
order and safety plan;
(B) Keep the information confidential and not disclose the
information to any person not listed in subdivision (f)(1) of this section;
(C) Include the information in the juvenile's permanent
educational records; and
(D)(i) Treat the information and documentation contained
in the court order as education records under the Family Educational Rights
and Privacy Act, 20 U.S.C. § 1232g, as it existed on January 1, 2025.
(ii) A school official shall not release, disclose,
or make available the information and documentation contained in the court
order for inspection to any party except as permitted under the Family
Educational Rights and Privacy Act, 20 U.S.C. § 1232g.
(iii) However, the local education agency shall not
under any circumstance release, disclose, or make available for inspection to
the public, any college, university, institution of higher education,
vocational or trade school, or any past, present, or future employer of the
student the court order or safety plan portion of a student record.
(5) When a student attains an age that he or she is no longer
under the jurisdiction of the juvenile division of circuit court, the safety
211 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
plan and the order regarding the safety plan shall be removed from the
juvenile's permanent records at the local education agency and destroyed.

9-35-205. Commencement of proceedings.
(a) A proceeding shall be commenced by filing a petition with the
circuit clerk of the circuit court or by transfer by another court.
(b) A petition for:
(1) A family in need of services may be filed by:
(A) Any adult; or
(B) Any member ten (10) years of age or older of the
immediate family alleged to be in need of services; and
(2) Paternity establishment may be filed by:
(A) The biological mother;
(B) A putative father;
(C) A juvenile; or
(D) The Office of Child Support Enforcement.
(c) Concurrent with filing, a copy of any petition that requests that
the Department of Human Services take custody or provide family services
shall be mailed by the petitioner to the:
(1) Secretary of the Department of Human Services; and
(2) Attorney of the local Office of Chief Counsel of the
Department of Human Services.
(d) A fee, including without limitation a fee for filing, copying, or
faxing, including without limitation a fee for a petition for adoption and a
fee for a petition for guardianship, summons, or subpoena, shall not be
charged or collected by the circuit clerk or sheriff's office in a case
brought in the circuit court under this subchapter by a governmental entity
or nonprofit corporation, including without limitation:
(1) The prosecuting attorney;
(2) An attorney ad litem appointed in a dependency-neglect case;
or
(3) The Department of Human Services.
(e) If the circuit clerk's office has a fax machine, the circuit
clerk, in a case commenced in the circuit court under this subchapter by a
governmental entity or nonprofit corporation, including without limitation
the prosecuting attorney, an attorney ad litem appointed in a dependency-
212 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
neglect case, or the Department of Human Services, shall accept a facsimile
transmission of any papers filed under this subchapter as described in Rule 5
of the Arkansas Rules of Civil Procedure.

9-35-206. Required contents of petition.
(a) A petition brought under this subchapter shall set forth the
following:
(1)(A) The name, address, gender, Social Security number, and
date of birth of each juvenile subject of the petition.
(B) A single petition shall be filed that includes all
siblings who are subjects of the petition;
(2) The name and address of each of the parents or the surviving
parent of the juvenile or juveniles;
(3) The name and address of the person, agency, or institution
having custody of the juvenile or juveniles;
(4) The name and address of any other person, agency, or
institution having a claim to custody or guardianship of the juvenile or
juveniles; and
(5) In a paternity hearing, the name and address of both the
putative father and the presumed legal father, if any.
(b) If the name or address of anyone listed under subsection (a) of
this section is unknown or cannot be ascertained by the petitioner with
reasonable diligence, this fact shall be alleged in the petition and the
petition shall not be dismissed for insufficiency, but the court shall direct
appropriate measures to find and give notice to the persons.
(c)(1) All persons named under subdivisions (a)(1)-(3) of this section
shall be made defendants and served as required by this subchapter.
(2) However, in a paternity action, the petitioner shall name as
defendants only the mother, the putative father, or the presumed legal
father, if any.
(d)(1) A petition shall set forth the following in plain and concise
words:
(A) The facts that, if proven, would bring the family or
juvenile within the court's jurisdiction;
(B) The section of this subchapter upon which jurisdiction
for the petition is based; and
213 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(C) The relief requested by the petitioner.
(2)(A) The petition shall be supported by an affidavit of facts.
(B) A supporting affidavit of facts shall not be required
for a paternity petition.
(C) The supporting affidavit of facts shall include known
information regarding the fitness of the noncustodial parent to be considered
for custody, placement, or family time with the juvenile.

9-35-207. Notification to defendants.
The following persons shall be served with a copy of the petition and
either a notice of hearing or an order to appear in the manner provided by
the Arkansas Rules of Civil Procedure:
(1) A juvenile defendant ten (10) years of age or older;
(2) Any person having care and control of the juveniles listed
in the case; and
(3) All adult defendants.

9-35-208. Right to counsel.
(a) In a family in need of services cases, a juvenile and his or her
parent, guardian, or custodian shall be advised by the law enforcement
official taking a juvenile into custody, by the intake officer at the initial
intake interview, and by the court at the juvenile's first appearance before
the circuit court that the juvenile has the right to be represented at all
stages of the proceedings by counsel.
(b) If counsel is not retained for the juvenile or it does not appear
that counsel will be retained, counsel shall be appointed to represent the
juvenile at all appearances before the court unless the right to counsel is
waived as set forth in § 9-35-411.
(c) In a proceeding in which the judge determines that there is a
reasonable likelihood that the proceeding may result in the juvenile's
commitment to an institution in which the freedom of the juvenile would be
curtailed and counsel has not been retained for the juvenile, the court shall
appoint counsel for the juvenile.
(d) Appointment of counsel shall be made at a time sufficiently in
advance of the court appearance to allow adequate preparation by appointed
counsel and adequate consultation between the appointed counsel and the
214 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
client.

9-35-209. Diversion — Conditions — Agreement — Completion —
Definition.
(a) If the prosecuting attorney, after consultation with the intake
officer, determines that a diversion of a family in need of services case is
in the best interest of the juvenile and the community, the officer with the
consent of the petitioner, juvenile, and his or her parent, guardian, or
custodian may attempt to make a satisfactory diversion of a case.
(b) In addition to the requirements under subsection (a) of this
section, a diversion of a case is subject to the following conditions:
(1) The juvenile has admitted his or her involvement in a family
in need of services act for a family in need of services diversion;
(2) The intake officer advises the juvenile and his or her
parent, guardian, or custodian that they have the right to refuse a diversion
of the case and demand the filing of a petition and a formal adjudication;
(3) Any diversion agreement is entered into voluntarily and
intelligently by the juvenile with the advice of his or her attorney or by
the juvenile with the consent of a parent, guardian, or custodian if the
juvenile is not represented by counsel;
(4) The diversion agreement provides for the supervision of a
juvenile or the referral of the juvenile to a public or private agency for
services not to exceed six (6) months;
(5) All other terms of a diversion agreement do not exceed nine
(9) months; and
(6) The juvenile and his or her parent, guardian, or custodian
shall have the right to terminate the diversion agreement at any time and to
request the filing of a petition and a formal adjudication.
(c)(1) The terms of the diversion agreement shall:
(A) Be in writing in simple, ordinary, and understandable
language;
(B) State that the agreement was entered into voluntarily by
the juvenile;
(C) Name the attorney or other person who advised the
juvenile upon the juvenile's entering into the agreement; and
(D) Be signed by all parties to the agreement and by the
215 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
prosecuting attorney if it is a family in need of services case pursuant to §
6-18-222.
(2) A copy of the diversion agreement shall be given to the
juvenile, the counsel for the juvenile, the parent, guardian, or custodian,
and the intake officer, who shall retain the copy in the case file.
(d) A diversion agreement shall be:
(1) Implemented by all juvenile courts based on validated
assessment tools; and
(2) Used to provide for:
(A) Nonjudicial probation under the supervision of the
intake officer or probation officer for a period during which the juvenile
may be required to comply with specified conditions concerning his or her
conduct and activities;
(B) Participation in a court-approved program of education,
counseling, or treatment;
(C) Participation in a court-approved teen court;
(D) Participation in a juvenile drug court program;
(E) Enrollment in the Regional Educational Career
Alternative School System for Adjudicated Youth; and
(F)(i) Payment of restitution to the victim.
(ii) Payments of restitution under subdivision
(d)(2)(F)(i) of this section shall be paid under § 16-13-326.
(e)(1) If a diversion of a complaint has been made, a petition based
upon the events out of which the original complaint arose may be filed only
during the period for which the agreement was entered into.
(2) If a petition is filed within this period, the juvenile's
compliance with all proper and reasonable terms of the agreement shall be
grounds for dismissal of the petition by the court.
(f) The diversion agreement may be terminated and the petitioner in a
family in need of services case may file a petition if at any time during the
agreement period:
(1) The juvenile or his or her parent, guardian, or custodian
declines to further participate in the diversion process;
(2) The juvenile fails, without reasonable excuse, to attend a
scheduled conference;
(3) The juvenile appears unable or unwilling to benefit from the
216 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
diversion process; or
(4) The intake officer becomes apprised of new or additional
information that indicates that further efforts at diversion would not be in
the best interests of the juvenile or society.
(g) Upon the satisfactory completion of the diversion period:
(1) The juvenile shall be dismissed without further proceedings;
(2) The intake officer shall furnish written notice of the
dismissal to the juvenile and his or her parent, guardian, or custodian; and
(3) The complaint and the agreement, and all references to the
complaint and the agreement, may be expunged by the court from the juvenile's
file.
(h)(1) A juvenile intake or probation officer may charge a diversion
fee only after review of an affidavit of financial means and a determination
of the juvenile's or the juvenile's parent's, guardian's, or custodian's
ability to pay the fee.
(2) The diversion fee shall not exceed twenty dollars ($20.00)
per month to the juvenile division of circuit court.
(3) The court may direct that the fees be collected by the
juvenile officer, sheriff, or court clerk for the county in which the fees
are charged.
(4) The officer designated by the court to collect diversion fees
shall maintain receipts and account for all incoming fees and shall deposit
the fees at least weekly into the county treasury of the county where the
fees are collected and in which diversion services are provided.
(5) The diversion fees shall be deposited into the account with
the juvenile service fees under § 16-13-326.
(i)(1) In judicial districts having more than one (1) county, the judge
may designate the treasurer of one (1) of the counties in the district as the
depository of all juvenile fees collected in the district.
(2) The treasurer so designated by the court shall maintain a
separate account of the juvenile fees collected and expended in each county
in the district.
(3) Money remaining at the end of the fiscal year shall not
revert to any other fund but shall carry over to the next fiscal year.
(4) The funds derived from the collection of diversion fees shall
be used by agreement of the judge or judges of the circuit court designated
217 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
to hear juvenile cases in their district plan pursuant to Supreme Court
Administrative Order No. 14, originally issued on April 6, 2001, and the
quorum court of the county to provide services and supplies to juveniles at
the discretion of the juvenile division of circuit court.
(j)(1) The Department of Human Services shall develop a statewide
referral protocol for helping to coordinate the delivery of services to
sexually exploited children.
(2) As used in this section, “sexually exploited child” means a
person less than eighteen (18) years of age who has been subject to sexual
exploitation because the person:
(A) Is a victim of trafficking of persons under § 5-18-103;
(B) Is a victim of child sex trafficking under 18 U.S.C. §
1591, as it existed on January 1, 2013; or
(C) Engages in an act of prostitution under § 5-70-102 or
sexual solicitation under § 5-70-103.

9-35-210. Hearings — Generally.
(a) The defendant need not file a written responsive pleading in order
to be heard by the court.
(b)(1) At the time set for hearing, the court may:
(A) Proceed to hear the case only if the juvenile is
present or excused for good cause by the court; or
(B) Continue the case upon determination that the presence
of an adult defendant is necessary.
(2) Upon determining that a necessary party is not present
before the court, the court may issue an order:
(A) For contempt if the juvenile was served with an order
to appear; or
(B) To appear, with a time and place set by the court for
hearing, if the juvenile was served with a notice of hearing.
(c)(1) Hearings under this subchapter shall be in a court of record.
(2) A record of all proceedings shall be kept in the same manner
as other proceedings of circuit court and in accordance with rules
promulgated by the Supreme Court.
(d)(1) Unless otherwise indicated, the Arkansas Rules of Evidence
shall apply to hearings under this subchapter.
218 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(2)(A) The court may order that the father, mother, and child
submit to scientific testing for drug or alcohol abuse upon motion of any
party.
(B) A written report of the test results prepared by the
person conducting the test, or by a person under whose supervision or
direction the test and analysis have been performed, certified by an
affidavit subscribed and sworn to by him or her before a notary public, may
be introduced in evidence without calling the person as a witness unless a
motion challenging the test procedures or results has been filed within
thirty (30) days before the hearing and bond is posted in an amount
sufficient to cover the costs of the person's appearance to testify.
(C)(i) If contested, documentation of the chain of custody
of a sample taken from a test subject shall be verified by affidavit of one
(1) person's witnessing the procedure or extraction, packaging, and mailing
of the sample and by one (1) person's signing for the sample at the place
where the sample is subject to the testing procedure.
(ii) Submission of the affidavits along with the
submission of the test results shall be competent evidence to establish the
chain of custody of that specimen.
(D) Whenever a court orders scientific testing for drug or
alcohol abuse and one (1) of the parties refuses to submit to the testing,
that refusal shall be disclosed at trial and may be considered civil contempt
of court.
(e) Except as otherwise provided in this subchapter, the Arkansas
Rules of Civil Procedure shall apply to all proceedings.
(f) All parties shall have the right to compel attendance of witnesses
in accordance with the Arkansas Rules of Civil Procedure and the Arkansas
Rules of Criminal Procedure.
(g)(1) The petitioner in a proceeding shall bear the burden of
presenting the case at a hearing.
(2) The burden of proof that shall apply in a proceeding brought
under this subchapter is proof by a preponderance of the evidence.
(h)(1)(A) Except as provided by this section, all hearings involving
an allegation or report of child maltreatment shall be closed.
(B)(i) A member of the General Assembly may attend any
hearing held under this subchapter, including without limitation a closed
219 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
hearing, unless the court excludes the member of the General Assembly based
on the:
(a) Best interest of the child; or
(b) Court's authority under the Arkansas Rules
of Civil Procedure or the Arkansas Rules of Evidence.
(ii) Except as otherwise provided by law, a member
of the General Assembly who attends a hearing in accordance with subdivision
(h)(1)(B)(i) of this section shall not disclose information obtained during
his or her attendance at the hearing.
(C)(i)(a) A Child Welfare Ombudsman may attend a hearing
held under this subchapter, including without limitation a closed hearing.
(b) However, a court may exclude the Child
Welfare Ombudsman from a hearing if:
(1) It is in the best interest of the
child; or
(2) The reason for the exclusion is
based on the authority of the court under the Arkansas Rules of Civil
Procedure or the Arkansas Rules of Evidence.
(ii) Unless otherwise allowed by law, the Child
Welfare Ombudsman shall not disclose information that he or she obtains
through his or her attendance at a hearing held under this subchapter.
(D) All other hearings may be closed within the discretion
of the court.
(i)(1) A court shall set a hearing to address the entry of a written
order if:
(A) The written order is not provided to the court for
entry within the time specified under this subchapter; and
(B) A party files a motion for a hearing to address the
entry of the written order.
(2)(A) The court shall conduct a hearing to address the entry of
the written order within thirty (30) days from the date on which the motion
for a hearing to address the entry of the written order is filed.
(B) A hearing to address the entry of a written order may
be the next scheduled hearing in the proceeding if the hearing to address the
entry of the written order is being held within thirty (30) days from the
date on which the motion for a hearing to address the entry of the written
220 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
order is filed.
(C) The court is not required to conduct a hearing to
address the entry of a written order if the written order is submitted to the
court.
(3) The court shall reassign the preparation of the written
order as needed.

9-35-211. Adjudication hearing.
(a) An adjudication hearing shall be held to determine whether the
allegations in a petition are substantiated by the proof.
(b)(1) On a motion of the court or any party, the court may continue
the adjudication hearing up to sixty (60) days after the removal for good
cause shown.
(2) The court may continue an adjudication hearing beyond the
sixty-day limitation provided in subdivision (b)(1) of this section in
extraordinary circumstances.
(3) As used in subdivision (b)(2) of this section,
“extraordinary circumstances” includes without limitation the following
circumstances:
(A) The Supreme Court orders the suspension of in-person
court proceedings; and
(B) One (1) of the following has occurred:
(i) The President of the United States has declared
a national emergency; or
(ii) The Governor has declared a state of emergency
or a statewide public health emergency.

9-35-212. Disposition — Family in need of services — Generally.
(a) If a family is found to be in need of services, the circuit court
may enter an order making any of the following dispositions:
(1)(A) To order family services to rehabilitate the juvenile and
his or her family.
(B)(i) If the Department of Human Services is the provider
for family services, the family services shall be limited to those services
available by the department's community-based providers or contractors,
excluding the contractors with the Division of Children and Family Services
221 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
and services of the department for which the family applies and is determined
eligible.
(ii) To prevent removal when the department is the
provider for family services, the court shall make written findings outlining
how each service is intended to prevent removal;
(2)(A) If it is in the best interest of the juvenile, transfer
custody of juvenile family members to another licensed agency responsible for
the care of juveniles or to a relative or other individual.
(B) If it is in the best interest of the juvenile and
because of acts or omissions by the parent, guardian, or custodian, removal
is necessary to protect the juvenile's health and safety, transfer custody to
the department.
(C) A juvenile in the custody of the department is
“awaiting foster care placement”, as that term is used in the definition of
“homeless children and youths” in the McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act,
42 U.S.C. § 11434a(2), as it existed on January 1, 2025, if the juvenile:
(i) Is placed in a shelter, facility, or other
short-term placement with a plan of moving the juvenile within ninety (90)
days;
(ii) Is transferred to an emergency placement to
protect the juvenile's health or welfare;
(iii) Is placed in a provisional foster home as
defined under § 9-28-402;
(iv) Has experienced three (3) or more placements
within a twelve-month period; or
(v) Is placed in a regular foster home or other
placement that is not directly related to the permanency goal identified in
the case plan required under § 9-28-111;
(3)(A) Order that the parent, both parents, or the guardian of
the juvenile attend a court-ordered parental responsibility training program,
if available.
(B) The court may make reasonable orders requiring proof
of completion of such a training program within a certain time period and
payment of a fee covering the cost of the training program;
(4) Place the juvenile on residential detention with electronic
monitoring in the juvenile's home;
222 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(5) Order the juvenile, his or her parent, both parents, or
guardian to perform court-approved volunteer service in the community
designed to contribute to the rehabilitation of the juvenile or the ability
of the parent or guardian to provide proper parental care and supervision of
the juvenile, not to exceed one hundred sixty (160) hours;
(6)(A) Place the juvenile on supervision terms, including
without limitation requiring the juvenile to attend school or make
satisfactory progress toward attaining a high school equivalency diploma
approved by the Adult Education Section, requiring the juvenile to observe a
curfew, and prohibiting the juvenile from possessing or using any alcohol or
illegal drugs.
(B) The supervision terms shall be:
(i) In writing; and
(ii) Given to the juvenile and explained to the
juvenile and to his or her parent, guardian, or custodian by the juvenile
intake or probation officer in a conference immediately following the
disposition hearing;
(7)(A) Order a fine not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) to
be paid by the juvenile, a parent, both parents, a guardian, or a custodian
when the juvenile exceeds the number of excessive unexcused absences provided
in the student attendance policy of the district or the Career Education and
Workforce Development Board.
(B) The purpose of the penalty set forth in this section
is to impress upon the parents, guardians, or persons in loco parentis the
importance of school or adult education attendance, and the penalty is not to
be used primarily as a source of revenue.
(C)(i) In all cases in which a fine is ordered, the court
shall determine the parent's, guardian's, or custodian's ability to pay for
the fine.
(ii) In making its determination, the court shall
consider the following factors:
(a) The financial ability of the parent, both
parents, the guardian, or the custodian to pay for such services;
(b) The past efforts of the parent, both
parents, the guardian, or the custodian to correct the conditions that
resulted in the need for family services; and
223 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(c) Any other factors that the court deems
relevant.
(D) When practicable and appropriate, the court may
utilize mandatory attendance to such programs as well as community service
requirements in lieu of a fine;
(8) Assess a court cost of no more than thirty-five dollars
($35.00) to be paid by the juvenile, his or her parent, both parents, the
guardian, or the custodian; and
(9) Order a juvenile service fee not to exceed twenty dollars
($20.00) per month to be paid by the juvenile, his or her parent, both
parents, the guardian, or the custodian.
(b) The court may provide that any violation of its orders shall
subject the parent, both parents, the juvenile, custodian, or guardian to
contempt sanctions.

9-35-213. Disposition — Family in need of services — Limitations —
Definitions.
(a) At least five (5) working days before ordering the Department of
Human Services, excluding community-based providers, to provide or pay for
family services, the circuit court shall fax a written notice of intent to
the Secretary of the Department of Human Services and to the attorney of the
local Office of Chief Counsel of the Department of Human Services.
(b) At any hearing in which the department is ordered to provide
family services, the court shall provide the department with the opportunity
to be heard.
(c) Failure to provide at least five (5) working days' notice to the
department renders any part of the order pertaining to the department void.
(d)(1) For purposes of this section, the court shall not specify a
particular provider for placement or family services when the department is
the payor or provider.
(2)(A) The court may order a child to remain in a placement if
the court finds the placement is in the best interest of the child after
hearing evidence from all parties.
(B) A court may also order a child to be placed into a
licensed or approved placement after a hearing in which the court makes a
finding that it is in the best interest of the child based on bona fide
224 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
consideration of evidence and recommendations from all the parties.
(e)(1) In all cases in which family services are ordered, the court
shall determine a parent's, guardian's, or custodian's ability to pay, in
whole or in part, for these family services.
(2) The determination under subdivision (e)(1) of this section
and the evidence supporting the determination shall be made in writing in the
order ordering family services.
(3) If the court determines that the parent, guardian, or
custodian is able to pay, in whole or part, for the family services, the
court shall enter a written order setting forth the amount the parent,
guardian, or custodian can pay for the family services ordered and ordering
the parent, guardian, or custodian to pay the amount periodically to the
provider from whom family services are received.
(4) As used in this subsection:
(A) “Parent, guardian, or custodian” means the individual
or individuals from whom custody was removed; and
(B) “Periodically” means no more than one (1) time per
month.
(5) In making its determination under this subsection, the court
shall consider the following factors:
(A) The financial ability of the parent, both parents, the
guardian, or the custodian to pay for the family services;
(B) The past efforts of the parent, both parents, the
guardian, or the custodian to correct the conditions that resulted in the
need for family services; and
(C) Any other factors the court deems relevant.
(f) Custody of a juvenile may be transferred to a relative or other
individual only after a home study of the placement is conducted by the
department or a licensed social worker who is approved to do home studies and
submitted to the court in writing and the court determines that the placement
is in the best interest of the juvenile.
(g) Custody of a juvenile shall not be transferred to the department
if a delinquency petition or case is converted to a family in need of
services petition or case.
(h) A court shall not commit a juvenile found solely in criminal
contempt to the Division of Youth Services.
225 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(i) For purposes of this section, the court shall not order the
department to expend or forward Social Security benefits for which the
department is payee.

9-35-214. Limitations on detention.
A juvenile who is alleged to be or who has been adjudicated either
dependent-neglected or a member of a family in need of services shall not be
placed or detained in a secure detention facility, in a facility utilized for
the detention of alleged or adjudicated delinquent juveniles, or in a
facility utilized for the detention of adults held for, charged with, or
convicted of a crime except:
(1)(A) A juvenile may be held in a juvenile detention facility
when he or she has been away from home for more than twenty-four (24) hours
and when the parent, guardian, or other person contacted lives beyond a
fifty-mile driving distance or out of state.
(B)(i) The juvenile may be held in custody in a juvenile
detention facility for purposes of identification, processing, or arranging
for release or transfer to an alternative facility.
(ii) The holding shall be limited to the minimum time
necessary to complete these actions and shall not occur in any facility
utilized for incarceration of adults.
(C)(i) A juvenile held under this subdivision (1) shall be
separated from detained juveniles charged or held for delinquency.
(ii) A juvenile shall not be held under this
subdivision (1) for more than six (6) hours if the parent, guardian, or other
person contacted lives in the state or twenty-four (24) hours, excluding
weekends and holidays, if the parent, guardian, or other person contacted
lives out of state; and
(2)(A) An adjudicated-family-in-need-of-services juvenile may be
held in a juvenile detention facility when the court finds that the juvenile
violated a valid court order.
(B)(i) For the purposes of this subdivision (2), a valid
court order shall include any order of a circuit court regarding a juvenile
who has been brought before the court and made subject to a court order.
(ii) The juvenile who is the subject of the order is
entitled to full due process rights.
226 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320

9-35-215. Six-month reviews required.
(a)(1) The court shall review every case of family in need of services
when:
(A) A juvenile is placed by the court in the custody of the
Department of Human Services or in another out-of-home placement until there
is a permanent order of custody, guardianship, or other permanent placement
for the juvenile; or
(B) A juvenile is returned to the parent from whom the
juvenile was removed, another fit parent, guardian, or custodian and the
court has not discontinued orders for family services.
(2)(A) The first six-month review shall be held no later than six
(6) months from the date of the original out-of-home placement of the
juvenile and shall be scheduled by the court following the adjudication and
disposition hearing.
(B) It shall be reviewed every six (6) months thereafter
until permanency is achieved.
(3) A six-month review hearing shall not be required for a
juvenile who:
(A) Is over eighteen (18) years of age; and
(B) Has elected to remain in extended foster care or to
return to extended foster care under § 9-35-302.
(b) The court may require the cases under this section to be reviewed
before the sixth-month review hearing, and the court shall announce the date,
time, and place of the hearing.
(c) At any time during the pendency of any case of dependency-neglect
or family in need of services in which an out-of-home placement has occurred,
any party may request the court to review the case, and the party requesting
the hearing shall provide reasonable notice to all parties.
(d) At any time during the course of a case, the department, the
attorney ad litem, or the court can request a hearing on whether or not
reunification services should be terminated under § 9-35-335.
(e)(1) In each case in which a juvenile has been placed in an out-of-
home placement, the court shall conduct a hearing to review the case
sufficiently to determine the future status of the juvenile based upon the
best interest of the juvenile.
227 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(2)(A) The court shall determine and include in its orders the
following:
(i) Whether the case plan, services, and placement meet
the special needs and best interest of the juvenile, with the juvenile's
health, safety, and educational needs specifically addressed;
(ii) Whether the state has made reasonable efforts to
provide family services;
(iii) Whether the parent or parents or person from whom
custody was removed has demonstrated progress toward the goals of the case
plan and whether completion of the goals has benefited the parent in
remedying the issues that prevent the safe return of the juvenile;
(iv) Whether the case plan is moving toward an
appropriate permanency plan under § 9-35-324 for the juvenile;
(v) Whether the visitation plan is appropriate for the
juvenile, the parent or parents, and any siblings, if separated; and
(vi)(a) Whether the juvenile should be returned to his
or her parent or parents and whether or not the juvenile's health and safety
can be protected by his or her parent or parents if returned home, either
permanently or for a trial placement.
(b) At any time the court determines that the
health and safety of the juvenile can be adequately protected and it is in
the best interest of the juvenile, the court shall return the juvenile to a
parent or parents from whom custody was removed.
(B)(i) The court may order any study, evaluation, or post-
disposition report, if needed.
(ii) All studies, evaluations, or post-disposition
reports shall be provided in writing to all parties and counsel at least two
(2) days before the review hearing.
(iii) All parties shall be given a fair opportunity to
controvert any part of a study, evaluation, or post-disposition report.
(3)(A) In making its findings, the court shall consider the
following:
(i) The extent of compliance with the case plan,
including without limitation a review of the department's care for the
health, safety, and education of the juvenile while he or she has been in an
out-of-home placement;
228 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(ii) The extent of progress that has been made toward
alleviating or mitigating the causes of the out-of-home placement;
(iii) Whether the juvenile should be returned to his or
her parent or parents and whether or not the juvenile's health and safety can
be protected by his or her parent or parents if returned home; and
(iv) An appropriate permanency plan under § 9-35-324
for the juvenile, including concurrent planning.
(B) Incompletion of the case plan under subdivision
(e)(3)(A)(i) of this section is an insufficient reason by itself to deny the
juvenile's return to the family home.
(f) Each six-month review hearing shall be completed, and the written
order under subsection (e) of this section shall be filed by the court or by
a party or a party's attorney as designated by the court and distributed to
the parties within thirty (30) days of the date of the hearing or before the
next hearing, whichever is sooner.

9-35-216. Proceedings concerning juveniles for whom paternity not
established.
(a) Absent an order of a circuit court or another court of competent
jurisdiction to the contrary, the biological mother, whether adult or minor,
of a juvenile for whom paternity has not been established is:
(1) Deemed to be the natural guardian of that juvenile; and
(2) Is entitled to the care, custody, and control of that
juvenile.
(b) The biological mother, the putative father, the juvenile himself
or herself, or the Office of Child Support Enforcement may bring an action to
establish paternity or support of a juvenile for whom paternity has not been
established.
(c)(1) If the juvenile is not born when the parties appear before the
court, the court may hear evidence and issue temporary orders and findings
pending the birth of the juvenile.
(2) If the final order is contrary to the temporary one, the
court shall render judgment for the amount paid under the temporary order
against the petitioner if the petitioner was the biological mother.
(3) If the mother dies before the final order, the action may be
revived in the name of the juvenile, and the mother's testimony at the
229 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
temporary hearing may be introduced in the final hearing.
(d)(1) Upon an adjudication by the court that the putative father is
the father of the juvenile, the court shall follow the same guidelines,
procedures, and requirements as established by the laws of this state
applicable to child support orders and judgments entered upon divorce.
(2) The court may award court costs and attorney's fees.
(e)(1) If paternity has been established in a court of competent
jurisdiction, a father may petition the court in the county where the
juvenile resides for custody of the juvenile.
(2) The court may award custody to a father who has had
paternity established if the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence
that:
(A) He is a fit parent to raise the juvenile;
(B) He has assumed his responsibilities toward the
juvenile by providing care, supervision, protection, and financial support
for the juvenile; and
(C) It is in the best interest of the juvenile to award
custody to the father.
(f) At the request of either party in a paternity action, the trial
court shall direct that the putative father, biological mother, and juvenile
submit to one (1) or more blood tests or other scientific examinations or
tests, including deoxyribonucleic acid typing, to:
(1) Determine whether or not the putative father can be excluded
as being the father of the juvenile; and
(2) Establish the probability of paternity if the test does not
exclude the putative father.
(g) The tests under subsection (f) of this section shall be made by a
duly qualified physician or physicians, or by another duly qualified person
or persons, not to exceed three (3), to be appointed by the court.
(h)(1) The results of the tests under subsection (f) of this section
shall be receivable in evidence.
(2)(A)(i) A written report of the test results by the duly
qualified expert performing the test, or by a duly qualified expert under
whose supervision and direction the test and analysis have been performed,
certified by an affidavit duly subscribed and sworn to by the expert before a
notary public, may be introduced in evidence in illegitimacy actions without
230 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
calling the expert as a witness.
(ii) If either party desires to question the expert,
the party shall have the expert subpoenaed within a reasonable time before
trial.
(B) If the results of the paternity tests establish a
ninety-five percent (95%) or more probability of inclusion that the putative
father is the biological father of the juvenile and after corroborating
testimony of the mother in regard to access during the probable period of
conception, this shall constitute a prima facie case of establishment of
paternity and the burden of proof shall shift to the putative father to rebut
such proof.
(3) The experts shall be subject to cross-examination by both
parties after the court has caused them to disclose their findings.
(i) Whenever the court orders the blood tests to be taken and one (1)
of the parties refuses to submit to the test, that fact shall be disclosed
upon the trial unless good cause is shown to the contrary.
(j) The costs of the test and witness fees shall be taxed by the court
as other costs in the case.
(k) Whenever it shall be relevant to the prosecution or the defense in
a paternity action, blood tests that exclude third parties as the father of
the juvenile shall be the same as set out in subsections (f) and (g) of this
section.
(l) The refusal of a party to submit to a genetic or other ordered
test is admissible at a hearing to determine paternity only as to the
credibility of the party.
(m) If a male witness offers testimony indicating that his act of
intercourse with the mother may have resulted in the conception of the
juvenile, the court may require the witness to submit to genetic or other
tests to determine whether he is the juvenile's father.

9-35-217. Appeals.
(a) All appeals from juvenile cases shall be made to the Supreme Court
or to the Court of Appeals in the time and manner provided for appeals in the
Arkansas Rules of Appellate Procedure.

9-35-218. Duties and responsibilities of custodian.
231 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(a) A person or agency appointed as the custodian of a juvenile in a
proceeding under this subchapter shall:
(1) Care for and maintain the juvenile; and
(2) See that the juvenile is:
(A) Protected;
(B) Properly trained and educated; and
(C) Has the opportunity to learn a trade, occupation, or
profession.
(b) The person or agency appointed as the custodian of a juvenile in a
proceeding under this subchapter has the right to obtain medical care for the
juvenile, including giving consent to specific medical, dental, or mental
health treatments and procedures as required in the opinion of a duly
authorized or licensed physician, dentist, surgeon, or psychologist, whether
or not such care is rendered on an emergency, inpatient, or outpatient basis.
(c) The custodian has the right to enroll the juvenile in school upon
the presentation of an order of custody.
(d) The custodian has the right to obtain medical and school records
of any juvenile in his or her custody upon presentation of an order of
custody.
(e) Any agency appointed as the custodian of a juvenile has the right
to consent to the juvenile's travel on vacation or similar trips.
(f)(1) A person granted custody, guardianship, or adoption of any
juvenile in a proceeding under or arising out of a dependency-neglect action
under this subchapter shall ensure that the juvenile is not returned to the
care or supervision of any person from whom the child was removed or any
person the court has specifically ordered not to have care, supervision, or
custody of the juvenile.
(2) This section shall not be construed to prohibit these
placements if the person who has been granted custody, guardianship, or
adoption obtains a court order to that effect from the juvenile division of
circuit court that made the award of custody, guardianship, or adoption.
(3) Failure to comply with subdivision (f)(1) of this section is
punishable as a criminal offense under § 5-26-502(a)(3).
(g)(1) The court shall not split custody.
(2) As used in this section, "split custody" means granting
legal custody to one (1) person or agency and physical custody to another
232 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
person or agency.

9-35-219. Court costs, fees, and fines.
(a) The juvenile division of the circuit court may order the following
court costs, fees, and fines to be paid by adjudicated defendants to the
circuit court juvenile division fund as provided under § 16-13-326:
(1) The court may assess an adjudicated family in need of
services court costs not to exceed thirty-five dollars ($35.00) as provided
under § 9-35-212;
(2) The court may order a juvenile service fee for an
adjudicated family in need of services not to exceed twenty dollars ($20.00)
per month as provided under § 9-35-212;
(3) The court may order a fine for an adjudicated family in
need of services of not more than five hundred dollars ($500) as provided
under § 9-35-423; and
(4) A juvenile intake or probation officer may charge a
diversion fee limited to no more than twenty dollars ($20.00) per month as
provided under § 9-35-417.
(b) The court shall direct that the juvenile division court costs and
fees be collected, maintained, and accounted for in the same manner as
juvenile probation and juvenile services fees are collected, maintained, and
accounted for under § 16-13-326.

Subchapter 3 — Dependency and Dependency-Neglect

9-35-301. Purposes — Construction.
This subchapter shall be liberally construed to the end that its
purposes may be carried out to:
(1) Assure that all juveniles brought to the attention of the
courts receive the guidance, care, and control, preferably in each juvenile's
own home when the juvenile's health and safety are not at risk, that will
best serve the emotional, mental, and physical welfare of the juvenile and
the best interest of the state;
(2)(A) Preserve and strengthen the juvenile's family ties when it
is in the best interest of the juvenile;
(B) Protect a juvenile by considering the juvenile's health
233 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
and safety as the paramount concerns in determining whether or not to remove
the juvenile from the custody of his or her parents or custodians, removing
the juvenile only when the safety and protection of the public cannot
adequately be safeguarded without such removal;
(C) When a juvenile is removed from his or her own family,
secure for him or her custody, care, and discipline with primary emphasis on
ensuring the health and safety of the juvenile while in the out-of-home
placement; and
(D) Assure, in all cases in which a juvenile must be
permanently removed from the custody of his or her parents, that the juvenile
be placed in an approved family home and be made a member of the family by
adoption; and
(3) Provide means through which the provisions of this subchapter are
executed and enforced and in which the parties are assured a fair hearing and
their constitutional and other legal rights recognized and enforced.

9-35-302. Jurisdiction.
(a)(1) The circuit court shall have exclusive original jurisdiction of
and shall be the sole court for the following proceedings governed by this
subchapter, including without limitation:
(A) Proceedings in which a juvenile is alleged to be
dependent or dependent-neglected from birth to eighteen (18) years of age,
except for the following:
(i)(a) A juvenile who has been adjudicated
dependent or dependent-neglected before eighteen (18) years of age may
request the court to continue jurisdiction over the juvenile until twenty-one
(21) years of age so long as the juvenile is:
(1) Completing secondary education or a
program leading to an equivalent credential;
(2) Enrolled in an institution providing
postsecondary or vocational education;
(3) Participating in a program or
activity designed to promote or remove barriers to employment;
(4) Employed for at least eighty (80)
hours per month; or
(5) Incapable of completing school or
234 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
work requirements due to a documented medical condition.
(b) The court shall retain jurisdiction only
if the juvenile meets the requirements of subdivision (a)(1)(A)(i)(a) of this
section or has a viable plan to meet the requirements.
(c) The court shall discontinue jurisdiction
only after a hearing to determine whether:
(1) The juvenile:
(A) Knowingly and voluntarily is
requesting to leave care;
(B) Has failed to meet the
requirements of subdivision (a)(1)(A)(i)(a) of this section; or
(C) Does not have a viable plan to
meet the requirements; and
(2) The Department of Human Services has
fully complied with § 9-28-114 or § 9-35-334; or
(ii) A juvenile may contact his or her attorney ad
litem to petition the court to return to the court's jurisdiction if the
juvenile:
(a) Was adjudicated dependent or dependent-
neglected;
(b) Was in foster care at eighteen (18) years
of age; and
(c) Left foster care but desires to submit to
the jurisdiction of the court before reaching twenty-one (21) years of age to
benefit from extended foster care;
(B) Proceedings in which emergency custody, protective
custody, or a seventy-two-hour hold has been taken on a juvenile under § 9-
35-308, § 9-35-309, § 9-35-409, or the Child Maltreatment Act, § 12-18-101 et
seq.;
(C) Proceedings for termination of parental rights for a
juvenile under this subchapter;
(D) Proceedings in which custody of a juvenile is
transferred to the department;
(E) Custodial placement proceedings filed by the
department; and
(F) Proceedings in dependency-neglect to set aside an
235 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
order of permanent custody upon the disruption of the placement.
(2) A juvenile shall not under any circumstance remain under
the court's jurisdiction past twenty-one (21) years of age.
(3)(A) When the department exercises protective custody of a
juvenile under the Child Maltreatment Act, § 12-18-101 et seq., files a
petition for an ex parte emergency order, or files a petition for dependency-
neglect concerning that juvenile, before or subsequent to the other legal
proceeding, a party to that petition may file a motion to transfer any other
legal proceeding concerning the juvenile to the court hearing the dependency-
neglect petition.
(B) Upon the filing of a motion, the other legal
proceeding shall be transferred to the court hearing the dependency-neglect
case.
(4) The court shall retain jurisdiction to issue orders of
adoption, interlocutory or final, if a juvenile is placed outside the State
of Arkansas.
(b) The assignment of a case to the juvenile division of the circuit
court shall be as described by the Supreme Court in Administrative Order
Number 14, originally issued on April 6, 2001.
(c) The circuit court shall have jurisdiction to hear proceedings
commenced in any court of this state or court of comparable jurisdiction of
another state that are transferred to it under the Uniform Child-Custody
Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act, § 9-19-101 et seq.
(d) Regardless of funding, a juvenile will be allowed to return to
foster care if:
(1) Evidence is presented to the circuit court that the
department failed to comply with § 9-28-114 and § 9-35-334 or if there is
evidence that the juvenile was coerced by an employee or agent of the
department to leave foster care; or
(2) The juvenile submits a request to reenter foster care in
writing or verbally to the department.
(e) If a juvenile over eighteen (18) years of age who is allowed
to reenter extended foster care fails to be engaged in or have a viable plan
to meet the requirements in subdivision (a)(1)(A)(i)(a) of this section or
have a viable plan to meet the requirements of subdivision (a)(1)(A)(i)(a) of
this section for more than sixty (60) days, the department may:
236 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(1) File a motion to terminate the jurisdiction of the court
and discharge the juvenile from foster care; or
(2) Provide notice to the juvenile not under the jurisdiction
of the court that his or her case will be closed and discharge the juvenile
from foster care.

9-35-303. Venue.
(a)(1)(A) Except as set forth in subdivisions (a)(2)-(4) of this
section, a proceeding under this subchapter shall be commenced in the circuit
court of the county in which the juvenile resides.
(B)(i) No dependency-neglect proceeding shall be dismissed
if a proceeding is filed in the incorrect county.
(ii) If the proceeding is filed in the incorrect
county, then the dependency-neglect proceeding shall be transferred to the
proper county upon discovery of the proper county of residence of the
juvenile.
(2) A proceeding may be commenced in the county where the alleged
act or omission occurred in:
(A) Nonsupport after establishment of paternity; or
(B) Dependency-neglect.
(3) A proceeding under the Uniform Child-Custody Jurisdiction
and Enforcement Act, § 9-19-101 et seq., shall be commenced in the court
provided by the Uniform Child-Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act, § 9-
19-101 et seq.
(4) An adoption or guardianship may be filed in a juvenile court
that has previously asserted continuing jurisdiction of the juvenile.
(5) A juvenile proceeding shall comply with § 16-13-210, except
detention hearings under § 9-35-420 and probable cause hearings under § 9-35-
310.
(b)(1) Following adjudication, the court may on its own motion or on
motion of any party transfer the case to the county of the juvenile's
residence when the provisions of the Uniform Child-Custody Jurisdiction and
Enforcement Act, § 9-19-101 et seq., do not apply.
(2) The court shall not transfer any case to another judicial
district prior to adjudication, excluding matters filed in the incorrect
venue, or any case in which a petition to terminate parental rights has been
237 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
filed unless the court has taken final action on the petition.
(c)(1) Before transferring a case to another venue, the court shall
contact the judge in the other venue to confirm that the judge in the other
venue will accept the transfer.
(2)(A) Upon confirmation that the judge will accept the transfer
of venue, the transferring judge shall enter the transfer order.
(B) The transfer order shall:
(i) Indicate that the judge has accepted the
transfer;
(ii) State the location of the court in the new
venue;
(iii) Set the time and date of the next hearing;
(iv) Be provided to all parties and attorneys to the
case; and
(v) Be transmitted immediately to the judge accepting
the transfer.
(3) The transferring court shall also ensure that all court
records are copied and sent to the judge in the new venue.

9-35-304. Confidentiality of records — Definition.
(a)(1) Except as provided in subdivision (a)(2) of this section, all
records may be closed and confidential within the discretion of the circuit
court.
(2) Adoption records, including any part of a dependency-neglect
record that includes adoption records, shall be closed and confidential as
provided in the Revised Uniform Adoption Act, § 9-9-201 et seq.
(b)(1) The court:
(A) May expunge other juvenile records at any time; and
(B) Shall expunge all the records of a juvenile upon his
or her twenty-first birthday in a dependency-neglect case.
(2) For purposes of this section, “expunge” means to destroy.
(c) This section does not apply to nor restrict the use or publication
of statistics, data, or other materials that summarize or refer to any
records, reports, statements, notes, or other information in the aggregate
and that do not refer to or disclose the identity of any juvenile in any
proceeding when used only for the purpose of research and study.
238 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(d) Records of proceedings under this subchapter and the records of an
investigation that is conducted when the alleged offender is an adult and
relates to an offense that occurred when the alleged offender was a juvenile
shall be confidential and shall not be subject to disclosure under the
Freedom of Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq., unless authorized by
a written order of the juvenile division of circuit court.
(e) Information regarding proceedings under this subchapter shall be
confidential unless the exchange of information is:
(1) For the purpose of obtaining services for the juvenile,
to ensure school safety, or to ensure public safety;
(2) Reasonably necessary to achieve one (1) or more purposes;
and
(3) Under a written order by the circuit court.
(f)(1) The information may be given only to the following persons:
(A) A school counselor;
(B) A juvenile court probation officer or caseworker;
(C) A law enforcement officer;
(D) A spiritual representative designated by the juvenile
or his or her parents or legal guardian;
(E) A Department of Human Services caseworker;
(F) A community-based provider designated by the court,
the school, or the parent or legal guardian of the juvenile;
(G) A Department of Health representative;
(H) The juvenile's attorney ad litem or other court-
appointed special advocate; or
(I)(i) A school superintendent or the designee of the
superintendent of the school district to which the juvenile transfers, in
which the juvenile is enrolled, or from which the juvenile receives services.
(ii) A school superintendent or the designee of the
superintendent of the school district in which the juvenile is enrolled or
from which the juvenile receives services shall immediately notify the
following persons of information he or she obtains under subdivision
(f)(1)(I)(i) of this section:
(a) The principal of the school;
and
(b) Any other school official with a legitimate
239 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
educational interest in the juvenile.
(2) The persons listed in subdivision (f)(1) of this section may
meet to exchange information, to discuss options for assistance to the
juvenile, to develop and implement a plan of action to assist the juvenile,
to ensure school safety, and to ensure public safety.
(3) The juvenile and his or her parent or legal guardian shall
be notified within a reasonable time before a meeting and may attend any
meeting of the persons referred to in subdivision (f)(1) of this section when
three (3) or more individuals meet to discuss assistance for the juvenile or
protection of the public due to the juvenile's behavior.
(4) Medical records, psychiatric records, psychological records,
and related information shall remain confidential unless the juvenile's
parent or legal guardian waives confidentiality in writing specifically
describing the records to be disclosed between the persons listed in
subdivision (f)(1) of this section and the purpose for the disclosure.
(5) A person listed in subdivision (f)(1) of this section who
exchanges any information referred to in this section may be held civilly
liable for disclosure of the information if the person does not comply with
limitations set forth in this section.
(g)(1) When a court orders that a juvenile have a safety plan that
restricts or requires supervised contact with another juvenile or juveniles
as it relates to student or school safety, the court shall direct that a copy
of the safety plan and a copy of the court order regarding the safety plan
concerning student or school safety be provided to the school superintendent
and principal of the school district:
(A) To which the juvenile transfers;
(B) In which the juvenile is enrolled; or
(C) From which the juvenile receives services.
(2) When a court order amends or removes any safety plan
outlined in subdivision (g)(1) of this section, the court shall direct that a
copy of the safety plan and a copy of the court order regarding the safety
plan, as it relates to student or school safety, be provided to the school
superintendent and principal of the school district:
(A) To which the juvenile transfers;
(B) In which the juvenile is enrolled; or
(C) From which the juvenile receives services.
240 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(3)(A) The superintendent or principal of the school district in
which the juvenile is enrolled or from which the juvenile receives services
shall provide verbal notification only to school officials who are necessary
to implement the safety plan as ordered by the court to ensure student
safety.
(B) The verbal notification under subdivision (g)(3)(A) of
this section may only be provided to assistant principals, counselors,
resource officers, and the school employees who are primarily responsible for
the supervision of the juvenile or responsible for the learning environment
of the juvenile in the school district in which the juvenile is enrolled or
from which the juvenile receives services, and to bus drivers, if applicable.
(4) A school official that receives a court order and safety plan
or information concerning the court order and safety plan shall:
(A) Keep the information confidential and sign a statement
not to disclose the information concerning the court order and safety plan
that shall be kept by the superintendent or principal along with the court
order and safety plan;
(B) Keep the information confidential and not disclose the
information to any person not listed in subdivision (f)(1) of this section;
(C) Include the information in the juvenile's permanent
educational records; and
(D)(i) Treat the information and documentation contained
in the court order as education records under the Family Educational Rights
and Privacy Act, 20 U.S.C. § 1232g, as it existed on January 1, 2025.
(ii) A school official shall not release, disclose,
or make available the information and documentation contained in the court
order for inspection to any party except as permitted under the Family
Educational Rights and Privacy Act, 20 U.S.C. § 1232g, as it existed on
January 1, 2025.
(iii) However, the local education agency shall not
under any circumstance release, disclose, or make available for inspection to
the public, any college, university, institution of higher education,
vocational or trade school, or any past, present, or future employer of the
student the court order or safety plan portion of a student record.
(5) When a student attains an age that he or she is no longer
under the jurisdiction of the juvenile division of circuit court, the safety
241 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
plan and the order regarding the safety plan shall be removed from the
juvenile's permanent records at the local education agency and destroyed.

9-35-305. Commencement of proceedings.
(a) A proceeding under this subchapter shall be commenced by filing a
petition with the circuit clerk of the circuit court or by transfer by
another court.
(b)(1) Only a law enforcement officer, prosecuting attorney, the
Department of Human Services or its designee, or a dependency-neglect
attorney ad litem employed by or contracting with the Administrative Office
of the Courts may file a dependency-neglect petition seeking ex parte
emergency relief.
(2) A petition for dependency-neglect may be filed by any adult.
(3) A petition for paternity establishment may be filed by:
(A) The biological mother;
(B) A putative father;
(C) A juvenile; or
(D) The Office of Child Support Enforcement.
(c) Concurrent with filing, a copy of any petition that requests that
the Department of Human Services take custody or provide family services
shall be mailed to:
(1) The Secretary of the Department of Human Services; and
(2) The attorney of the local Office of Chief Counsel of the
Department of Human Services by the petitioner.
(d) No fee, including without limitation a fee for filing, copying, or
faxing, including petitions for adoption, petitions for guardianships,
summons, or subpoenas, shall be charged or collected by the circuit clerk or
sheriff's office in cases brought in the circuit court under this subchapter
by a governmental entity or nonprofit corporation, including without
limitation:
(1) The prosecuting attorney;
(2) An attorney ad litem appointed in a dependency-neglect case;
or
(3) The Department of Human Services.
(e) If the circuit clerk's office has a fax machine, the circuit
clerk, in cases commenced in the circuit court under this subchapter by a
242 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
governmental entity or nonprofit corporation, including without limitation
the prosecuting attorney, an attorney ad litem appointed in a dependency-
neglect case, or the Department of Human Services, shall accept facsimile
transmissions of any papers filed under this subchapter as described in Rule
5 of the Arkansas Rules of Civil Procedure.
(f) An attorney ad litem appointed under § 12-18-1001(e) shall review
all relevant information from the juvenile proceeding regarding the child or
children for whom protective custody was taken and shall file any pleadings
that may be necessary to protect the health, safety, or welfare of the child
or children.

9-35-306. Required contents of petition.
(a) The petition shall set forth the following:
(1)(A) The name, address, gender, Social Security number, and
date of birth of each juvenile subject of the petition.
(B) A single petition for dependency-neglect shall be
filed that includes all siblings who are subjects of the petition;
(2) The name and address of each of the parents or the surviving
parent of the juvenile or juveniles;
(3) The name and address of the person, agency, or institution
having custody of the juvenile or juveniles;
(4) The name and address of any other person, agency, or
institution having a claim to custody or guardianship of the juvenile or
juveniles;
(5) In a proceeding to establish paternity, the name and address
of both the putative father and the presumed legal father, if any;
(6) The name and address of a putative parent, if any;
(7) The name, address, gender, and date of birth of any sibling
of a juvenile named as respondent to the petition; and
(8) The name of each parent, guardian, or custodian of a sibling
of a juvenile named as respondent to the petition.
(b) If the name or address of anyone listed in subsection (a) of this
section is unknown or cannot be ascertained by the petitioner with reasonable
diligence, this shall be alleged in the petition and the petition shall not
be dismissed for insufficiency, but the court shall direct appropriate
measures to find and give notice to the persons.
243 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(c)(1) All persons named in subdivisions (a)(1)-(3) of this section
shall be made defendants and served as required by this subchapter.
(2) However:
(A) The juvenile shall have party status and be named in
the petition as a respondent and shall be served notice under § 9-35-307;
(B) In a dependency-neglect and termination of parental
rights petition, the putative parent shall be named as a party if the
petitioner alleges that the putative parent:
(i) May have a claim of paternity of a juvenile born
outside of marriage;
(ii) Has established significant contacts with the
juvenile, which may be demonstrated by a significant custodial, personal, or
financial relationship with the juvenile; or
(iii) Is listed on the Putative Father Registry;
(C) A putative parent who was not originally named as a
party to the dependency-neglect petition shall be added as a party if:
(i) Paternity is established and a court of
competent jurisdiction enters an order establishing paternity between the
juvenile and the putative parent; or
(ii) The court determines that the putative parent
is a parent as defined in § 9-35-102; and
(D) In a paternity action, the petitioner shall name as
defendants only the mother, the putative father, or the presumed legal
father, if any.
(d)(1)(A) The Department of Human Services shall make diligent efforts
to identify putative parents.
(B) Diligent efforts shall include without limitation
checking the Putative Father Registry.
(2)(A)(i) A petitioner may name and serve a putative parent as a
party under § 9-35-307 in order to resolve the putative parent's status and
rights under § 9-35-314 or terminate the rights of the putative parent under
§ 9-35-325.
(ii) If the petitioner does not name and serve a
putative parent as a party in accordance with subdivision (d)(2)(A)(i) of
this section, the petitioner shall provide a putative parent with notice
under Rule 4 of the Arkansas Rules of Civil Procedure of a proceeding as soon
244 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
as the putative parent is identified.
(B) The notice shall include information about:
(i) The method of establishing paternity;
(ii) The right of the putative parent to prove
significant contacts; and
(iii) The right of the putative parent to be heard
by the court.
(C) The petitioner shall provide the notice to the court
and the parties to the case.
(D) After receiving the notice required under subdivision
(d)(2)(A)(ii) of this section, the putative parent has the burden of
establishing one (1) of the following:
(i) The putative parent has significant contacts
with the juvenile, which may be demonstrated by a significant custodial,
personal, or financial relationship with the juvenile; or
(ii) The putative parent is a parent as defined in §
9-35-102.
(E) If the putative parent, after receiving the notice
required under subdivision (d)(2)(A)(ii) of this section and being given an
opportunity to prove significant contacts with the juvenile, fails to
demonstrate significant contacts with the juvenile and the court finds that
the putative parent was given sufficient notice and an opportunity to be
heard, the court may:
(i) Order deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) testing to
determine whether the putative parent is the biological parent of the
juvenile;
(ii) Enter an order:
(a) Finding that the putative parent does not
have rights to the juvenile;
(b) Dismissing the putative parent from the
action; and
(c) Finding that no further notice is due to
the putative parent whose rights have not attached with regard to the
juvenile, including in the event of a filed petition for adoption; or
(iii) Enter an order providing that only a parent or
putative parent whose rights have attached to the juvenile shall be included
245 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
in a petition to terminate parental rights under § 9-35-325.
(e)(1) The petition shall set forth the following in plain and concise
words:
(A) The facts that, if proven, would bring the family or
juvenile within the court's jurisdiction;
(B) The section of this subchapter upon which jurisdiction
for the petition is based; and
(C) The relief requested by the petitioner.
(2)(A) The petition shall be supported by an affidavit of facts.
(B) A supporting affidavit of facts shall not be required
for a termination of parental rights petition.
(C) The supporting affidavit of facts shall include known
information regarding the fitness of the noncustodial parent to be considered
for custody, placement, or family time with the juvenile.
(D) If the petition for dependency-neglect is filed by the
department, the supporting affidavit of facts shall include a list of all
contact the department has had with the family before the filing of the
petition, including without limitation hotline calls accepted for
maltreatment, investigations, and open cases.

9-35-307. Notification to defendants.
(a) A juvenile respondent shall be served with a copy of the petition
and all other pleadings by serving the juvenile's attorney ad litem in
accordance with Rule 5 of the Arkansas Rules of Civil Procedure.
(b) Each adult defendant shall be served in the manner provided in the
Arkansas Rules of Civil Procedure with:
(1) A copy of the petition; and
(2) Either a notice of hearing or an order to appear.

9-35-308. Taking into custody.
When a juvenile is taken into protective custody under § 12-18-1001,
the person exercising protective custody shall:
(1)(A) Notify the Department of Human Services and make every
effort possible to notify the custodial parent, guardian, or custodian of the
juvenile's location.
(B) The notification to the custodial parent, noncustodial
246 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
parent, guardian, or custodian of the juvenile shall be in writing and
include a notice:
(i) That the juvenile has been taken into foster
care;
(ii) Of the name, location, and phone number of the
person at the department whom the custodial parent, noncustodial parent,
guardian, or custodian of the juvenile can contact about the juvenile;
(iii) Of the rights of the juvenile and of the
custodial parent, noncustodial parent, guardian, or custodian of the juvenile
to receive a copy of any petition filed under this subchapter;
(iv) Of the location and telephone number of the
court; and
(v) Of the procedure for obtaining a hearing; or
(2) Return the juvenile to his or her home.

9-35-309. Emergency orders.
(a)(1) In a case in which there is probable cause to believe that
immediate emergency custody is necessary to protect the health or physical
well-being of the juvenile from immediate danger or to prevent the juvenile's
removal from the state, the circuit court shall issue an ex parte order for
emergency custody to remove the juvenile from the custody of the parent,
guardian, or custodian and shall determine the appropriate plan for placement
of the juvenile.
(2)(A) In a case in which there is probable cause to believe
that an emergency order is necessary to protect the health or physical well-
being of the juvenile from immediate danger, the court shall issue an ex
parte order to provide specific appropriate safeguards for the protection of
the juvenile.
(B) Specific appropriate safeguards shall include without
limitation the authority of the circuit court to restrict a legal custodian
from:
(i) Having any contact with the juvenile; or
(ii) Removing a juvenile from a placement if the:
(a) Legal custodian placed or allowed the
juvenile to remain in that home for more than six (6) months; and
(b) Department of Human Services has no
247 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
immediate health or physical well-being concerns with the placement.
(3) In a case in which there is probable cause to believe that a
juvenile is a dependent juvenile as defined in this subchapter, the court
shall issue an ex parte order for emergency custody placing custody of the
dependent juvenile with the department.
(b) The emergency order shall include:
(1) Notice to all defendants and respondents named in the
petition of the right to a hearing and that a hearing will be held within
five (5) business days of the issuance of the ex parte order;
(2) Notice of a defendant's or respondent's right to be
represented by counsel;
(3)(A) Notice of a defendant's or respondent's right to obtain
appointed counsel, if eligible, and the procedure for obtaining appointed
counsel.
(B) A court shall:
(i) Appoint counsel for the parent or custodian from
whom legal custody was removed in the ex parte emergency order; and
(ii) Determine eligibility at the probable cause
hearing; and
(4) The address and telephone number of the circuit court and
the date and time of the probable cause hearing, if known.
(c)(1) Immediate notice of the emergency order shall be given by the
petitioner or by the circuit court to the:
(A) Custodial parent, noncustodial parent, guardian, or
custodian of the juvenile; and
(B) Attorney ad litem who represents the juvenile
respondent.
(2) The petitioner shall provide copies of any petition,
affidavit, or other pleading filed with or provided to the court in
conjunction with the emergency order to the provisionally appointed parent
counsel under § 9-35-311 before the probable cause hearing.
(3) All defendants shall be served with the emergency order
according to Rule 4 or Rule 5 of the Arkansas Rules of Civil Procedure or as
otherwise provided by the court.

9-35-310. Probable cause hearing.
248 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(a)(1)(A) The circuit court shall hold a probable cause hearing within
five (5) business days of the issuance of the ex parte order to determine if
probable cause to issue the emergency order continues to exist.
(B)(i) The hearing shall be limited to the purpose of
determining whether probable cause existed to protect the juvenile and to
determine whether probable cause still exists to protect the juvenile.
(ii) However, the issues as to custody and delivery
of services may be considered by the court and appropriate orders for custody
and delivery of services entered by the court.
(iii) If the defendant stipulates that probable
cause exists, the only evidence that is presented at the probable cause
hearing shall be:
(a) Evidence pertaining to family time; and
(b) Evidence pertaining to services delivered
to the family.
(iv) A parent shall not be compelled to testify
under any circumstances.
(v) For the sole purpose of the probable cause
hearing, the stipulation of a parent that probable cause exists shall also
serve as a stipulation to the introduction of the affidavit of the plaintiff.
(2)(A) All other issues, with the exception of custody and
services, shall be reserved for hearing by the court at the adjudication
hearing, which shall be a separate hearing conducted subsequent to the
probable cause hearing.
(B) By agreement of the parties and with the court's
approval, the adjudication hearing may be conducted at any time after the
probable cause hearing, subject to § 9-35-316(a)(4).
(b) The petitioner shall have the burden of proof by a preponderance
of evidence that probable cause exists for continuation of the emergency
order.
(c) If the court determines that the juvenile can safely be returned
to his or her home pending adjudication and it is in the best interest of the
juvenile, the court shall so order.
(d)(1) The court shall set the time and date of the adjudication
hearing at the probable cause hearing.
(2) The court or a party or party's attorney, as designated by
249 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
the court, shall file a written order within thirty (30) days of the date of
the hearing or prior to the next hearing, whichever is sooner.
(e) All probable cause hearings are miscellaneous proceedings as
defined in Rule 1101(b)(3) of the Arkansas Rules of Evidence, and the rules
of evidence, including without limitation the hearsay rule, Rule 802 of the
Arkansas Rules of Evidence, are not applicable.

9-35-311. Right to counsel.
(a)(1)(A) The inquiry concerning the ability of the juvenile to retain
counsel shall include a consideration of the juvenile's financial resources
and the financial resources of his or her family.
(B) However, the failure of the juvenile's family to
retain counsel for the juvenile shall not deprive the juvenile of the right
to appointed counsel if required under this section.
(2) After review by the court of an affidavit of financial means
completed and verified by the parent of the juvenile and a determination by
the court that the parent or juvenile has the ability to pay, the court may
order financially able juveniles, parents, guardians, or custodians to pay
all or part of reasonable attorney's fees and expenses for representation of
a juvenile.
(3) All moneys collected by the circuit clerk under this
subsection shall be retained by the circuit clerk and deposited into a
special fund to be known as the “juvenile representation fund”.
(4) The court may direct that money from the juvenile
representation fund be used in providing counsel for juveniles under this
section in a delinquency or family in need of services case.
(5) Any money remaining in the juvenile representation fund at
the end of the fiscal year shall not revert to any other fund but shall carry
over into the next fiscal year in the juvenile representation fund.
(b) Appointment of counsel shall be made at a time sufficiently in
advance of the court appearance to allow adequate preparation by appointed
counsel and adequate consultation between the appointed counsel and the
client.
(c)(1) The court shall appoint an attorney ad litem who shall meet
standards and qualifications established by the Supreme Court to represent
the best interest of the juvenile when a dependency-neglect petition is filed
250 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
or when an emergency ex parte order is entered in a dependency-neglect case,
whichever occurs earlier.
(2) The court may appoint an attorney ad litem to represent the
best interest of a juvenile involved in any case before the court and shall
consider the juvenile's best interest in determining whether to appoint an
attorney ad litem.
(3) Each attorney ad litem shall:
(A) File written motions, responses, or objections at all
stages of the proceedings when necessary to protect the best interest of the
juvenile;
(B) Attend all hearings and participate in all telephone
conferences with the court unless excused by the court; and
(C) Present witnesses and exhibits when necessary to
protect the juvenile's best interest.
(4) An attorney ad litem shall be provided access to all records
relevant to the juvenile's case, including without limitation:
(A) School records;
(B) Medical records;
(C) Court records relating to the juvenile and his or her
family; and
(D) Records of the Department of Human Services relating
to the juvenile and his or her family to the extent permitted by federal law,
including those maintained electronically and in the case management system.
(5)(A) An attorney ad litem shall represent the best interest of
the juvenile.
(B) If the juvenile's wishes differ from the attorney ad
litem's determination of the juvenile's best interest, the attorney ad litem
shall communicate the juvenile's wishes to the court in addition to
presenting his or her determination of the juvenile's best interest.
(d)(1) The court may appoint a volunteer court-appointed special
advocate from a program that shall meet all state and national court-
appointed special advocate standards to advocate for the best interest of
juveniles in dependency-neglect proceedings.
(2) A court-appointed special advocate shall not be assigned a
case before:
(A) Completing a training program in compliance with
251 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
National CASA/GAL Association for Children and state standards; and
(B) Being approved by the local court-appointed special
advocate program, which will include appropriate criminal background and
child abuse registry checks.
(3) Each court-appointed special advocate shall:
(A)(i) Investigate the case to which he or she is assigned
to provide independent factual information to the court through the attorney
ad litem, court testimony, or court reports.
(ii) The court-appointed special advocate may testify
if called as a witness.
(iii) When the court-appointed special advocate
prepares a written report for the court, the advocate shall provide all
parties or the attorney of record with a copy of the written report seven (7)
business days before the relevant hearing; and
(B) Monitor the case to which he or she is assigned to
ensure compliance with the court's orders.
(4) Upon presentation of an order of appointment, a court-
appointed special advocate shall be provided access to all records relevant
to the juvenile's case, including without limitation:
(A) School records;
(B) Medical records;
(C) Court records relating to the juvenile and his or her
family; and
(D) Department records, to the extent permitted by federal
law, including those maintained electronically and in the Children's
Reporting and Information System.
(5) A court-appointed special advocate is not a party to the
case to which he or she is assigned and shall not call witnesses or examine
witnesses.
(6) A court-appointed special advocate shall not be liable for
damages for personal injury or property damage pursuant to the Arkansas
Volunteer Immunity Act, § 16-6-101 et seq.
(7) Except as provided in this subsection, a court-appointed
special advocate shall not disclose any confidential information or reports
to anyone except as ordered by the court or otherwise provided by law.
(e)(1)(A) All parents and custodians have a right to counsel in all
252 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
dependency-neglect proceedings.
(B) In all dependency-neglect proceedings that set out to
remove legal custody from a parent or custodian:
(i) The parent or custodian from whom custody was
removed shall have the right to be appointed counsel; and
(ii) The court may appoint an attorney to a:
(a)(1) Noncustodial parent if the court
determines that the noncustodial parent has demonstrated a significant
custodial relationship with the juvenile.
(2) A determination that the
noncustodial parent has demonstrated a significant custodial relationship
with the juvenile shall be made at the first appearance of the noncustodial
parent in the matter; or
(b)(1) Putative parent if the putative parent
has demonstrated significant contact with the juvenile and the court finds
the rights of the putative parent have attached.
(2) A determination on whether the
rights of the putative parent have attached shall be made at the first
appearance of the putative parent in the matter.
(3) Counsel shall not be appointed to a
putative parent if the:
(A) Court finds that the putative
parent has not demonstrated significant contact with the juvenile;
(B) Court finds that the rights of
the putative parent have not attached; or
(C) The putative parent does not
appear in the matter.
(4) If a putative parent fails to
demonstrate significant contacts with the juvenile, the court shall inform
the putative parent on the following:
(A) How to be considered a parent
under this chapter;
(B) The eligibility requirements
for being appointed counsel; and
(C) The process for requesting the
appointment of counsel if the putative parent meets the eligibility
253 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
requirements for being appointed counsel.
(C) Counsel shall not be appointed to a party in a
dependency-neglect proceeding unless:
(i) The court finds that the parent, putative
parent, or custodian of the juvenile is indigent; and
(ii) Counsel is requested by the parent, putative
parent, or custodian of the juvenile after the parent, putative parent, or
custodian is informed of his or her right to be appointed counsel.
(D)(i) Parents, putative parents, and custodians shall be
advised in the dependency-neglect petition or the ex parte emergency order,
whichever is sooner, and at the first appearance before the court, of the
right to counsel and the right to appointed counsel, if eligible.
(ii) As required under § 9-35-309, a circuit court
shall appoint counsel in an ex parte emergency order and shall determine
eligibility at the commencement of the probable cause hearing.
(E)(i) All parents shall have the right to be appointed
counsel in termination of parental rights hearings.
(ii) The court shall appoint counsel if the court
makes a finding that the parent is indigent and counsel is requested by the
parent.
(F) In a dependency-neglect proceeding naming a minor
parent as a defendant, the court shall appoint a qualified parent counsel for
the minor parent.
(2) If at the permanency planning hearing or at any time the
court establishes the goal of adoption and counsel has not yet been appointed
for a parent, the court shall appoint counsel to represent the parent as
provided by subdivision (e)(1)(E) of this section.
(3)(A) Except as otherwise provided by this chapter, putative
parents do not have a right to appointed counsel in dependency-neglect
proceedings.
(B) A putative parent may be appointed counsel for a
termination of parental rights proceeding if the court finds the following on
the record:
(i) The putative parent is indigent;
(ii) The putative parent has established significant
contacts with the juvenile so that putative rights attach;
254 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(iii) Due process requires appointment of counsel
for a full and fair hearing for the putative parent in the termination
hearing; and
(iv) The putative parent requested counsel.
(4)(A) A putative parent has the burden to prove paternity and
significant contacts with the child.
(B) The court shall make the findings required in
subdivision (e)(3) of this section to determine whether a putative parent is
entitled to appointed counsel at the termination hearing.
(C)(i) The termination petition shall include the putative
parent as provided under § 9-35-306(c)(2)(C).
(ii) The court shall appoint counsel subject to
subdivision (e)(3) of this section for the putative parent at any time the
court establishes adoption as the case goal with a termination of parental
rights petition to be filed.
(5)(A) The court shall order financially able parents or
custodians to pay all or part of reasonable attorney's fees and expenses for
court-appointed representation after review by the court of an affidavit of
financial means completed and verified by the parent or custodian and a
determination by the court of an ability to pay.
(B)(i) All moneys collected by the clerk under this
subsection shall be retained by the clerk and deposited into a special fund
to be known as the “Juvenile Court Representation Fund”.
(ii) The court may direct that money from the fund be
used in providing counsel for indigent parents or custodians at the trial
level in a dependency-neglect proceeding.
(iii) Upon a determination of indigency and a finding
by the court that the fund does not have sufficient funds to pay reasonable
attorney's fees and expenses incurred at the trial court level and state
funds have been exhausted, the court may order the county to pay these
reasonable fees and expenses until the state provides funding for counsel.
(6)(A) Appointment of counsel shall be made at a time
sufficiently in advance of the court appearance to allow adequate preparation
by appointed counsel and adequate consultation between the appointed counsel
and the client.
(B)(i) When the first appearance before the court is a
255 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
probable cause hearing to remove custody under § 9-35-310, parents shall be
appointed a parent counsel in a timely manner for meaningful representation
until eligibility for appointed counsel is determined by the court under
subdivision (e)(1)(B) of this section.
(ii) If in the interest of time or availability of
qualified parent counsel it becomes necessary for a provisional parent
counsel or counsel other than the parent counsel originally appointed under
subdivision (e)(1)(B) of this section, a substitute parent counsel shall be
appointed.
(7) The attorney for the parent or custodian shall be provided
access to all records relevant to the juvenile's case, including without
limitation school records, medical records, all court records relating to the
juvenile and his or her family, and department records relating to the
juvenile and his or her family, including those maintained electronically and
in the Children's Reporting and Information System, to which the parent or
custodian is entitled under state and federal law.
(8)(A) In all cases where a court has determined that appointed
counsel for an indigent parent or custodian is necessary under this
subsection, the court shall appoint counsel in compliance with federal law
and Supreme Court Administrative Order No. 15.
(B) When a court orders payment of funds for parent
counsel on behalf of an indigent parent or custodian from a state contract,
the court shall make written findings in the appointment order in compliance
with this section.

9-35-312. Hearings — Generally.
(a)(1) The defendant need not file a written responsive pleading in
order to be heard by the court.
(2) If not appointed by the court in an order provided to all
parties, counsel shall file a notice of appearance immediately upon
acceptance of representation, with a copy to be served on the petitioner and
all parties.
(b) At the time set for hearing, the court may:
(1) Proceed to hear the case only if the juvenile is present or
excused for good cause by the court; or
(2) Continue the case upon determination that the presence of an
256 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
adult defendant is necessary.
(c)(1) Hearings under this subchapter shall be in a court of record.
(2) A record of all proceedings shall be kept in the same manner
as other proceedings of circuit court and in accordance with rules
promulgated by the Supreme Court.
(d)(1) Unless otherwise indicated, the Arkansas Rules of Evidence
shall apply.
(2)(A) Upon motion of any party, the court may order that the
father, mother, and child submit to scientific testing for drug or alcohol
abuse.
(B) A written report of the test results prepared by the
person conducting the test, or by a person under whose supervision or
direction the test and analysis have been performed, certified by an
affidavit subscribed and sworn to by him or her before a notary public, may
be introduced in evidence without calling the person as a witness unless a
motion challenging the test procedures or results has been filed within
thirty (30) days before the hearing and bond is posted in an amount
sufficient to cover the costs of the person's appearance to testify.
(C)(i) If contested, documentation of the chain of custody
of samples taken from a test subject shall be verified by affidavit of one
(1) person's witnessing the procedure or extraction, packaging, and mailing
of the sample and by one (1) person's signing for the sample at the place
where the sample is subject to the testing procedure.
(ii) Submission of the affidavits along with the
submission of the test results shall be competent evidence to establish the
chain of custody of those specimens.
(D) When a court orders scientific testing for drug or
alcohol abuse and one (1) of the parties refuses to submit to the testing,
that refusal shall be disclosed at trial and may be considered civil contempt
of court.
(e) Except as otherwise provided in this subchapter, the Arkansas
Rules of Civil Procedure shall apply to all proceedings.
(f) All parties shall have the right to compel attendance of witnesses
in accordance with the Arkansas Rules of Civil Procedure.
(g)(1) The petitioner in all proceedings shall bear the burden of
presenting the case at hearings.
257 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(2)(A) The following burdens of proof shall apply:
(i) Proof by a preponderance of the evidence in
dependency-neglect proceedings, except if subject to the Indian Child Welfare
Act of 1978, 25 U.S.C. § 1901 et seq., as it existed on January 1, 2025; and
(ii) Proof by clear and convincing evidence for
hearings to terminate parental rights, except if subject to the Indian Child
Welfare Act of 1978, 25 U.S.C. § 1901 et seq., as it existed on January 1,
2025, and in hearings to determine whether or not reunification services
shall be provided.
(B) If the Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978, 25 U.S.C. §
1901 et seq., as it existed on January 1, 2025, applies, the following
burdens of proof shall apply:
(i) Clear and convincing evidence in probable cause,
adjudication, review, and permanency planning hearings; and
(ii) Beyond a reasonable doubt in termination of
parental rights hearings that are subject to the Indian Child Welfare Act of
1978, 25 U.S.C. § 1901 et seq., as it existed on January 1, 2025.
(h)(1)(A) Except as provided by this section, all hearings involving
allegations and reports of child maltreatment and all hearings involving
cases of children in foster care shall be closed.
(B)(i) A member of the General Assembly may attend any
hearing held under this subchapter, including without limitation a closed
hearing, unless the court excludes the member of the General Assembly based
on the:
(a) Best interest of the child; or
(b) Court's authority under the Arkansas Rules
of Civil Procedure or the Arkansas Rules of Evidence.
(ii) Except as otherwise provided by law, a member
of the General Assembly who attends a hearing in accordance with subdivision
(h)(1)(B)(i) of this section shall not disclose information obtained during
his or her attendance at the hearing.
(C)(i)(a) A Child Welfare Ombudsman may attend a hearing
held under this subchapter, including without limitation a closed hearing.
(b) However, a court may exclude the Child
Welfare Ombudsman from a hearing if:
(1) It is in the best interest of the
258 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
child; or
(2) The reason for the exclusion is
based on the authority of the court under the Arkansas Rules of Civil
Procedure or the Arkansas Rules of Evidence.
(ii) Unless otherwise allowed by law, the Child
Welfare Ombudsman shall not disclose information that he or she obtains
through his or her attendance at a hearing held under this subchapter.
(D)(i) A relative, fictive kin, or individual with a
connection to the family involved in a dependency-neglect proceeding may
attend a hearing unless the court determines:
(a) The best interest of the child requires
the relative, fictive kin, or individual with a connection to the family
involved in the dependency-neglect proceeding to be excluded from the
hearing; or
(b) It is within the authority of the court
under the Arkansas Rules of Civil Procedure or the Arkansas Rules of Evidence
to exclude the relative, fictive kin, or individual with a connection to the
family involved in the dependency-neglect proceeding from the hearing.
(ii) The court shall confirm the identity of each
relative, fictive kin, or individual with a connection to the family involved
in the dependency-neglect proceeding to determine if the relative, fictive
kin, or individual with a connection to the family involved in the
dependency-neglect proceeding should be excluded from the hearing.
(iii) A relative, fictive kin, or individual with a
connection to the family involved in the dependency-neglect proceeding who is
permitted to attend a hearing shall not disclose any information obtained
during the hearing.
(E)(i) The court may allow an individual with an interest
in attending a closed hearing in a dependency-neglect proceeding to attend
the hearing if:
(a) It is in the best interest of the child;
and
(b) The individual demonstrates a sincere and
legitimate need to attend the hearing as determined by the court.
(ii) An individual who attends a hearing in
accordance with subdivision (h)(1)(E)(i) of this section shall not disclose
259 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
any information obtained during the hearing.
(F) An individual who discloses information in violation
of subdivision (h)(1)(D)(iii) and subdivision (h)(1)(E)(ii) of this section
is guilty of a Class C misdemeanor.
(2) All other hearings may be closed within the discretion of
the court, except that in adoption cases the hearings shall be closed as
provided in the Revised Uniform Adoption Act, § 9-9-201 et seq.
(i)(1) A court shall set a hearing to address the entry of a written
order if:
(A) The written order is not provided to the court for
entry within the time specified under this subchapter; and
(B) A party files a motion for a hearing to address the
entry of the written order.
(2)(A) The court shall conduct a hearing to address the entry of
the written order within thirty (30) days from the date on which the motion
for a hearing to address the entry of the written order is filed.
(B) A hearing to address the entry of a written order may
be the next scheduled hearing in the proceeding if the hearing to address the
entry of the written order is being held within thirty (30) days from the
date on which the motion for a hearing to address the entry of the written
order is filed.
(C) The court is not required to conduct a hearing to
address the entry of a written order if the written order is submitted to the
court.
(3) The court shall reassign the preparation of the written
order as needed.

9-35-313. Notice to nonparties.
(a)(1) If a proceeding is scheduled regarding a juvenile in the
custody of the Department of Human Services and the juvenile has one (1) or
more foster parents or preadoptive parents, the department shall provide
notice to each of the juvenile's foster parents or preadoptive parents.
(2) The original petitioner in a juvenile case shall provide
notice of a proceeding regarding a juvenile in the custody of the department
to a relative caregiver of the juvenile.
(b)(1) The court shall allow a foster parent, preadoptive parent, or
260 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
relative caregiver an opportunity to be heard in any proceeding held
regarding a juvenile in the care of the foster parent, preadoptive parent, or
relative caregiver.
(2) However, a foster parent, preadoptive parent, or relative
caregiver may only be heard under subdivision (b)(1) of this section in the
capacity of a witness.
(c)(1) A foster parent, preadoptive parent, or a relative caregiver
shall not be made a party to a proceeding:
(A) Solely on the basis that he or she is entitled to
notice and the opportunity to be heard; or
(B) If reunification remains the goal of the case.
(2) A foster parent, adoptive parent, preadoptive parent, or
relative caregiver may not offer evidence to the court unless he or she is
called as a witness.
(d)(1) A grandparent shall be entitled to notice and shall be granted
an opportunity to be heard in any dependency-neglect proceeding involving a
grandchild who is twelve (12) months of age or younger when:
(A) The grandchild resides with the grandparent for at
least six (6) continuous months before the grandchild reached twelve (12)
months of age;
(B) The grandparent was the primary caregiver for and
financial supporter of the grandchild during the time the grandchild resided
with the grandparent; and
(C) The continuous custody under subdivision (d)(1)(A) of
this section occurred within one (1) year of the date that the child custody
proceeding was initiated.
(2) A grandparent shall be entitled to notice and shall be
granted an opportunity to be heard in any dependency-neglect proceeding
involving a grandchild who is twelve (12) months of age or older when:
(A) The grandchild resides with this grandparent for at
least one (1) continuous year, regardless of the grandchild's age;
(B) The grandparent was the primary caregiver for and
financial supporter of the grandchild during the time the grandchild resided
with the grandparent; and
(C) The continuous custody under subdivision (d)(2)(A)
occurred within one (1) year of the date that the child custody proceeding
261 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
was initiated.
(3) As used in this subsection, "grandparent” does not mean a
parent of a putative father of a juvenile.

9-35-314. Putative parents.
(a)(1) The Department of Human Services shall make diligent efforts to
identify putative parents in a dependency-neglect proceeding, including
without limitation checking the Putative Father Registry.
(b)(1)(A) If the petitioner has named and served a putative parent
under this section and § 9-35-306, the court shall resolve the:
(i) Party status of a putative parent; and
(ii) Rights of the putative parent as a putative
father, if the putative father's rights have attached.
(B) A court may consider the termination of the rights of
a putative parent under § 9-35-325 if the:
(i) Court finds that the putative parent has
established significant contacts; and
(ii) Rights of the putative parent as a putative
father have attached.
(2) The court shall provide a putative parent the opportunity to
be heard regarding his or her:
(A) Efforts to establish paternity; and
(B) Significant contacts with the juvenile involved in the
dependency-neglect proceedings.
(3)(A) The court may order deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) testing
at any time.
(B) A court may establish paternity or determine whether a
putative parent is a parent as defined under § 9-35-102 regardless of whether
a deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) test was ordered or performed.
(C) If there is more than one (1) putative parent of the
juvenile, the court shall order a deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) test of each
identified putative parent to determine the biological parent of the
juvenile.
(D) A deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) test establishing a
putative parent as the biological parent of a juvenile is sufficient evidence
for the court to:
262 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(i) Adjudicate paternity;
(ii) Establish that the putative parent is a parent
for the purposes of this subchapter; and
(iii) Enter a decree of paternity.
(4) A putative parent has the burden to prove paternity and
significant contacts with the juvenile.
(c)(1) Except as provided under § 9-35-306, a putative parent shall be
named as a party if the circuit court:
(A)(i) Has determined that the putative parent has
established paternity; and
(ii) Enters an order establishing the putative
parent as a parent for the purposes of this subchapter and directing that the
parent be added to the case as a party defendant; or
(B)(i) Has determined that the putative parent has
established significant contacts with the juvenile; and
(ii) Enters an order finding that the rights of the
putative parent have attached and directing that the parent shall be added to
the case as a party defendant.
(2)(A) If the petitioner has named and served a putative parent
under this section and § 9-35-306 and the circuit court finds that the
putative parent has established paternity, the court shall:
(i) Enter an order establishing the putative parent
as a parent for the purposes of this subchapter; and
(ii) Maintain the parent as a party defendant.
(B) If the petitioner has named and served a putative
parent under this section and § 9-35-306 and the circuit court finds that the
putative parent has established significant contacts with the juvenile, the
court shall:
(i) Enter an order stating that the rights of the
putative parent have attached; and
(ii) Maintain the putative parent as a party
defendant.
(3) If the circuit court finds that the putative parent, after
being given notice and opportunity to be heard, has not established paternity
or significant contacts with the juvenile, the circuit court shall:
(A) Find that the:
263 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(i) Putative parent is not a parent for the purposes
of this subchapter; and
(ii) Rights of the putative parent have not attached;
and
(B) Dismiss the putative parent from the case and enter an
order finding that no further notice, including without limitation notice of
an adoption petition concerning the juvenile, is required to be provided to
the putative parent.
(d) The rights of a putative parent to appointed counsel are subject
to § 9-35-311.

9-35-315. Family time.
(a)(1) Unsupervised family time may occur between a juvenile and a
parent if:
(A) The court determines that the health and safety of the
juvenile can be adequately protected; and
(B) It is in the best interest of the child.
(2) Unless the court has restricted unsupervised family time,
the Department of Human Services may allow unsupervised family time between a
juvenile and a parent at any time.
(b)(1) The petitioner has the burden of proving at every hearing that
unsupervised family time is not in the best interest of a child.
(2) If the court determines that unsupervised family time
between a juvenile and a parent is not in the best interest of the child,
family time between the juvenile and the parent shall be supervised.
(c)(1) A rebuttable presumption that unsupervised family time is in
the best interest of the juvenile applies at every hearing.
(2) The burden of proof to rebut the presumption in subdivision
(c)(1) of this section is proof by a preponderance of the evidence.
(d) The court may consider the preferences of the juvenile regarding
family time if the juvenile is of a sufficient age and capacity to reason,
regardless of the juvenile's chronological age.
(e)(1) If the court orders supervised family time, the parent from
whom custody of the juvenile has been removed shall receive a minimum of four
(4) hours of supervised family time per week.
(2) The court may order less than four (4) hours of supervised
264 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
family time if the court determines that the supervised family time:
(A) Is not in the best interest of the juvenile; or
(B) Will impose an extreme hardship on one (1) of the
parties.
(f)(1) A parent testing positive for a drug on a drug test is an
insufficient reason to deny the parent family time with the juvenile if the
court has ordered family time between the parent and a juvenile.
(2) Family time that was ordered by the court may be canceled
if, at the time that family time between the parent and a juvenile occurs,
the parent:
(A) Is under the influence of drugs or alcohol;
(B) Exhibits behavior that may create an unsafe
environment for a juvenile; or
(C) Appears to be actively impaired.
(g) A relative or fictive kin may transport a juvenile to and from
family time with a parent if:
(1) It is in the best interest of a child;
(2) The relative or fictive kin submits to a:
(A) Background check; and
(B) Child maltreatment registry check; and
(3) The relative or fictive kin meets the driving requirements
established by the department.

9-35-316. Adjudication hearing.
(a)(1)(A) An adjudication hearing shall be held to determine whether
the allegations in a petition are substantiated by the proof.
(B)(i) If the court finds that the juvenile is dependent-
neglected, the court shall determine whether a noncustodial parent
contributed to the dependency-neglect and whether the noncustodial parent is
a fit parent for purposes of custody or family time.
(ii) A noncustodial parent in subdivision
(a)(1)(B)(i) of this section is presumed to be a fit parent.
(iii)(a) If no earlier court order has been entered
into evidence concerning custody or family time with the noncustodial parent
of the juvenile subject to the dependency-neglect petition, the petitioner
shall, and any party may, provide evidence to the court whether the
265 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
noncustodial parent is unfit for purposes of custody or family time.
(b) The petitioner shall provide evidence as
to whether the noncustodial parent contributed to the dependency-neglect.
(iv)(a) The court may transfer temporary custody or
permanent custody to the noncustodial parent after a review of evidence and a
finding that it is in the best interest of the juvenile to transfer custody,
or the court may order family time with the noncustodial parent.
(b) An order of transfer of custody to the
noncustodial parent does not relieve the Department of Human Services of the
responsibility to provide services to the parent from whom custody was
removed, unless the court enters an order to relieve the department of the
responsibility.
(c) A home study is not required to transfer
custody to a parent of the juvenile.
(v) If the court determines that the child cannot
safely be placed in the custody of the noncustodial parent, the court shall
make specific findings of fact regarding the safety factors that need to be
corrected by the noncustodial parent before placement or family time with the
juvenile.
(2) Unless the court finds that a removal occurred due to an
emergency and the agency had no prior contact with the family or the child,
evidence shall be presented to the court regarding all prior contact between
the agency and the juvenile or the family before a finding of reasonable
efforts to prevent removal by the department.
(3) A finding of reasonable efforts to prevent removal of the
juvenile is void if the court determines that the department failed to
disclose all prior contact between the agency and juvenile or the family
before the finding.
(4)(A) The dependency-neglect adjudication hearing shall be held
within thirty (30) days after the probable cause hearing under § 9-35-310.
(B) On a motion of the court or any party, the court may
continue the adjudication hearing up to sixty (60) days after the removal
for good cause shown.
(C)(i) The court may continue an adjudication hearing
beyond the sixty-day limitation provided in subdivision (a)(4)(B) of this
section in extraordinary circumstances.
266 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(ii) As used in this subdivision (a)(4)(C),
“extraordinary circumstances” includes without limitation the following
circumstances:
(a) The Supreme Court orders the suspension of
in-person court proceedings; and
(b) One (1) of the following has occurred:
(1) The President of the United States
has declared a national emergency; or
(2) The Governor has declared a state of
emergency or a statewide public health emergency.
(5) If the juvenile has previously been adjudicated a dependent-
neglected juvenile in the same case in which a motion for a change of custody
has been filed to remove the juvenile from the custody of a parent, a
subsequent adjudication is required if the ground for the removal is not the
same as the ground previously adjudicated.
(b)(1) Following an adjudication in which a juvenile is found to be
dependent-neglected, the court may order any studies, evaluations, or
predisposition reports, if needed, that bear on disposition.
(2)(A) All reports under subdivision (b)(1) of this section
shall be provided in writing to all parties and counsel at least two (2) days
before the disposition hearing.
(B) All parties shall be given a fair opportunity to
controvert any parts of reports under subdivision (b)(1) of this section.
(c) A written adjudication order shall be filed by the court, or by a
party or party's attorney as designated by the court, within thirty (30) days
of the date of the hearing or before the next hearing, whichever is sooner.

9-35-317. Limitations on detention.
(a)(1) A juvenile who is alleged to be or who has been adjudicated
either dependent-neglected or a member of a family in need of services shall
not be placed or detained in a secure detention facility, in a facility
utilized for the detention of alleged or adjudicated delinquent juveniles, or
in a facility utilized for the detention of adults held for, charged with, or
convicted of a crime except that a juvenile may be held in a juvenile
detention facility when he or she has been away from home for more than
twenty-four (24) hours and when the parent, guardian, or other person
267 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
contacted lives beyond fifty miles (50 mi.) from the juvenile or out of
state.
(2) The juvenile may be held in custody in a juvenile detention
facility for purposes of identification, processing, or arranging for release
or transfer to an alternative facility.
(3) The period of holding shall be limited to the minimum time
necessary to complete the actions listed in subdivision (a)(2) of this
section and shall not occur in any facility utilized for incarceration of
adults.
(b)(1) A juvenile held under subdivision (a)(1) of this section shall
be separated from detained juveniles charged or held for delinquency.
(2) A juvenile shall not be held under subdivision (a)(1) of
this section for more than six (6) hours if the parent, guardian, or other
person contacted lives in the state or twenty-four (24) hours, excluding
weekends and holidays, if the parent, guardian, or other person contacted
lives out of state.

9-35-318. Removal of juvenile.
(a) Before a circuit court may order any dependent-neglected juvenile
or family in need of services juvenile removed from the custody of his or her
parent, guardian, or custodian and placed with the Department of Human
Services or other licensed agency responsible for the care of juveniles or
with a relative or other individual, the court shall order family services
appropriate to prevent removal unless the health and safety of the juvenile
warrant immediate removal for the protection of the juvenile.
(b) When the court orders a dependent-neglected juvenile removed from
the custody of a parent, guardian, or custodian and placed in the custody of
the department or other licensed agency responsible for the care of juveniles
or with a relative or other individual, the court shall make these specific
findings in the order:
(1) In the initial order of removal, the court must find
whether:
(A) It is contrary to the welfare of the juvenile to
remain at home;
(B) The removal and the reasons for the removal of the
juvenile is necessary to protect the health and safety of the juvenile; and
268 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(C) The removal is in the best interest of the juvenile;
and
(2) Within sixty (60) days of removal, the court must find:
(A) Which family services were made available to the
family before the removal of the juvenile;
(B) What efforts were made to provide those family
services relevant to the needs of the family before the removal of the
juvenile, taking into consideration whether or not the juvenile could safely
remain at home while family services were provided;
(C) Why efforts made to provide the family services
described did not prevent the removal of the juvenile; and
(D) Whether efforts made to prevent the removal of the
juvenile were reasonable, based upon the needs of the family and the
juvenile.
(c) When the state agency's first contact with the family has occurred
during an emergency in which the juvenile could not safely remain at home,
even with reasonable services being provided, the responsible state agency
shall be deemed to have made reasonable efforts to prevent or eliminate the
need for removal.
(d) When the court finds that the department's preventive or
reunification efforts have not been reasonable, but further preventive or
reunification efforts could not permit the juvenile to remain safely at home,
the court may authorize or continue the removal of the juvenile but shall
note the failure by the department in the record of the case.
(e)(1) In all instances of removal of a juvenile from the home of his
or her parent, guardian, or custodian by a court, the court shall set forth
in a written order:
(A) The evidence supporting the decision to remove;
(B) The facts regarding the need for removal; and
(C) The findings required by this section.
(2) The written findings and order shall be filed by the court
or by a party or party's attorney as designated by the court within thirty
(30) days of the date of the hearing at which removal is ordered or prior to
the next hearing, whichever is sooner.
(f) Within one (1) year from the date of removal of the juvenile and
annually thereafter, the court shall determine whether the department has
269 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
made reasonable efforts to obtain permanency for the juvenile.
(g)(1) If the court transfers custody of a child to the department,
the court shall issue an order containing the following determinations
regarding the educational issues of the child and whether the parent or
guardian of the child may:
(A) Have access to the child's school records;
(B) Obtain information on the current placement of the
child, including the name and address of the child's foster parent or
provider, if the parent or guardian has access to the child's school records;
and
(C) Participate in school conferences or similar
activities at the child's school.
(2) If the court transfers custody of a child to the department,
the court may appoint an individual to consent to an initial evaluation of
the child and serve as the child's surrogate parent under the Individuals
with Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. § 1400 et seq., as it existed on
January 1, 2025.

9-35-319. Disposition hearing.
(a) If the circuit court finds that the petition has been
substantiated by the proof at the adjudication hearing, a disposition hearing
shall be held for the court to enter orders consistent with the disposition
alternatives.
(b) In dependency-neglect proceedings, the disposition hearing may be
held immediately following or concurrent with the adjudication hearing but in
any event shall be held no more than fourteen (14) days following the
adjudication hearing.
(c) In initially considering the disposition alternatives and at any
subsequent hearing, the court shall give preference to the least restrictive
disposition consistent with the best interests and welfare of the juvenile
and the public.
(d) In dependency-neglect cases, a written disposition order shall be
filed by the court, or by a party or party's attorney as designated by the
court, within thirty (30) days of the date of the hearing or prior to the
next hearing, whichever is sooner.

270 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
9-35-320. Disposition — Dependent-neglected — Generally.
(a) If a juvenile is found to be dependent-neglected, the circuit
court may enter an order making any of the following dispositions:
(1) Order family services;
(2)(A) If it is in the best interest of the juvenile, transfer
custody of the juvenile to the Department of Human Services, to another
licensed agency responsible for the care of juveniles, or to a relative or
other individual.
(B) If the court grants custody of the juvenile to the
department, the juvenile shall be placed in a licensed or approved foster
home, shelter, or facility, or an exempt child welfare agency as defined
under § 9-28-402.
(C) A juvenile in the custody of the department is
“awaiting foster care placement”, as that term is used in the definition of
“homeless children and youths” in the McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act,
42 U.S.C. § 11434a(2), as it existed on January 1, 2025, if the juvenile:
(i) Is placed in a shelter, facility, or other
short-term placement with a plan of moving the juvenile within ninety (90)
days;
(ii) Is transferred to an emergency placement to
protect the juvenile's health or welfare;
(iii) Is placed in a provisional foster home as
defined under § 9-28-402;
(iv) Has experienced three (3) or more placements
within a twelve-month period; or
(v) Is placed in a regular foster home or other
placement that is not directly related to the permanency goal identified in
the case plan required under § 9-28-111;
(3)(A) Order that the parent, both parents, or the guardian of
the juvenile attend a court-ordered parental responsibility training program,
if available, and participate in a juvenile drug court program.
(B) The court may make reasonable orders requiring proof
of completion of such a training program within a certain time period and
payment of a fee covering the cost of the training program;
(4) Determine the most appropriate goal of the case; and
(5) Order that the parent, both parents, or the guardian or
271 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
custodian of the juvenile participate in a family treatment specialty court
program under § 9-27-801 et seq., if available.
(b) Such an order of custody shall supersede an existing court order
of custody and shall remain in full force and effect until a subsequent order
of custody is entered by a court of competent jurisdiction.
(c) The court may provide that any violation of its orders shall
subject any party in violation to contempt sanctions.

9-35-321. Disposition — Dependent-neglected — Limitations.
(a)(1) At least five (5) working days before ordering the Department
of Human Services, excluding community-based providers, to provide or pay for
family services in any case in which the department is not a party, the
circuit court shall fax a written notice of intent to the Secretary of the
Department of Human Services and to the attorney of the local Office of Chief
Counsel of the Department of Human Services.
(2) At any hearing in which the department is ordered to provide
family services, the court shall provide the department with the opportunity
to be heard.
(3) Failure to provide at least five (5) working days' notice to
the department renders any part of the order pertaining to the department
void.
(b)(1) For purposes of this section, the court shall not specify a
particular provider for placement or family services if the department is the
payor or provider.
(2)(A) The court may order a child to be placed or to remain in
a placement if the court finds the placement is in the best interest of the
child after hearing evidence from all parties.
(B) A court may also order a child into a licensed or
approved placement after a hearing in which the court makes a finding that it
is in the best interest of the child based on bona fide consideration of
evidence and recommendations from all the parties.
(C) The court shall not order a child to be placed or
remain in a placement in a foster home that has been closed or suspended by a
child placement agency.
(D)(i) If the health or welfare of a child is in immediate
danger while in a court-ordered placement, the department may immediately
272 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
remove the child from the court-ordered placement.
(ii) The department shall notify all parties within
twenty-four (24) hours of the change in placement under subdivision
(b)(2)(D)(i) of this section.
(iii) A party may request a hearing on the change in
placement made under subdivision (b)(2)(D)(ii) of this section, and the
hearing shall be held within five (5) business days of receiving the request.
(c)(1) In all cases in which family services are ordered, the court
shall determine the ability of the parent, guardian, or custodian to pay, in
whole or in part, for these family services.
(2) The determination of ability to pay and the evidence
supporting it shall be made in writing in the order ordering family services.
(3) If the court determines that the parent, guardian, or
custodian is able to pay, in whole or in part, for the family services, the
court shall enter a written order setting forth the amount the parent,
guardian, or custodian is able to pay for the family services ordered and
order the parent, guardian, or custodian to pay the amount periodically to
the provider from whom family services are received.
(d)(1) Custody of a juvenile may be transferred to a relative or other
individual only after a home study of the placement is conducted by the
department or by a licensed social worker who is approved to do home studies
and submitted to the court in writing and the court determines that the
placement is in the best interest of the juvenile.
(2) A home study is not required for a parent of a juvenile.
(e)(1)(A) The court shall enter an order transferring custody of a
juvenile in a dependency-neglect case only after determining that reasonable
efforts have been made by the department to deliver family services designed
to prevent the need for out-of-home placement and that the need for out-of-
home placement exists.
(B) The juvenile's health and safety shall be the
paramount concern of the court in determining if the department could have
made reasonable efforts to prevent the juvenile's removal.
(2) If the court finds that reasonable efforts to deliver family
services could have been made with the juvenile safely remaining at home but
were not made, the court may:
(A) Dismiss the petition;
273 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(B) Order family services reasonably calculated to prevent
the need for out-of-home placement; or
(C) Transfer custody of the juvenile despite the lack of
reasonable efforts by the department to prevent the need for out-of-home
placement if the transfer is necessary:
(i) To protect the juvenile's health and safety; or
(ii) To prevent the removal of the juvenile from the
jurisdiction of the court.
(f) In a case of medical neglect involving a child's receiving
treatment through prayer alone in accordance with a religious method of
healing in lieu of medical care, the adjudication order shall be limited to:
(1) Preventing or remedying serious harm to the child; or
(2) Preventing the withholding of medically indicated treatment
from a child with a life-threatening condition.
(g) A court shall not commit a juvenile found solely in criminal
contempt to the Division of Youth Services.
(h) For purposes of this section, the court shall not order the
department to expend or forward Social Security benefits for which the
department is payee.

9-35-322. Limitations on detention.
(a) A juvenile who is alleged to be or who has been adjudicated either
dependent-neglected shall not be placed or detained in a secure detention
facility, in a facility utilized for the detention of alleged or adjudicated
delinquent juveniles, or in a facility utilized for the detention of adults
held for, charged with, or convicted of a crime except:
(1)(A) A juvenile may be held in a juvenile detention facility
when he or she has been away from home for more than twenty-four (24) hours
and when the parent, guardian, or other person contacted lives beyond a
fifty-mile driving distance or out of state.
(B)(i) The juvenile may be held in custody in a juvenile
detention facility for purposes of identification, processing, or arranging
for release or transfer to an alternative facility.
(ii) The holding shall be limited to the minimum
time necessary to complete these actions and shall not occur in any facility
utilized for incarceration of adults.
274 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(C)(i) A juvenile held under this subdivision (a)(1) shall
be separated from detained juveniles charged or held for delinquency.
(ii) A juvenile may not be held under this
subdivision (a)(1) for more than six (6) hours if the parent, guardian, or
other person contacted lives in the state or twenty-four (24) hours,
excluding weekends and holidays, if the parent, guardian, or other person
contacted lives out of state; and
(2)(A) An adjudicated-family-in-need-of-services juvenile may be
held in a juvenile detention facility when the court finds that the juvenile
violated a valid court order.
(B)(i) For the purposes of this subdivision (a)(2), a
valid court order shall include any order of a circuit court regarding a
juvenile who has been brought before the court and made subject to a court
order.
(ii) The juvenile who is the subject of the order
shall receive full due process rights.
(C)(i) A juvenile held under this subdivision (a)(2) shall
be separated from detained juveniles charged or held for delinquency.
(ii) The holding shall not occur in any facility
utilized for incarceration of adults.
(b) A juvenile shall not be placed or confined in a jail or lock-up
used for the detention of adults except under the following circumstances:
(1) A juvenile who has been formally transferred from the
juvenile division of circuit court to the criminal division of circuit court
and against whom felony charges have been filed or a juvenile whom the
prosecuting attorney has the discretion to charge in circuit court and to
prosecute as an adult and against whom the circuit court's jurisdiction has
been invoked by the filing of felony charges may be held in an adult jail or
lock-up;
(2)(A) A juvenile alleged to have committed a delinquent act may
be held in an adult jail or lock-up for up to six (6) hours for purposes of
identification, processing, or arranging for release or transfer to an
alternative facility, provided that he or she is separated by sight and sound
from adults who are pretrial detainees or convicted persons.
(B) A holding for those purposes shall be limited to the
minimum time necessary and shall not include travel time for transporting the
275 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
juvenile to the alternative facility; or
(3)(A) A juvenile alleged to have committed a delinquent act who
is awaiting an initial appearance before a judge may be held in an adult jail
or lock-up for up to twenty-four (24) hours, excluding weekends and holidays,
provided the following conditions exist:
(i) The alleged act would be a misdemeanor or a
felony if committed by an adult or is a violation of § 5-73-119;
(ii) The geographical area having jurisdiction over
the juvenile is outside a metropolitan statistical area pursuant to the
current designation of the United States Bureau of the Census;
(iii) No acceptable alternative placement for the
juvenile exists; and
(iv) The juvenile is separated by sight and sound
from adults who are pretrial detainees or convicted persons.
(B)(i) A juvenile awaiting an initial appearance and being
held in an adult jail or lock-up pursuant to the twenty-four-hour exception,
as provided in subdivision (b)(3)(A) of this section, may be held for an
additional period not to exceed twenty-four (24) hours, provided that the
following conditions exist:
(a) The conditions of distance to be traveled
or the lack of highway, road, or other ground transportation does not allow
for court appearances within twenty-four (24) hours; and
(b) All the conditions in subdivision
(b)(3)(A) of this section exist.
(ii) Criteria will be adopted by the Governor or his
or her designee to establish what distance, highway or road conditions, or
ground transportation limitations will provide a basis for holding a juvenile
in an adult jail or lock-up under this exception.
(c) Provided that the facilities are designed and used in accordance
with federal and state guidelines and restrictions, nothing in this
subchapter is intended to prohibit the use of juvenile detention facilities
that are attached to or adjacent to adult jails or lock-ups.
(d) A detention facility shall not release a serious offender for a
less serious offender except by order of the judge who committed the more
serious offender.

276 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
9-35-323. Six-month reviews required.
(a)(1) The court shall review every case of dependency-neglect when:
(A) A juvenile is placed by the court in the custody of
the Department of Human Services or in another out-of-home placement until
there is a permanent order of custody, guardianship, or other permanent
placement for the juvenile; or
(B) A juvenile is returned to the parent from whom the
child was removed, another fit parent, guardian, or custodian and the court
has not discontinued orders for family services.
(2)(A) The first six-month review shall be held no later than
six (6) months from the date of the original out-of-home placement of the
child and shall be scheduled by the court following the adjudication and
disposition hearing.
(B) A dependency-neglect case shall be reviewed every six
(6) months thereafter until permanency is achieved.
(3) A six-month review hearing shall not be required for a
juvenile who:
(A) Is over eighteen (18) years of age; and
(B) Has elected to remain in extended foster care or to
return to extended foster care under § 9-35-302(a)(1)(A)(ii).
(b) The court may require a dependency-neglect case to be reviewed
before the sixth-month review hearing, and the court shall announce the date,
time, and place of the hearing.
(c) At any time during the pendency of any case of dependency-neglect
in which an out-of-home placement has occurred, any party may request the
court to review the case, and the party requesting the hearing shall provide
reasonable notice to all parties.
(d) At any time during the course of a case, the department, the
attorney ad litem, or the court can request a hearing on whether or not
reunification services should be terminated under § 9-35-335.
(e)(1) In each case in which a juvenile has been placed in an out-of-
home placement, the court shall conduct a hearing to review the case
sufficiently to determine the future status of the juvenile based upon the
best interest of the juvenile.
(2)(A) The court shall determine and include in its orders the
following:
277 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(i) Whether the case plan, services, and placement
meet the special needs and best interest of the juvenile, with the juvenile's
health, safety, and educational needs specifically addressed;
(ii) Whether the state has made reasonable efforts
to provide family services;
(iii) Whether the parent or parents or person from
whom custody was removed has demonstrated progress toward the goals of the
case plan and whether completion of the goals has benefited the parent in
remedying the issues that prevent the safe return of the juvenile;
(iv) Whether the case plan is moving toward an
appropriate permanency plan under § 9-35-324 for the juvenile;
(v) Whether the visitation plan is appropriate for
the juvenile, the parent or parents, and any siblings, if separated; and
(vi)(a) Whether the juvenile should be returned to
his or her parent or parents and whether or not the juvenile's health and
safety can be protected by his or her parent or parents if returned home,
either permanently or for a trial placement.
(b) At any time the court determines that the
health and safety of the child can be adequately protected and it is in the
best interest of the child, the court shall return the child to a parent or
parents from whom custody was removed.
(B)(i) The court may order any studies, evaluations, or
post-disposition reports, if needed.
(ii) All studies, evaluations, or post-disposition
reports shall be provided in writing to all parties and counsel at least two
(2) days before the review hearing.
(iii) All parties shall be given a fair opportunity
to controvert any part of a study, evaluation, or post-disposition report.
(3)(A) In making its findings, the court shall consider the
following:
(i) The extent of compliance with the case plan,
including without limitation a review of the department's care for the
health, safety, and education of the juvenile while he or she has been in an
out-of-home placement;
(ii) The extent of progress that has been made
toward alleviating or mitigating the causes of the out-of-home placement;
278 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(iii) Whether the juvenile should be returned to his
or her parent or parents and whether or not the juvenile's health and safety
can be protected by his or her parent or parents if returned home; and
(iv) An appropriate permanency plan under § 9-35-324
for the juvenile, including concurrent planning.
(B) Incompletion of the case plan under subdivision
(e)(3)(A)(i) of this section is an insufficient reason by itself to deny the
juvenile's return to the family home.
(f) Each six-month review hearing shall be completed, and the written
order under subsection (e) of this section shall be filed by the court or by
a party or a party's attorney as designated by the court and distributed to
the parties within thirty (30) days of the date of the hearing or before the
next hearing, whichever is sooner.

9-35-324. Permanency planning hearing.
(a)(1) A permanency planning hearing shall be held to finalize a
permanency plan for the juvenile:
(A) No later than twelve (12) months after the date the
juvenile enters an out-of-home placement;
(B) After a juvenile has been in an out-of-home placement
for fifteen (15) of the previous twenty-two (22) months, excluding trial
placements and time on runaway status; or
(C) No later than thirty (30) days after a hearing
granting no reunification services.
(2) If a juvenile remains in an out-of-home placement after the
initial permanency planning hearing, a permanency planning hearing shall be
held annually to reassess the permanency plan selected for the juvenile.
(b)(1) This section does not prevent the Department of Human Services
or the attorney ad litem from filing at any time before the permanency
planning hearing a petition:
(A) To terminate parental rights;
(B) For guardianship; or
(C) For permanent custody.
(2) A permanency planning hearing is not required before the
filing of the petitions under subdivision (b)(1) of this section.
(c) At the permanency planning hearing, based upon the facts of the
279 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
case, the circuit court shall enter one (1) of the following permanency
goals, listed in order of preference, in accordance with the best interest,
health, and safety of the juvenile:
(1) Placing custody of the juvenile with a fit parent at the
permanency planning hearing;
(2) Returning the juvenile to the guardian or custodian from
whom the juvenile was initially removed at the permanency planning hearing;
(3) Authorizing a plan to place custody of the juvenile with a
parent, guardian, or custodian only if the court finds that:
(A)(i) The parent, guardian, or custodian is complying
with the established case plan and orders of the court, making significant
and measurable progress toward achieving the goals established in the case
plan and diligently working toward reunification or placement in the home of
the parent, guardian, or custodian.
(ii) Regardless of when the effort was made, the
court shall consider all evidence of an effort made by the parent, guardian,
or custodian to remedy the conditions that led to the removal of the juvenile
from the custody of the parent, guardian, or custodian and give the evidence
the appropriate weight and consideration in relation to the safety, health,
and well-being of the juvenile.
(iii) The burden is on the parent, guardian, or
custodian to demonstrate genuine, sustainable investment in completing the
requirements of the case plan and following the orders of the court in order
to authorize a plan to return or be placed in the home as the permanency
goal;
(B) The parent, guardian, or custodian is making
significant and measurable progress toward remedying the conditions that:
(i) Caused the juvenile's removal and the juvenile's
continued removal from the home; or
(ii) Prohibit placement of the juvenile in the home
of a parent; and
(C)(i) Placement of the juvenile in the home of the
parent, guardian, or custodian shall occur within a time frame consistent
with the juvenile's developmental needs but no later than three (3) months
from the date of the permanency planning hearing.
(ii) The court may authorize a plan to place custody
280 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
of a juvenile with a parent, guardian, or custodian of the juvenile despite
finding that placement of the juvenile in the home of the parent, guardian,
or custodian of the juvenile may not occur within the three-month period
required under subdivision (c)(3)(C)(i) of this section if the plan is in the
best interest of the child during extraordinary circumstances.
(iii) As used in this subdivision (c)(3)(C),
“extraordinary circumstances” includes without limitation the following
circumstances:
(a) The Supreme Court orders the suspension of
in-person court proceedings; and
(b) One (1) of the following has occurred:
(1) The President of the United States
has declared a national emergency; or
(2) The Governor has declared a state of
emergency or a statewide public health emergency;
(4) Authorizing a plan to obtain a guardianship or adoption with
a fit and willing relative;
(5) Authorizing a plan for adoption with the department's filing
a petition for termination of parental rights unless:
(A) The juvenile is being cared for by a relative and the
court finds that:
(i) Either:
(a) The relative has made a long-term
commitment to the child and the relative is willing to pursue guardianship or
permanent custody; or
(b) The juvenile is being cared for by his or
her minor parent who is in foster care; and
(ii) Termination of parental rights is not in the
best interest of the juvenile;
(B) The department has documented in the case plan a
compelling reason why filing a petition for termination of parental rights is
not in the best interest of the juvenile and the court approves the
compelling reason as documented in the case plan; or
(C)(i) The department has not provided to the family of
the juvenile, consistent with the time period in the case plan, the services
as the department deemed necessary for the safe return of the juvenile to the
281 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
juvenile's home if reunification services were required to be made to the
family.
(ii) If the department has failed to provide
services as outlined in the case plan, the court shall schedule another
permanency planning hearing for no later than six (6) months;
(6) Authorizing a plan to obtain a guardian for the juvenile;
(7) Authorizing a plan to obtain a permanent custodian,
including permanent custody with a fit and willing relative; or
(8)(A) Authorizing a plan for another planned permanent living
arrangement that includes a permanent planned living arrangement and
addresses the quality of services, including, but not limited to, independent
living services and a plan for the supervision and nurturing the juvenile
will receive.
(B) Another planned permanent living arrangement shall be
selected only if:
(i) The department has documented to the circuit
court a compelling reason for determining that it would not be in the best
interest of the child to follow one (1) of the permanency plans identified in
subdivisions (c)(1)-(7) of this section and this subdivision (c)(8);
(ii) The child is sixteen (16) years of age or
older; and
(iii) The court makes a judicial determination
explaining why, as of the date of the hearing, another planned permanent
living arrangement is the best permanency plan for the juvenile and the court
finds compelling reasons why it continues to not be in the best interest of
the juvenile to:
(a) Return home;
(b) Be placed for adoption;
(c) Be placed with a legal guardian; or
(d) Be placed with a fit and willing relative.
(d) At the permanency planning hearing on a juvenile sixteen (16)
years of age or older, the court shall ask the juvenile his or her desired
permanency outcome, or the attorney ad litem shall enter evidence concerning
the child's wishes.
(e) At every permanency planning hearing the court shall make a
finding on whether the department has made reasonable efforts and shall
282 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
describe the efforts to finalize a permanency plan for the juvenile.
(f) A written order shall be filed by the court or by a party or
party's attorney as designated by the court and distributed to the parties
within thirty (30) days of the date of the hearing or prior to the next
hearing, whichever is sooner.
(g) If the court determines that the permanency goal is adoption, the
department shall file the petition to terminate parental rights within thirty
(30) days from the date of the permanency planning hearing that establishes
adoption as the permanency goal.
(h)(1) The court shall determine if establishing concurrent permanency
planning goals is appropriate.
(2) If the court determines that establishing concurrent
permanency planning goals is appropriate, the court shall establish all
appropriate permanency planning goals subject to the requirements of this
section.
(3) If the court sets a goal of adoption, reunification services
shall continue to be provided unless the court:
(A) Determines that the reunification services are no
longer needed;
(B) Terminates parental rights; or
(C) Otherwise finalizes a permanency plan for the
juvenile.

9-35-325. Termination of parental rights — Definition.
(a)(1)(A) This section shall be a remedy available only to the
Department of Human Services or a court-appointed attorney ad litem.
(B) This section shall not be available for private
litigants or other agencies.
(2)(A) This section shall be used only in cases in which the
department is attempting to clear a juvenile for permanent placement by
terminating the parental rights of a parent and putative parent based on the
definition of “parent” and “putative father” under § 9-35-102.
(B) This section shall not be used to terminate the rights
of a putative parent if a court of competent jurisdiction has previously
determined under § 9-35-314 that the rights of the putative parent have not
attached.
283 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(3) The intent of this section is to provide permanency in a
juvenile's life in all instances in which the return of a juvenile to the
family home is contrary to the juvenile's health, safety, or welfare and it
appears from the evidence that a return to the family home cannot be
accomplished in a reasonable period of time as viewed from the juvenile's
perspective.
(4) The court shall rely upon the record of the parent's
compliance in the entire dependency-neglect case and evidence presented at
the termination hearing in making its decision on whether it is in the best
interest of the juvenile to terminate parental rights.
(b)(1)(A) The circuit court may consider a petition to terminate
parental rights if the court finds that there is an appropriate permanency
placement plan for the juvenile.
(B) This section does not require that a permanency
planning hearing be held as a prerequisite to the filing of a petition to
terminate parental rights or as a prerequisite to the court's considering a
petition to terminate parental rights.
(2)(A) The petitioner shall serve the petition to terminate
parental rights as required under Rule 5 of the Arkansas Rules of Civil
Procedure, except:
(i) Service shall be made as required under Rule 4
of the Arkansas Rules of Civil Procedure if the:
(a) Parent was not served under Rule 4 of the
Arkansas Rules of Civil Procedure at the initiation of the proceeding;
(b) Parent is not represented by an attorney;
or
(c) Initiation of the proceeding was more than
two (2) years ago; or
(ii) When the court orders service of the petition to
terminate parental rights as required under Rule 4 of the Arkansas Rules of
Civil Procedure.
(B) The petitioner shall check with the Putative Father
Registry if the name or whereabouts of the putative father is unknown.
(3) An order forever terminating parental rights shall be based
upon a finding by clear and convincing evidence:
(A) That it is in the best interest of the juvenile,
284 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
including consideration of the following factors:
(i) The likelihood that the juvenile will be adopted
if the termination petition is granted; and
(ii) The potential harm, specifically addressing the
effect on the health and safety of the child, caused by returning the child
to the custody of the parent, parents, or putative parent or parents; and
(B) Of one (1) or more of the following grounds:
(i)(a) That a juvenile has been adjudicated by the
court to be dependent-neglected and has continued to be out of the:
(1) Custody of the parent for twelve
(12) months and, despite a meaningful effort by the department to
rehabilitate the parent and correct the conditions that caused removal, those
conditions have not been remedied by the parent; or
(2) Home of the noncustodial parent for
twelve (12) months and, despite a meaningful effort by the department to
rehabilitate the parent and correct the conditions that prevented the child
from safely being placed in the parent's home, the conditions have not been
remedied by the parent.
(b) It is not necessary that the twelve-month
period referenced in subdivision (b)(3)(B)(i)(a)(1) of this section
immediately precede the filing of the petition for termination of parental
rights or that it be for twelve (12) consecutive months;
(ii)(a) The juvenile has lived outside the
home of the parent for a period of twelve (12) months, and the parent has
willfully failed to provide significant material support in accordance with
the parent's means or to maintain meaningful contact with the juvenile.
(b) To find willful failure to maintain
meaningful contact, it must be shown that the parent was not prevented from
visiting or having contact with the juvenile by the juvenile's custodian or
any other person, taking into consideration the distance of the juvenile's
placement from the parent's home.
(c) Material support consists of either
financial contributions or food, shelter, clothing, or other necessities when
the contribution has been requested by the juvenile's custodian or ordered by
a court of competent jurisdiction.
(d) It is not necessary that the twelve-month
285 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
period under subdivision (b)(3)(B)(ii)(a) of this section immediately precede
the filing of the petition for termination of parental rights or that it be
for twelve (12) consecutive months;
(iii)(a) The parent is not the biological
parent of the juvenile and the welfare of the juvenile can best be served by
terminating the parental rights of the parent.
(b) A termination of parental rights
under subdivision (b)(3)(B)(iii)(a) of this section shall not be considered
an involuntary termination;
(iv) A parent has abandoned the juvenile;
(v)(a) A parent has executed consent to termination
of parental rights or adoption of the juvenile, subject to the court's
approval.
(b) If the consent is executed under oath by a
person authorized to administer the oath, the parent is not required to
execute the consent in the presence of the court unless required by federal
law or federal regulations;
(vi)(a) The court has found the juvenile or a
sibling dependent-neglected as a result of neglect or abuse that could
endanger the life of the child, sexual abuse, or sexual exploitation, any of
which was perpetrated by the juvenile's parent or parents or stepparent or
stepparents.
(b) Such findings by the juvenile division of
circuit court shall constitute grounds for immediate termination of the
parental rights of one (1) or both of the parents;
(vii)(a) That other factors or issues arose
subsequent to the filing of the original petition for dependency-neglect that
demonstrate that placement of the juvenile in the custody of the parent is
contrary to the juvenile's health, safety, or welfare and that, despite the
offer of appropriate family services, the parent has manifested the
incapacity or indifference to remedy the subsequent issues or factors or
rehabilitate the parent's circumstances that prevent the placement of the
juvenile in the custody of the parent.
(b) The department shall make reasonable
accommodations in accordance with the Americans with Disabilities Act of
1990, 42 U.S.C. § 12101 et seq., as it existed on January 1, 2025, to parents
286 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
with disabilities in order to allow them meaningful access to reunification
and family preservation services.
(c) For purposes of this subdivision
(b)(3)(B)(vii), the inability or incapacity to remedy or rehabilitate
includes, but is not limited to, mental illness, emotional illness, or mental
deficiencies.
(d) Subdivision (b)(3)(B)(vii)(a) of this
section does not apply if the factors or issues have not been adjudicated by
the court or the parent is not provided with proper notice of the factors or
issues;
(viii) The parent is sentenced in a criminal
proceeding for a period of time that would constitute a substantial period of
the juvenile's life;
(ix)(a) The parent is found by a court of competent
jurisdiction, including the juvenile division of the circuit court, to:
(1) Have committed murder or
manslaughter of any juvenile or to have aided or abetted, attempted,
conspired, or solicited to commit the murder or manslaughter;
(2) Have committed a felony battery that
results in serious bodily injury to any juvenile or to have aided or abetted,
attempted, conspired, or solicited to commit felony battery that results in
serious bodily injury to any juvenile;
(3)(A) Have subjected any juvenile to
aggravated circumstances.
(B) As used in subdivision
(b)(3)(B)(ix)(a)(3)(A) of this section, "aggravated circumstances” means:
(i) A juvenile has been
abandoned, chronically abused, subjected to extreme or repeated cruelty,
sexually abused, or a determination has been or is made by a judge that there
is little likelihood that services to the family will result in successful
reunification;
(ii) A juvenile has been
removed from the custody of the parent or guardian and placed in foster care
or in the custody of another person three (3) or more times in the last
fifteen (15) months; or
(iii) A child or a sibling
287 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
has been neglected or abused to the extent that the abuse or neglect could
endanger the life of the child;
(4)(A) Have had his or her parental
rights involuntarily terminated as to a child.
(B) It is an affirmative defense
to the termination of parental rights based on a prior involuntary
termination of parental rights that the parent has remedied the conditions
that caused the prior involuntary termination of parental rights; or
(5) Be the parent of an abandoned
infant, as defined under § 9-35-102.
(b) This subchapter does not require
reunification of a surviving child with a parent who has been found guilty of
any of the offenses listed in subdivision (b)(3)(B)(ix)(a) of this section;
or
(x)(a) A putative parent who fails to establish or
maintain meaningful contact with his or her juvenile after:
(1) Being named and served as a party in
a dependency-neglect proceeding;
(2) Receiving notice of a dependency-
neglect proceeding under § 9-35-306 or § 9-35-312; and
(3) The court finds that the rights of
the putative parent with regard to the juvenile have attached.
(b) To find willful failure to maintain
meaningful contact, it shall be shown that the putative parent was not
prevented from visiting or having contact with the juvenile by the custodian
of the juvenile or any other person, taking into consideration the distance
of the juvenile's placement from the putative parent's home.
(c) A termination of parental rights under
subdivision (b)(3)(B)(x)(a) of this section shall not be considered an
involuntary termination.
(d)(1) Subdivision (b)(3)(B)(x)(a) of this
section does not apply to a putative parent whose rights have not attached to
a juvenile.
(2) If a court finds that the rights of
the putative parent have not attached to the juvenile, the court shall
dismiss the putative parent from the petition to terminate parental rights
288 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
and enter an order finding that no further notice is due to the putative
parent.
(c)(1) An order terminating the relationship between parent and
juvenile:
(A) Divests the parent and the juvenile of all legal
rights, powers, and obligations with respect to each other, including the
right to withhold consent to adoption, except the right of the juvenile to
inherit from the parent, that is terminated only by a final order of
adoption; and
(B)(i) Divests a putative parent and the juvenile of all
rights, powers, and obligations with respect to the putative parent and the
juvenile if the rights of the putative parent have attached under § 9-35-314
before or during the termination proceeding.
(ii) The divesting of all the rights, powers, and
obligations of the putative parent and the juvenile shall be based on the
same authority, requirements, limitations, and other provisions that apply to
the termination of the rights of a parent, including without limitation the
provision requiring the dismissal of a putative parent as a party to a case
without further notice to the putative parent.
(2)(A) Termination of the relationship between a juvenile and
one parent shall not affect the relationship between the juvenile and the
other parent if those rights are legally established.
(B) A court may terminate the rights of one parent and not
the other parent if the court finds that it is in the best interest of the
child.
(3) An order terminating parental rights under this section:
(A) May authorize the department to consent to adoption of
the juvenile; and
(B) Dismisses the parent or putative parent subject to the
termination of parental rights as a party to the case without further notice
to the parent or putative parent required.
(d)(1) The court shall conduct and complete a termination of parental
rights hearing within ninety (90) days from the date the petition for
termination of parental rights is filed unless continued for good cause as
articulated in the written order of the court.
(2)(A) The court may continue a termination of parental rights
289 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
hearing for up to one hundred eighty (180) days from the date the petition
for termination of parental rights is filed in extraordinary circumstances.
(B) As used in this subdivision (d)(2), “extraordinary
circumstances” includes without limitation the following circumstances:
(i) The Supreme Court orders the suspension of in-
person court proceedings; and
(ii) One (1) of the following has occurred:
(a) The President of the United States has
declared a national emergency; or
(b) The Governor has declared a state of
emergency or a statewide public health emergency.
(e) A written order shall be filed by the court or by a party or
party's counsel as designated by the court within thirty (30) days of the
date of the termination hearing or before the next hearing, whichever is
sooner.
(f) After the termination of parental rights hearing, the court shall
review the case at least every six (6) months, and a permanency planning
hearing shall be held each year following the initial permanency hearing
until permanency is achieved for that juvenile.
(g)(1)(A) A parent may withdraw consent to termination of parental
rights within ten (10) calendar days after it was signed by filing an
affidavit with the circuit clerk in the county designated by the consent as
the county in which the termination of parental rights will be filed.
(B) If the ten-day period ends on a weekend or legal
holiday, the person may file the affidavit the next working day.
(C) No fee shall be charged for the filing of the
affidavit.
(2) The consent to terminate parental rights shall state that
the person has the right of withdrawal of consent and shall provide the
address of the circuit clerk of the county in which the termination of
parental rights will be filed.
(h) Upon the entry of an order terminating parental rights the:
(1) Department is relieved of all responsibility for providing
reunification services to the parent whose parental rights are terminated;
(2) Appointed parent counsel is relieved of his or her
representation of the parent whose parental rights are terminated except as
290 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
provided under Rules 6-9 and 6-10 of the Rules of the Supreme Court and Court
of Appeals of the State of Arkansas;
(3) Appointed parent counsel shall be reappointed to represent a
parent who successfully appeals the termination of his or her parental rights
if the parent is indigent; and
(4) Parent whose parental rights are terminated or a putative
parent who after receiving notice is determined by a court to not have rights
attached to the juvenile is not entitled to:
(A) Notice of any court proceeding concerning the
juvenile, including a petition for adoption concerning the juvenile; and
(B) An opportunity to be heard in any court proceeding
concerning the juvenile.

9-35-326. Proceedings concerning juveniles for whom paternity not
established.
(a) Absent orders of a circuit court or another court of competent
jurisdiction to the contrary, the biological mother, whether adult or minor,
of a juvenile for whom paternity has not been established is deemed to be the
natural guardian of that juvenile and is entitled to the care, custody, and
control of that juvenile.
(b) The biological mother, the putative father, the juvenile himself
or herself, or the Office of Child Support Enforcement may bring an action to
establish paternity or support of a juvenile for whom paternity has not been
established.
(c)(1) If the juvenile is not born when the parties appear before the
court, the court may hear evidence and issue temporary orders and findings
pending the birth of the juvenile.
(2) In the event the final order is contrary to the temporary
one, the court shall render judgment for the amount paid under the temporary
order against the petitioner if such was the biological mother.
(3) If the mother dies before the final order, the action may be
revived in the name of the juvenile, and the mother's testimony at the
temporary hearing may be introduced in the final hearing.
(d)(1) Upon an adjudication by the court that the putative father is
the father of the juvenile, the court shall follow the same guidelines,
procedures, and requirements as established by the laws of this state
291 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
applicable to child support orders and judgments entered upon divorce.
(2) The court may award court costs and attorney's fees.
(e)(1) If paternity has been established in a court of competent
jurisdiction, a father may petition the court in the county where the
juvenile resides for custody of the juvenile.
(2) The court may award custody to a father who has had
paternity established if the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence
that:
(A) He is a fit parent to raise the juvenile;
(B) He has assumed his responsibilities toward the
juvenile by providing care, supervision, protection, and financial support
for the juvenile; and
(C) It is in the best interest of the juvenile to award
custody to the father.
(f) At the request of either party in a paternity action, the trial
court shall direct that the putative father, biological mother, and juvenile
submit to one (1) or more blood tests or other scientific examinations or
tests, including deoxyribonucleic acid typing, to:
(1) Determine whether or not the putative father can be excluded
as being the father of the juvenile; and
(2) Establish the probability of paternity if the test does not
exclude the putative father.
(g) The tests under subsection (f) of this section shall be made by a
duly qualified physician or physicians, or by another duly qualified person
or persons, not to exceed three (3), to be appointed by the court.
(h)(1) The results of the tests under subsection (f) of this section
shall be receivable in evidence.
(2)(A)(i) A written report of the test results by the duly
qualified expert performing the test, or by a duly qualified expert under
whose supervision and direction the test and analysis have been performed,
certified by an affidavit duly subscribed and sworn to by the expert before a
notary public, may be introduced in evidence in illegitimacy actions without
calling the expert as a witness.
(ii) If either party shall desire to question the
expert, the party shall have the expert subpoenaed within a reasonable time
before trial.
292 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(B) If the results of the paternity tests establish a
ninety-five percent (95%) or more probability of inclusion that the putative
father is the biological father of the juvenile and after corroborating
testimony of the mother in regard to access during the probable period of
conception, this shall constitute a prima facie case of establishment of
paternity and the burden of proof shall shift to the putative father to rebut
such proof.
(3) The experts shall be subject to cross-examination by both
parties after the court has caused them to disclose their findings.
(i) Whenever the court orders the blood tests to be taken and one (1)
of the parties refuses to submit to the test, that fact shall be disclosed
upon the trial unless good cause is shown to the contrary.
(j) The costs of the test and witness fees shall be taxed by the court
as other costs in the case.
(k) Whenever it shall be relevant to the prosecution or the defense in
a paternity action, blood tests that exclude third parties as the father of
the juvenile shall be the same as set out in subsections (f) and (g) of this
section.
(l) The refusal of a party to submit to a genetic or other ordered
test is admissible at a hearing to determine paternity only as to the
credibility of the party.
(m) If a male witness offers testimony indicating that his act of
intercourse with the mother may have resulted in the conception of the
juvenile, the court may require the witness to submit to genetic or other
tests to determine whether he is the juvenile's father.

9-35-327. Appeals.
(a) An appeal shall be made to the Supreme Court or to the Court of
Appeals in the time and manner provided for an appeal in the Arkansas Rules
of Appellate Procedure.
(b) Pending an appeal from any case involving a juvenile out-of-home
placement, the juvenile division of circuit court retains jurisdiction to
conduct further hearings.

9-35-328. Duties and responsibilities of custodian.
(a) A person or agency appointed as the custodian of a juvenile in a
293 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
proceeding under this subchapter shall:
(1) Care for and maintain the juvenile; and
(2) See that the juvenile:
(A) Is protected;
(B) Is properly trained and educated; and
(C) Has the opportunity to learn a trade, occupation, or
profession.
(b)(1) The person or agency appointed as the custodian of a juvenile
in a proceeding under this subchapter has the right to obtain medical care
for the juvenile, including giving consent to specific medical, dental, or
mental health treatments and procedures as required in the opinion of a duly
authorized or licensed physician, dentist, surgeon, or psychologist, whether
or not such care is rendered on an emergency, inpatient, or outpatient basis.
(2) If there is an open dependency-neglect proceeding, the
custodian shall not make any of the following decisions without receiving
express court approval:
(A) Consent to the removal of bodily organs, unless the
procedure is necessary to save the life of the juvenile;
(B) Consent to withhold life-saving treatments;
(C) Consent to withhold life-sustaining treatments; or
(D) The amputation of any body part, unless the procedure
is necessary in an emergency to save the life of the juvenile.
(c) The custodian has the right to enroll the juvenile in school upon
the presentation of an order of custody.
(d) The custodian has the right to obtain medical and school records
of any juvenile in his or her custody upon presentation of an order of
custody.
(e) Any agency appointed as the custodian of a juvenile has the right
to consent to the juvenile's travel on vacation or similar trips.
(f)(1) It shall be the duty of every person granted custody,
guardianship, or adoption of any juvenile in a proceeding under or arising
out of a dependency-neglect action under this subchapter to ensure that the
juvenile is not returned to the care or supervision of any person from whom
the child was removed or any person the court has specifically ordered not to
have care, supervision, or custody of the juvenile.
(2) This section shall not be construed to prohibit these
294 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
placements if the person who has been granted custody, guardianship, or
adoption obtains a court order to that effect from the juvenile division of
circuit court that made the award of custody, guardianship, or adoption.
(3) Failure to abide by subdivision (f)(1) of this section is
punishable as a criminal offense under § 5-26-502(a)(3).
(g)(1) The court shall not split custody.
(2) As used in this section, "split custody" means granting
legal custody to one (1) person or agency and granting physical custody to
another person or agency.

9-35-329. Progress reports on juveniles.
(a)(1) The court may order progress reports from a service provider
whenever a juvenile is placed out of home and in a setting other than a
Department of Human Services foster home.
(2) The order shall:
(A) Set forth the schedule for the progress reports; and
(B) Identify the service provider responsible for
submitting the progress reports.
(3) The service provider shall be provided a copy of the written
court order by:
(A) Certified mail, restricted delivery; or
(B) Process server.
(4) Failure to follow the order of the court shall subject the
service provider to contempt sanctions of the court.
(b) A progress report shall include, but not be limited to the:
(1) Reason for admission;
(2) Projected length of stay;
(3) Identified goals and objectives to be addressed during
placement;
(4) Progress of the juvenile in meeting goals and objectives;
(5) Barriers to progress;
(6) Significant behavioral disruptions and response of provider;
and
(7) Recommendations upon the juvenile's release.
(c) The service provider shall immediately report any incidents
concerning the juvenile's health or safety to:
295 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(1) The juvenile's attorney or attorney ad litem; and
(2) The custodian of the juvenile.

9-35-330. Placement of juveniles.
(a) The court shall not specify a particular provider for placement of
a foster child.
(b)(1)(A) When the Department of Human Services takes custody of a
juvenile under § 12-18-1001, or when the court determines that a juvenile
shall be removed from his or her home under this subchapter, the department
shall conduct an immediate assessment to locate:
(i) A noncustodial parent of the juvenile;
(ii) Recommended relatives of the juvenile,
including each grandparent of the juvenile, and all parents of the juvenile's
sibling if the parent has custody of the sibling; and
(iii) Fictive kin identified by the juvenile as one
(1) or more persons who play or have a significant positive role in his or
her life.
(B)(i) If there is a safety issue identified from a Child
Maltreatment Central Registry check or criminal background check, the
department is not required to provide further assessment or notice to the
persons identified under subdivision (b)(1)(A) of this section.
(ii) If there is not a safety issue identified in a
Child Maltreatment Central Registry check or criminal background check
regarding all the persons identified under subdivision (b)(1)(A) of this
section, the department shall provide in writing to the persons identified
the following notice:
(a) A statement saying that the juvenile has
been or is being removed from his or her parent;
(b) An explanation concerning how to
participate and be considered for care, placement, and family time with the
juvenile;
(c) Information needed for a child welfare
safety check and home study, if the person is interested in placement;
(d) Information about provisional relative
foster care, fictive kin, and other supportive benefits available through the
department;
296 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(e) A statement saying that failure to timely
respond may result in the loss of opportunities to be involved in the care,
placement, and family time with the juvenile; and
(f) The name, phone number, email address, and
physical address of the caseworker and supervisor assigned to the case.
(C) If the court has not transferred custody to a
noncustodial parent, relative, or other individual, or the department has not
placed the juvenile in provisional relative placement or fictive kin
placement, the department shall continue its assessment under subdivisions
(b)(1)(A) and (B) of this section throughout the case.
(D) The department shall provide upon request of the
court, parties to the proceeding, or counsel for the parties to the
proceeding a record of the efforts made to locate the noncustodial parent,
relatives, fictive kin, or other persons identified under subdivision
(b)(1)(A) of this section and the results of the assessment, including the
following information concerning the identified person:
(i) Name;
(ii) Last known address and phone number;
(iii) The appropriateness of placement based on the
department's assessment of the person; and
(iv) Other identifying or relevant information to
the extent known by the department.
(E)(i) A relative or fictive kin identified by the
department under subdivision (b)(1)(A) of this section shall be given
preferential consideration for placement if the relative or fictive kin meets
all relevant protective standards and it is in the best interest of the
juvenile to be placed with the relative or fictive kin.
(ii) In all placements, preferential consideration
for a relative or fictive kin shall be given at all stages of the case.
(iii) If the court denies placement with a relative
or fictive kin, the court shall make specific findings of fact in writing
regarding the considerations given to the relative or fictive kin and the
reasons the placement was denied.
(iv) The court shall not base its decision to place
the juvenile solely upon the consideration of the relationship formed between
the juvenile and a foster parent.
297 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(F)(i) The court may transfer custody to any relative or
any other person recommended by the department, the parent, or any party upon
review of a home study, including criminal background and child maltreatment
reports, and a finding that custody is in the best interest of the child.
(ii) A home study is not required for a parent of a
juvenile.
(2) Placement or custody of a juvenile in the home of a
relative, fictive kin, or other person shall not relieve the department of
its responsibility to actively implement the goal of the case.
(3)(A) The juvenile shall remain in a licensed or approved
foster home, shelter, or facility or an exempt child welfare agency as
defined under § 9-28-402 until the home is opened as a regular foster home,
as a provisional foster home if the person is a relative to one (1) of the
children in the sibling group, including step-siblings, or the court grants
custody of the juvenile to the relative, fictive kin, or other person after a
written approved home study is presented to the court.
(B) For placement only with a relative or fictive kin:
(i) The juvenile and the juvenile's siblings or
step-siblings may be placed in the home of a relative or fictive kin on a
provisional basis for up to six (6) months pending the relative or fictive
kin's home being opened as a regular foster home;
(ii)(a) If the relative or fictive kin opts to
have his or her home opened as a provisional foster home, the relative or
fictive kin shall not be paid a board payment until the relative or fictive
kin meets all of the requirements and his or her home is opened as a regular
foster home.
(b) A relative or fictive kin who has his or
her home opened as a provisional foster home may receive a board payment from
the department for no more than six (6) months unless fully opened as a
foster home;
(iii) Until the relative or fictive kin's home is
opened as a regular foster home, the relative or fictive kin may:
(a) Apply for and receive benefits that the
relative or fictive kin may be entitled to due to the placement of the
juvenile in the home, such as benefits under the Transitional Employment
Assistance Program, § 20-76-401, and the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance
298 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
Program; and
(b) Receive child support or any federal
benefits paid on behalf of the juvenile in the relative or fictive kin's
home; and
(iv) If the relative or fictive kin's home is not
fully licensed as a foster home after six (6) months of the placement of the
juvenile and the siblings or step-siblings in the home:
(a) The department shall remove the juvenile
and any of the siblings or step-siblings from the relative or fictive kin's
home and close the relative or fictive kin's provisional foster home; or
(b) The court shall remove custody from the
department and grant custody of the juvenile to the relative or fictive kin
subject to the limitations outlined in subdivision (b)(4) of this section.
(4) If the court grants custody of the juvenile and any siblings
or step-siblings to the relative, fictive kin, or other person:
(A)(i) The juvenile and any siblings or step-siblings
shall not be placed back in the custody of the department while remaining in
the home of the relative, fictive kin, or other person.
(ii) The juvenile and any siblings or step-siblings
shall not be removed from the custody of the relative, fictive kin, or other
person, placed in the custody of the department, and then remain or be
returned to the home of the relative, fictive kin, or other person while
remaining in the custody of the department;
(B)(i) The relative, fictive kin, or other person shall
not receive any financial assistance, including board payments, from the
department, except for financial assistance for which the relative, fictive
kin, or other person has applied and for which the relative, fictive kin, or
other person qualifies under the program guidelines, such as the Transitional
Employment Assistance Program, the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program,
Medicaid, and a federal adoption subsidy.
(ii) A relative or fictive kin who has his or her
home opened as a provisional foster home may receive a monthly board payment
from the department for no more than six (6) months unless fully opened as a
foster home; and
(C) The department shall not be ordered to pay the
equivalent of board payments, adoption subsidies, or guardianship subsidies
299 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
to the relative, fictive kin, or other person as reasonable efforts to
prevent removal of custody from the relative, fictive kin, or other person.
(5) In an action under this subsection concerning placement of a
juvenile, the circuit court may consider the preferences of the juvenile if
the juvenile is of a sufficient age and capacity to reason, regardless of the
juvenile's chronological age.
(c)(1)(A) The court may order a juvenile who is in the custody of the
department to be placed in a trial home placement with a parent of the
juvenile or the person from whom custody of the juvenile was removed for a
period of:
(i) No longer than sixty (60) days; or
(ii) More than sixty (60) days but no longer than
one hundred eighty (180) days with the consent of the department.
(B) The department may place a juvenile who is in its
custody in a trial home placement with a parent of the juvenile or the person
from whom custody of the juvenile was removed for no longer than one hundred
eighty (180) days.
(C) A trial home placement with a parent who did not have
custody of the juvenile at the time of the removal of the juvenile and
placement into the custody of the department may occur only after the court
or the department determines that:
(i) The trial home placement is in the best interest
of the juvenile;
(ii) The noncustodial parent does not have a
restriction on contact with the juvenile; and
(iii) There is no safety concern with the trial home
placement after reviewing:
(a) The criminal background of the
noncustodial parent;
(b) The home of the noncustodial parent and
each person in the home of the noncustodial parent; and
(c) Other information in the records of the
department, including without limitation records concerning foster care,
child maltreatment, protective services, and supportive services.
(2)(A) At every stage of the case, the court shall consider the
least restrictive placement for the juvenile and assess safety concerns that
300 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
prevent either a trial home placement or the juvenile from being returned to
or placed in the custody of the parent of the juvenile.
(B) The court shall detail the safety concerns in
subdivision (c)(2)(A) of this section in its written order.
(C) Failure to complete a case plan is not a sufficient
reason alone to deny the placement of the juvenile in the home of a parent of
the juvenile.
(D) A trial home placement may be made with a parent of
the juvenile or the person from whom custody of the juvenile was removed.
(3) At the end of the trial home placement:
(A) The court shall place custody of the juvenile with the
parent of the juvenile or the person from whom custody of the juvenile was
removed; or
(B) The department shall return the juvenile to a licensed
or approved foster home, shelter, or facility or an exempt child welfare
agency as defined in § 9-28-402.
(d) When a juvenile leaves the custody of the department and the court
grants custody to the parent or another person, the department is no longer
legal custodian of the juvenile, even if the juvenile division of circuit
court retains jurisdiction.

9-35-331. Fifteenth-month review hearing.
(a) A hearing shall be held to determine whether the Department of
Human Services shall file a petition to terminate parental rights if:
(1) A juvenile has been in an out-of-home placement for fifteen
(15) continuous months, excluding trial placements and time on runaway
status; and
(2) The goal at the permanency planning hearing was either
reunification or Another Planned Permanent Living Arrangement (APPLA).
(b) The circuit court shall authorize the department to file a
petition to terminate parental rights unless:
(1)(A)(i) The child is being cared for by a relative or
relatives;
(ii) Termination of parental rights is not in the
best interest of the child;
(iii) The relative has made a long-term commitment
301 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
to the child; and
(iv) The relative is willing to pursue adoption,
guardianship, or permanent custody of the juvenile; or
(B)(i) The child is being cared for by his or her parent
who is in foster care; and
(ii) Termination of parental rights is not in the
best interest of the child;
(2)(A) The department has documented in the case plan a
compelling reason why filing a petition is not in the best interest of the
child; and
(B) The court approves the compelling reason as documented
in the case plan; or
(3) The department has not provided to the family of the
juvenile, consistent with the time period in the case plan, the services the
department deemed necessary for the safe return of the child to the child's
home if reunification services were required to be made to the family.
(c) If the court determines the permanency goal to be adoption, the
department shall file a petition to terminate parental rights no later than
the fifteenth month of the child's entry into foster care.
(d) If the court finds that the juvenile should remain in an out-of-
home placement, either long-term or otherwise, the juvenile's case shall be
reviewed every six (6) months, with an annual permanency planning hearing.
(e) A written order shall be filed by the court or by a party or
party's attorney as designated by the court and distributed to the parties
within thirty (30) days of the date of the hearing or prior to the next
hearing, whichever is sooner.

9-25-332. Review of termination of parental rights.
(a) After an order of termination of parental rights, the circuit
court shall review the case following the termination hearing at least every
six (6) months until permanency is achieved, and a permanency planning
hearing shall be held each year following the initial permanency hearing
until permanency is achieved for that juvenile.
(b) The court shall determine and shall include in its orders whether:
(1) The case plan, services, and current placement meet the
juvenile's special needs and best interest, with the juvenile's health,
302 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
safety, and educational needs specifically addressed;
(2) The Department of Human Services has made reasonable efforts
to finalize a permanency plan for the juvenile; and
(3) The case plan is moving toward an appropriate permanent
placement for the juvenile.
(c) In making its findings, the court shall consider the extent of the
compliance of the department and the juvenile with the case plan and court
orders to finalize the permanency plan.
(d) A written order shall be filed by the court or by a party or a
party's attorney as designated by the court and distributed to the parties
within thirty (30) days of the date of the hearing or prior to the next
hearing, whichever is sooner.

9-35-333. Court reports.
(a)(1) Seven (7) business days before a scheduled dependency-neglect
review hearing, including the fifteenth-month review hearing and any post-
termination of parental rights hearing, the Department of Human Services and
a court-appointed special advocate, if appointed, shall:
(A) Distribute a review report to all the parties or their
attorneys and the court-appointed special advocate, if appointed; or
(B) Upload into a shared case management database an
electronic copy of the court report.
(2)(A) The court report prepared by the department shall include
a summary of the compliance of the parties with the court orders and case
plan, including the description of the services and assistance the department
has provided and recommendations to the court.
(B) In cases in which a child has been returned home, the
department's review report shall include a description of any services needed
by and requirements of the parent or parents, including, but not limited to,
a safety plan to ensure the health and safety of the juvenile in the home.
(C)(i) In cases in which a juvenile has been transferred
to the custody of the department, the department's court report shall outline
the efforts made by the department to identify and notify adult grandparents
and other adult relatives that the juvenile is in the custody of the
department.
(ii) The department's court report shall list all
303 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
adult grandparents and other adult relatives notified by the department and
the response of each adult grandparent or other adult relative to the notice,
including:
(a) The adult grandparent or other adult
relative's interest in participating in the care and placement of the
juvenile;
(b) Whether the adult grandparent or other
adult relative is interested in becoming a provisional foster parent or
foster parent of the juvenile;
(c) Whether the adult grandparent or other
adult relative is interested in kinship guardianship, if funding is
available; and
(d) Whether the adult grandparent or other
adult relative is interested in family time.
(3) The report prepared by the court-appointed special advocate
shall include, but is not limited to:
(A) Any independent factual information that he or she
feels is relevant to the case;
(B) A summary of the compliance of the parties with the
court orders;
(C) Any information on adult relatives, including their
contact information and the volunteer's recommendation about relative
placement and family time; and
(D) Recommendations to the court.
(4)(A) At a review hearing, the court shall determine on the
record whether the previously filed reports shall be admitted into evidence
based on any evidentiary objections made by the parties.
(B) The court shall not consider as evidence any report or
part of a report that was not admitted into evidence on the record.
(b)(1) Seven (7) business days before a scheduled dependency-neglect
permanency planning hearing, the department and the court-appointed special
advocate, if appointed, shall:
(A) Distribute a permanency planning court report to all
of the parties or their attorneys and the court-appointed special advocate,
if appointed; or
(B) Upload into a shared case management database an
304 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
electronic copy of the court report.
(2) The permanency planning court report prepared by the
department shall include, but not be limited to, the following:
(A) A summary of the compliance of the parties with the
court orders and case plan, including the description of the services and
assistance the department has provided;
(B) A list of all the placements in which the juvenile has
been;
(C) A recommendation and discussion regarding the
permanency plan, including:
(i) The appropriateness of the plan;
(ii) A timeline; and
(iii) The steps and services necessary to achieve
the plan, including the persons responsible; and
(D) The location of any siblings, and if separated, a
statement for the reasons for separation and any efforts to reunite or
maintain contact if appropriate and in the best interest of the siblings.
(3) The report prepared by the court-appointed special advocate
shall include, but is not limited to:
(A) Any independent factual information that he or she
feels is relevant to the case;
(B) A summary of the compliance of the parties with the
court orders;
(C) Any information on adult relatives, including their
contact information and the volunteer's recommendation about relative
placement and family time; and
(D) The recommendations to the court.
(4)(A) At the permanency planning hearing, the court shall
determine on the record whether the previously filed reports shall be
admitted into evidence based on any evidentiary objections made by the
parties.
(B) The court shall not consider as evidence any report or
part of a report that was not admitted into evidence on the record.
(c)(1) The court shall determine on the record whether a report or an
addendum report shall be admitted into evidence based on any evidentiary
objections made by the parties.
305 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(2) The court shall not consider as evidence any report, part of
a report, or an addendum report that was not admitted into evidence on the
record.

9-35-334. Foster youth transition.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) A juvenile in foster care should have a family for a
lifetime, but too many juveniles in foster care reach the age of majority
without being successfully reunited with their biological families and
without the security of permanent homes;
(2) A juvenile in foster care who is approaching the age of
majority shall be provided the opportunity to be actively engaged in the
planning of his or her future; and
(3) The Department of Human Services shall:
(A) Include the juvenile in the process of developing a
plan to transition the child into adulthood;
(B) Empower the juvenile with information about all of the
options and services available;
(C) Provide the juvenile with the opportunity to
participate in services tailored to his or her individual needs and designed
to enhance his or her ability to receive the skills necessary to enter
adulthood;
(D) Assist the juvenile in developing and maintaining
healthy relationships with nurturing adults who can be a resource and
positive guiding influences in his or her life after he or she leaves foster
care; and
(E) Provide the juvenile with basic information and
documentation regarding his or her biological family and personal history.
(b)(1) The department shall assist a juvenile in foster care or
entering foster care with the development of a transitional life plan when
the juvenile turns fourteen (14) years of age or within ninety (90) days of
his or her fourteenth birthday, whichever occurs first.
(2) The plan shall include without limitation written
information and confirmation concerning:
(A) A description of the programs and services that will
help the juvenile prepare for transition from foster care to a successful
306 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
adulthood, including without limitation the John H. Chafee Foster Care
Program for Successful Transition to Adulthood;
(B) The juvenile's right to remain in extended foster care
after reaching eighteen (18) years of age if the juvenile:
(i) Is completing secondary education or a program
leading to an equivalent credential;
(ii) Is enrolled in an institution that provides
postsecondary or vocational education;
(iii) Is participating in a program or activity
designed to promote or remove barriers to employment;
(iv) Is employed for at least eighty (80) hours per
month;
(v) Has a viable plan to meet the requirements of
subdivisions (b)(2)(B)(i)-(iv) of this section; or
(vi) Is incapable of doing one (1) or more of the
activities listed in subdivisions (b)(2)(B)(i)-(v) of this section due to a
medical condition, which incapability is supported by regularly updated
information in the case plan of the juvenile; and
(C) The juvenile's case, including his or her biological
family, foster care placement history, tribal information, if applicable, and
the whereabouts of siblings, if any, unless a court determines that release
of information pertaining to a sibling would jeopardize the safety or welfare
of the sibling.
(c) The department shall assist the juvenile with:
(1) Completing applications for:
(A) ARKids First, Medicaid, or assistance in obtaining
other health insurance;
(B) Referrals to transitional housing, if available, or
assistance in securing other housing; and
(C) Assistance in obtaining employment or other financial
support;
(2) Applying for admission to a college or university, to a
vocational training program, or to another educational institution and in
obtaining financial aid, when appropriate; and
(3) Developing and maintaining relationships with individuals
who are important to the juvenile and who may serve as resources that are
307 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
based on the best interest of the juvenile.
(d) A juvenile and his or her attorney shall fully participate in the
development of his or her transitional plan, to the extent that the juvenile
is able to participate medically and developmentally.
(e)(1) If a juvenile does not have the capacity to successfully
transition into adulthood without the assistance of the Office of Public
Guardian for Adults, the Division of Children and Family Services shall make
a referral to the office no later than six (6) months before the juvenile
reaches eighteen (18) years of age or upon entering foster care, whichever
occurs later.
(2) A representative from the office or a designee shall attend
and participate in the transitional youth staffing, and information shall be
provided to all of the parties about what services are available and how to
access services for the juvenile after reaching the age of majority.
(f) Before closing a case, the department shall provide a juvenile in
foster care who reaches eighteen (18) years of age or before leaving foster
care, whichever is later, his or her:
(1) Social Security card;
(2) Certified birth certificate or verification of birth record,
if available or if it should have been available to the department;
(3) Family photos in the possession of the department;
(4)(A) All of the juvenile's health records for the time the
juvenile was in foster care and other medical records that were available or
should have been available to the department.
(B) A juvenile who reaches eighteen (18) years of age and
remains in foster care shall not be prevented from requesting that his or her
health records remain private;
(5) All of the juvenile's educational records for the time the
juvenile was in foster care and any other educational records that were
available or should have been available to the department; and
(6) Driver's license or a state-issued official identification
card.
(g) Within thirty (30) days after the juvenile leaves foster care, the
department shall provide the juvenile a full accounting of all funds held by
the department to which he or she is entitled, information on how to access
the funds, and when the funds will be available.
308 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(h) The department shall not request a circuit court to close a
family-in-need-of-services case or dependency-neglect case involving a
juvenile in foster care until the department complies with this section.
(i) The department shall provide notice to the juvenile and his or her
attorney before a hearing in which the department or another party requests a
court to close the case is held.
(j) A circuit court shall continue jurisdiction over a juvenile who
has reached eighteen (18) years of age to ensure compliance with § 9-28-114.
(k) This section does not limit the discretion of a circuit court to
continue jurisdiction for other reasons as provided for by law.

9-35-335. No reunification hearing.
(a)(1)(A) Any party can file a motion for no reunification services at
any time.
(B) The motion shall be provided to all parties in writing
at least twenty (20) days before a scheduled hearing.
(C) The court may conduct a hearing immediately following
or concurrent with an adjudication determination or at a separate hearing if
proper notice has been provided.
(2) The motion shall identify sufficient facts and grounds in
sufficient detail to put the defendant on notice as to the basis of the
motion for no reunification services.
(3)(A) A response is not required.
(B) If a party responds, the time for response shall not
be later than ten (10) days after receipt of the motion.
(b)(1) The court shall conduct and complete a no reunification hearing
within fifty (50) days of the date of written notice to the defendants and
shall enter an order determining whether or not reunification services shall
be provided.
(2) Upon good cause shown, the hearing may be continued for an
additional twenty (20) days.
(c) An order terminating reunification services on a party and ending
the duty of the Department of Human Services to provide services to a party
shall be based on a finding of clear and convincing evidence that:
(1) The termination of reunification services is in the child's
best interest; and
309 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(2) One (1) or more of the following grounds exist:
(A) A circuit court has determined that the parent,
guardian, custodian, or noncustodial parent has subjected the child to
aggravated circumstances that include:
(i) A child's being abandoned;
(ii) A child's being chronically abused;
(iii) A child's being sexually exploited;
(iv) A child's being subjected to extreme or
repeated cruelty or sexual abuse;
(v) A determination by a circuit judge that there is
little likelihood that services to the family will result in successful
reunification;
(vi) A child has been removed from the custody of
the parent or guardian and placed in foster care or the custody of another
person three (3) or more times in the past fifteen (15) months; or
(vii) A child's or a sibling's being neglected or
abused such that the abuse or neglect could endanger the life of the child;
or
(B) A circuit court has determined that the parent:
(i) Has committed murder of a child;
(ii) Has committed manslaughter of a child;
(iii) Has aided or abetted, attempted, conspired, or
solicited to commit murder or manslaughter;
(iv) Has committed a felony battery that results in
serious bodily injury to any child;
(v) Had parental rights involuntarily terminated as
to a sibling of the child; or
(vi) Is the parent of an abandoned infant as defined
under § 9-35-102.
(d) Upon a determination that no reunification services shall be
provided, the court shall hold a permanency planning hearing within thirty
(30) days unless permanency for the juvenile has been achieved through
guardianship, custody, or a petition for termination of parental rights has
been filed within thirty (30) days.
(e) A written order setting forth the court's findings of fact and law
shall be filed with the court, by the court, or by a party or party's
310 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
attorneys as designated by the court within thirty (30) days or before the
next hearing, whichever is sooner.

9-35-336. Resumption of services.
(a) The Department of Human Services or an attorney ad litem may file
a motion to resume services for a parent whose parental rights were
previously terminated under this subchapter if:
(1) The child:
(A) Is currently in the custody of the department;
(B) Is not in an adoptive placement, a pre-adoptive
placement, or under another permanent placement and there is some evidence
that the juvenile is not likely to achieve permanency within a reasonable
period of time as viewed from the child's perspective; or
(C) Was previously adopted, appointed a permanent
guardian, or placed in the permanent custody of another individual and the
adoption, guardianship, or custodial placement was disrupted or otherwise
dissolved; and
(2)(A) The order terminating the parental rights of the parent
who is the subject of a motion filed under this section was entered at least
three (3) years before the date on which the motion to resume services was
filed.
(B) The three-year waiting period may be waived if it is
in the best interest of the child.
(b)(1) A motion filed under this section shall identify the parent for
whom services would resume.
(2) A parent shall not be named as a party to a motion filed
under this section.
(3) The petitioner shall serve the parent who is the subject of
a motion filed under this section with the motion.
(4) A parent who is the subject of a motion filed under this
section shall have the right to be heard at a hearing on the motion.
(c) When determining whether to grant or deny a motion filed under
this section, the court shall consider the:
(1) Efforts made by the department to achieve adoption or other
permanent placement for the child, including without limitation any barriers
preventing permanency from being achieved;
311 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(2) Current status of the parent who is the subject of the
motion, including without limitation the extent to which the parent has
remedied any conditions that led to the termination of his or her parental
rights;
(3) Willingness of the parent who is the subject of the motion
to participate with the services offered; and
(4) Child's wishes regarding a resumption of contact,
visitation, or placement with the parent who is the subject of the motion.
(d)(1) A court may grant a motion filed under this section if it finds
by a preponderance of the evidence that it is in the best interest of the
child to resume services and establish appropriate contact or family time
between the child and the parent or placement of the child with the parent.
(2) If the court grants a motion filed under this section, the
court:
(A)(i) May order family services for the purposes of
assisting reunification between the child and a fit parent who is the subject
of the motion.
(ii) The court may order the parent to pay for some
or all of the costs associated with court-ordered family services;
(B)(i) May order studies, evaluations, home studies, or
post-disposition reports.
(ii) A written home study on the parent who is the
subject of the motion shall be submitted to the court before the court may
order unsupervised visitation or placement of the juvenile with the parent.
(iii) If a study, evaluation, or home study is
performed before a hearing on a motion filed under subsection (a) of this
section, the results of the study, evaluation, or home study shall be served
on the parent, attorney ad litem, court-appointed special advocate, and any
other party to the motion at least two (2) business days before the hearing;
and
(C) Shall schedule a review hearing every ninety (90) days
until the court:
(i) Finds that it is not in the best interest of the
child to have contact, family time, or placement with the parent;
(ii) Enters an order reinstating the rights of the
parent under § 9-35-337; or
312 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(iii) No longer has jurisdiction over the case.
(3) A staffing shall be held and a case plan developed within
thirty (30) days of the date on which the order granting a motion for
resumption of services under this section is entered.
(e) A court may deny a motion filed under this section if the court
finds by a preponderance of the evidence that the parent who is the subject
of the motion engaged in conduct that interfered with the child's ability to
achieve permanency.
(f) The written order of the court shall be filed by the court, a
party, or the attorney of a party as designated by the court and distributed
to the parties within thirty (30) days of the date of the hearing on the
motion to resume services or before the next hearing, whichever is sooner.

9-35-337. Reinstatement of parental rights.
(a) The Department of Human Services or an attorney ad litem may file
a petition to reinstate the parental rights of a parent whose parental rights
have been terminated under this subchapter if the:
(1) Court has granted a motion to resume services under § 9-35-
336;
(2) Services have continued for at least one hundred eighty
(180) days following the date on which the court entered the order granting a
motion to resume services under § 9-35-336; and
(3) Parent for whom reinstatement of parental rights is sought
has substantially complied with the orders of the court and with the case
plan developed under § 9-35-336.
(b) A petition to reinstate parental rights shall be filed in the
circuit court that had jurisdiction over the petition to terminate the
parental rights of the parent who is the subject of the petition to reinstate
parental rights.
(c) A petition filed under this section shall be served on the:
(1) Attorney ad litem;
(2) Department;
(3) Parent who is the subject of the petition;
(4) Court Appointed Special Advocate Program Director, if
applicable; and
(5) Child's tribe, if applicable.
313 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(d) At least seven (7) business days before a hearing on a petition
filed under this section, the department shall provide the parent, parent's
counsel, attorney ad litem, court-appointed special advocate, and any other
party to the petition with a written report that includes information on:
(1) The efforts made by the department to achieve adoption or
another permanent placement for the child, including without limitation any
barriers to the adoption or permanent placement of the child;
(2) The extent to which the parent who is the subject of the
petition has complied with the case plan and orders of the court as of the
date on which services were ordered to be resumed under § 9-35-336;
(3) The impact of the resumed services on the parent and on the
health, safety, and well-being of the child; and
(4) Any recommendations of the department.
(e) Parental rights may be reinstated under this section if the court
finds by clear and convincing evidence that:
(1) Reinstatement of parental rights is in the best interest of
the child; and
(2) There has been a material change in circumstances as to the
parent who is the subject of the petition since the date on which the order
terminating the parental rights of the parent was entered.
(f) The court shall consider the following factors when determining
whether a reinstatement of parental rights is in the best interest of the
child:
(1) The likelihood of the child achieving permanency through
adoption or another permanent placement;
(2) The age, maturity, and preference of the child concerning
the reinstatement of parental rights;
(3) The parent's fitness and whether the parent has remedied the
conditions that existed at the time of the termination of his or her parental
rights; and
(4) The effect that the reinstatement of parental rights would
have on the health, safety, and well-being of the child.
(g) A court may deny a petition filed under this section if the court
finds by a preponderance of the evidence that the parent engaged in conduct
that interfered with the child's ability to achieve permanency.
(h) An order reinstating the parental rights of the parent who is the
314 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
subject of a petition filed under this section restores all rights, powers,
privileges, immunities, duties, and obligations of the parent as to the
child, including without limitation custody, control, and support of the
child.
(i) If the child is placed with a parent whose parental rights are
reinstated under this section, the court shall not close the case until the
child has resided with the parent for no less than six (6) months.
(j) A written order shall be filed by the court, a party, or the
attorney of a party as designated by the court within thirty (30) days of the
date of the hearing on the motion to reinstate parental rights or before the
next hearing, whichever is sooner.
(k) An order reinstating parental rights under this section does not:
(1) Vacate or affect the validity of a previous order
terminating the parental rights of the parent who is the subject of the
petition; and
(2) Restore or impact the rights of a parent who is not the
subject of a petition filed under this section.
(l) This section is retroactive and applies to a child who is under
the jurisdiction of a court at the time of a hearing on a petition to
terminate parental rights, regardless of the date on which parental rights
were terminated by court order.

Subchapter 4 — Juvenile Delinquency

9-35-401. Purposes — Construction.
This subchapter shall be liberally construed to the end that its
purposes may be carried out to:
(1) Protect society more effectively by substituting for
retributive punishment, whenever possible, methods of offender rehabilitation
and rehabilitative restitution, recognizing that the application of sanctions
that are consistent with the seriousness of the offense is appropriate in all
cases; and
(2) Provide means through which the provisions of this
subchapter are executed and enforced and in which the parties are assured a
fair hearing and their constitutional and other legal rights recognized and
enforced.
315 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320

9-35-402. Jurisdiction.
(a)(1) The circuit court shall have exclusive original jurisdiction of
and shall be the sole court for the following proceedings governed by this
subchapter, including without limitation:
(A)(i) Proceedings in which a juvenile is alleged to be
delinquent as defined in this subchapter, including juveniles ten (10) to
eighteen (18) years of age.
(ii) The court may retain jurisdiction of a juvenile
who has been adjudicated delinquent up to twenty-one (21) years of age if the
juvenile committed the delinquent act before reaching eighteen (18) years of
age;
(B) Proceedings for which a juvenile is alleged to be an
extended juvenile jurisdiction offender under § 9-27-501 et seq.; and
(C) Proceedings for which a juvenile is transferred to the
juvenile division of circuit court from the criminal division of circuit
court under § 9-35-412.
(2) A juvenile shall not remain under the court's jurisdiction
past twenty-one (21) years of age.
(3) The court shall retain jurisdiction to issue orders of
adoption, interlocutory or final, if a juvenile is placed outside the State
of Arkansas.
(b) The assignment of cases to the juvenile division of the circuit
court shall be as described by the Supreme Court in Administrative Order
Number 14, originally issued on April 6, 2001.
(c)(1) The circuit court shall have concurrent jurisdiction with the
district court over juvenile curfew violations.
(2) For juvenile curfew violations, the prosecutor may file a
family in need of services petition in circuit court or a citation in
district court.
(d) The circuit court shall have jurisdiction to hear proceedings
commenced in any court of this state or court of comparable jurisdiction of
another state that are transferred to it under the Uniform Child-Custody
Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act, § 9-19-101 et seq.

9-35-403. Venue.
316 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(a)(1)(A) Except as set forth in subdivisions (a)(2)-(4) of this
section, a proceeding under this subchapter shall be commenced in the circuit
court of the county in which the juvenile resides.
(B) Proceedings may be commenced in the county where the
alleged act or omission occurred in a delinquency case.
(2) Proceedings under the Uniform Child-Custody Jurisdiction and
Enforcement Act, § 9-19-101 et seq., shall be commenced in the court provided
by the Uniform Child-Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act, § 9-19-101 et
seq.
(3) An adoption or guardianship may be filed in a juvenile court
that has previously asserted continuing jurisdiction of the juvenile.
(4) A juvenile proceeding shall comply with § 16-13-210, except
a detention hearing under § 9-35-420 and a probable cause hearing under § 9-
35-310.
(b)(1) Before transferring a case to another venue, the court shall
contact the judge in the other venue to confirm that the judge in the other
venue will accept the transfer.
(2)(A) Upon confirmation that the judge will accept the transfer
of venue, the transferring judge shall enter the transfer order.
(B) The transfer order shall:
(i) Indicate that the judge has accepted the
transfer;
(ii) State the location of the court in the new
venue; and
(iii) Set the time and date of the next hearing.
(C) The transfer order shall be:
(i) Provided to all parties and attorneys to the
case; and
(ii) Transmitted immediately to the judge accepting
the transfer.
(3) The transferring court shall also ensure that all court
records are copied and sent to the judge in the new venue.

9-35-404. Personnel — Duties.
(a) The judge or judges of the circuit court designated to hear
juvenile cases in the judge's district plan under Supreme Court
317 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
Administrative Order Number 14, originally issued on April 6, 2001, shall
designate no fewer than one (1) person in the judge's judicial district as
intake officer and no fewer than one (1) person in the judge's judicial
district as probation officer.
(b) An officer designated under subsection (a) of this section shall
have the following duties:
(1) To make appropriate investigations and reports when required
to do so by:
(A) This subchapter;
(B) The rules promulgated under this subchapter; or
(C) Order of the court;
(2) To aid and counsel juveniles and their families when
required to do so by order of the court;
(3) To perform all other appropriate functions assigned to him
or her by:
(A) This subchapter;
(B) The rules promulgated under this subchapter; or
(C) Order of the court; and
(4) To give appropriate aid and assistance to the court when
requested to do so by the judge.
(c) The provisions of this subchapter relative to juvenile officers
and their responsibilities in delinquency cases may be applicable to a
juvenile officer's involvement in a family in need of services case.

9-35-405. Confidentiality of records — Definition.
(a) All records may be closed and confidential within the discretion
of the circuit court, except:
(1) Records of a delinquency adjudication for which a juvenile
could have been tried as an adult shall be made available to a prosecuting
attorney for use at sentencing if the juvenile is subsequently tried as an
adult or to determine if the juvenile should be tried as an adult; and
(2) The Administrative Office of the Courts shall provide the
Arkansas Crime Information Center with records of a delinquency adjudication
for a juvenile adjudicated delinquent for an offense for which juvenile
fingerprints shall be taken under § 9-35-414.
(b)(1)(A) Records of a delinquency adjudication for a felony involving
318 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
violence as defined under § 5-4-501 shall be kept for ten (10) years after
the last adjudication of delinquency or the date of a plea of guilty or nolo
contendere or a finding of guilt as an adult.
(B) After ten (10) years after the last adjudication of
delinquency or the date of a plea of guilty or nolo contendere or a finding
of guilt as an adult under subdivision (b)(1)(A) of this section, the records
may be expunged.
(2) The court:
(A) May expunge other juvenile records at any time; and
(B) Shall expunge all the records of a juvenile upon his
or her twenty-first birthday in a delinquency case.
(3) For purposes of this section, “expunge” means to destroy.
(c) Records of a juvenile who is designated as an extended juvenile
jurisdiction offender shall be kept for ten (10) years after the last
adjudication of delinquency, date of plea of guilty or nolo contendere, or
finding of guilt as an adult or until the juvenile's twenty-first birthday,
whichever is longer.
(d)(1) If an adult criminal sentence is imposed on an extended
juvenile jurisdiction offender, the record of that case shall be considered
an adult criminal record.
(2)(A) The court shall enter an order transferring the juvenile
record to the clerk who is the custodian of adult criminal records.
(B) The clerk shall assign a criminal docket number and
shall maintain the file as if the case had originated as a criminal case.
(e) This section does not apply to nor restrict the use or publication
of statistics, data, or other materials that summarize or refer to any
records, reports, statements, notes, or other information in the aggregate
and that do not refer to or disclose the identity of any juvenile defendant
in any proceeding when used only for the purpose of research and study.
(f) This subchapter does not preclude a prosecuting attorney or the
court from providing information, upon written request, concerning the
disposition of a juvenile who has been adjudicated delinquent to:
(1) The victim or his or her next of kin; or
(2) The school superintendent of the school district or the
designee of the school superintendent of the school district:
(A) To which the juvenile transfers;
319 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(B) In which the juvenile is enrolled; or
(C) From which the juvenile receives services.
(g) The prosecuting attorney shall notify the school superintendent or
the designee of the school superintendent of the school district to which the
juvenile transfers, in which the juvenile is enrolled, or from which the
juvenile receives services if the juvenile is adjudicated delinquent for:
(1) An offense:
(A) For which the juvenile could have been charged as an
adult; or
(B) Involving a deadly weapon as defined in § 5-1-102;
(2) Kidnapping under § 5-11-102;
(3) Battery in the first degree under § 5-13-201;
(4) Sexual indecency with a child under § 5-14-110;
(5) Sexual assault in the first degree, § 5-14-124;
(6) Sexual assault in the second degree, § 5-14-125;
(7) Sexual assault in the third degree, § 5-14-126;
(8) Sexual assault in the fourth degree, § 5-14-127; or
(9) The unlawful possession of a handgun under § 5-73-119.
(h) Information provided under subsections (f) and (g) of this section
shall not be released in violation of any state or federal law protecting the
privacy of the juvenile.
(i)(1) If a juvenile is arrested for unlawful possession of a firearm
under § 5-73-119, an offense involving a deadly weapon as defined in § 5-1-
102, or battery in the first degree under § 5-13-201, the arresting agency
shall orally notify the superintendent or the designee of the superintendent
of the school district to which the juvenile transfers, in which the juvenile
is enrolled, or from which the juvenile receives services of the offense for
which the juvenile was arrested or detained within twenty-four (24) hours of
the arrest or detention or before the next school day, whichever is earlier.
(2)(A) The superintendent of the school district to which the
juvenile transfers, in which the juvenile is enrolled, or from which the
juvenile receives services shall then immediately notify:
(i) The principal of the school;
(ii) The resource officer of the school; and
(iii) Any other school official with a legitimate
educational interest in the juvenile.
320 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(B) The arrest information shall:
(i) Be treated as confidential information; and
(ii) Not be disclosed by the superintendent or the
designee of the superintendent to any person other than a person listed in
subdivision (i)(2)(A) of this section.
(C) A person listed in subdivision (i)(2)(A) of this
section who is notified of the arrest or detention of a juvenile by the
superintendent or the designee of the superintendent shall maintain the
confidentiality of the information he or she receives.
(3) The arrest information shall be used by the school only for
the limited purpose of obtaining services for the juvenile or to ensure
school safety.
(j) Records of the arrest of a juvenile, the detention of a juvenile,
proceedings under this subchapter, and the records of an investigation that
is conducted when the alleged offender is an adult and relates to an offense
that occurred when the alleged offender was a juvenile shall be confidential
and shall not be subject to disclosure under the Freedom of Information Act
of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq., unless:
(1) Authorized by a written order of the juvenile division of
circuit court;
(2) The arrest or the proceedings under this subchapter result
in the juvenile's being formally charged in the criminal division of circuit
court for a felony; or
(3) Allowed under this section or § 9-35-414.
(k) Information regarding the arrest or detention of a juvenile and
related juvenile proceedings shall be confidential unless the exchange of
information is:
(1) For the purpose of obtaining services for the juvenile, to
ensure school safety, or to ensure public safety;
(2) Reasonably necessary to achieve one (1) or more purposes;
and
(3) Under a written order by the circuit court.
(l)(1) The information regarding the arrest or detention of a juvenile
and related juvenile proceedings may be given only to the following persons:
(A) A school counselor;
(B) A juvenile court probation officer or caseworker;
321 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(C) A law enforcement officer;
(D) A spiritual representative designated by the juvenile
or his or her parents or legal guardian;
(E) A Department of Human Services caseworker;
(F) A community-based provider designated by the court,
the school, or the parent or legal guardian of the juvenile;
(G) A Department of Health representative;
(H) The juvenile's attorney ad litem or other court-
appointed special advocate; or
(I)(i) A school superintendent or the designee of the
superintendent of the school district to which the juvenile transfers, in
which the juvenile is enrolled, or from which the juvenile receives services.
(ii) A school superintendent or the designee of the
superintendent of the school district in which the juvenile is enrolled or
from which the juvenile receives services shall immediately notify the
following persons of information he or she obtains under subdivision
(l)(1)(I)(i) of this section:
(a) The principal of the school;
(b) The resource officer of the school; and
(c) Any other school official with a
legitimate educational interest in the juvenile.
(2) The persons listed in subdivision (l)(1) of this section may
meet to:
(A) Exchange information;
(B) Discuss options for assistance to the juvenile;
(C) Develop and implement a plan of action to assist the
juvenile;
(D) Ensure school safety; and
(E) Ensure public safety.
(3) The juvenile and his or her parent or legal guardian shall
be notified within a reasonable time before a meeting and may attend any
meeting of the persons referred to in subdivision (l)(1) of this section when
three (3) or more individuals meet to discuss assistance for the juvenile or
protection of the public due to the juvenile's behavior.
(4) Medical records, psychiatric records, psychological records,
and related information shall remain confidential unless the juvenile's
322 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
parent or legal guardian waives confidentiality in writing specifically
describing the records to be disclosed between the persons listed in
subdivision (l)(1) of this section and the purpose for the disclosure.
(5) Persons listed in subdivision (l)(1) of this section who
exchange any information referred to in this section may be held civilly
liable for disclosure of the information if the person does not comply with
limitations set forth in this section.
(m)(1) When a court orders that a juvenile shall have a safety plan
that restricts or requires supervised contact with another juvenile or
juveniles as it relates to student or school safety, the court shall direct
that a copy of the safety plan and a copy of the court order regarding the
safety plan concerning student or school safety be provided to the school
superintendent and principal of the school district:
(A) To which the juvenile transfers;
(B) In which the juvenile is enrolled; or
(C) From which the juvenile receives services.
(2) When a court order amends or removes any safety plan under
subdivision (m)(1) of this section, the court shall direct that a copy of the
safety plan and a copy of the court order regarding the safety plan, as it
relates to student or school safety, be provided to the school superintendent
and principal of the school district:
(A) To which the juvenile transfers;
(B) In which the juvenile is enrolled; or
(C) From which the juvenile receives services.
(3)(A) The superintendent or principal of the school district in
which the juvenile is enrolled or from which the juvenile receives services
shall provide verbal notification only to school officials who are necessary
to implement the safety plan as ordered by the court to ensure student
safety.
(B) The verbal notification under subdivision (m)(3)(A) of
this section may be provided only to assistant principals, counselors,
resource officers, and the school employees who are primarily responsible for
the supervision of the juvenile or responsible for the learning environment
of the juvenile in the school district in which the juvenile is enrolled or
from which the juvenile receives services, and to bus drivers, if applicable.
(4) A school official that receive a court order and safety plan
323 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
or information concerning the court order and safety plan shall:
(A) Keep the information confidential and shall sign a
statement not to disclose the information concerning the court order and
safety plan that shall be kept by the superintendent or principal along with
the court order and safety plan;
(B) Keep the information confidential and shall not
disclose the information to any person not listed in subdivision (l)(1) of
this section;
(C) Include the information in the juvenile's permanent
educational records; and
(D)(i) Treat the information and documentation contained
in the court order as education records under the Family Educational Rights
and Privacy Act, 20 U.S.C. § 1232g, as it existed on January 1, 2025.
(ii) A school official shall not release, disclose,
or make available the information and documentation contained in the court
order for inspection to any party except as permitted under the Family
Educational Rights and Privacy Act, 20 U.S.C. § 1232g, as it existed on
January 1, 2025.
(iii) However, the local education agency shall not
release, disclose, or make available for inspection to the public, any
college, university, institution of higher education, vocational or trade
school, or any past, present, or future employer of the student the court
order or safety plan portion of a student record.
(5) When a student attains an age that he or she is no longer
under the jurisdiction of the juvenile division of circuit court, the safety
plan and the order regarding the safety plan shall be removed from the
juvenile's permanent records at the local education agency and destroyed.

9-35-406. Commencement of proceedings.
(a) A proceeding shall be commenced by filing a petition with the
circuit clerk of the circuit court or by transfer by another court.
(b)(1) The prosecuting attorney shall have sole authority to file a
delinquency petition or petition for revocation of probation.
(2) A petition for paternity establishment may be filed by:
(A) The biological mother;
(B) A putative father;
324 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(C) A juvenile; or
(D) The Office of Child Support Enforcement.
(c) Concurrent with filing, the petitioner shall mail a copy of any
petition that requests that the Department of Human Services take custody or
provide family services to the:
(1) Secretary of the Department of Human Services; and
(2) Attorney of the local Office of Chief Counsel of the
Department of Human Services.
(d)(1) A person may submit a complaint of an act or omission to the
intake officer that, if substantiated, would constitute delinquency.
(2) The intake officer may refer the matter to the prosecuting
attorney or an appropriate agency upon the complaint's substantiation.
(e) A fee, including without limitation a fee for filing, copying, or
faxing, including a fee for a petition for adoption or a fee for a
guardianship, summons, or subpoena, shall not be charged or collected by the
circuit clerk or sheriff's office in a case brought in the circuit court
under this subchapter by a governmental entity or nonprofit corporation,
including without limitation:
(1) The prosecuting attorney;
(2) An attorney ad litem appointed in a dependency-neglect case;
or
(3) The Department of Human Services.
(f) If the circuit clerk's office has a fax machine, the circuit
clerk, in a case commenced in the circuit court under this subchapter by a
governmental entity or nonprofit corporation, including without limitation
the prosecuting attorney, an attorney ad litem appointed in a dependency-
neglect case, or the Department of Human Services, shall accept facsimile
transmissions of any papers filed under this subchapter as described in Rule
5 of the Arkansas Rules of Civil Procedure.

9-35-407. Required contents of petition.
(a) The petition shall set forth the following:
(1) The name, address, gender, Social Security number, and date
of birth of each juvenile subject of the petition;
(2) The name and address of each of the parents or the surviving
parent of the juvenile or juveniles;
325 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(3) The name and address of the person, agency, or institution
having custody of the juvenile or juveniles;
(4) The name and address of any other person, agency, or
institution having a claim to custody or guardianship of the juvenile or
juveniles; and
(5) In a proceeding to establish paternity, the name and address
of both the putative father and the presumed legal father, if any.
(b) If the name or address of anyone listed in subsection (a) of this
section is unknown or cannot be ascertained by the petitioner with reasonable
diligence, this fact shall be alleged in the petition and the petition shall
not be dismissed for insufficiency, but the court shall direct appropriate
measures to find and give notice to the person.
(c)(1) A person named in subdivisions (a)(1)-(3) of this section shall
be made a defendant and served as required by this subchapter.
(d) The petition shall set forth the following in plain and concise
words:
(1) The facts that, if proven, would bring the family or
juvenile within the court's jurisdiction;
(2) The section of this subchapter upon which jurisdiction for
the petition is based;
(3) The relief requested by the petitioner; and
(4) Any and all sections of the criminal laws allegedly
violated.

9-35-408. Notification to defendants.
A copy of the petition and either a notice of hearing or order to
appear shall be served in the manner provided by the Arkansas Rules of Civil
Procedure to:
(1) A juvenile defendant ten (10) years of age and older;
(2) A person having care and control of the juvenile; and
(3) All adult defendants.

9-35-409. Taking into custody.
(a)(1) A juvenile may be taken into custody without a warrant before
service upon him or her of a petition and notice of hearing or order to
appear as set out under § 9-35-408 only as follows:
326 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(A) By an order of the circuit court under this
subchapter;
(B) By a law enforcement officer without a warrant under
circumstances as set forth in Rule 4.1 of the Arkansas Rules of Criminal
Procedure; or
(C) By a designated person under § 12-18-1001 et seq.
(2) When a juvenile is taken into custody without a warrant, the
officer taking the juvenile into custody shall immediately make every effort
possible to notify the custodial parent, guardian, or custodian of the
juvenile's location.
(b)(1) When a juvenile is taken into custody pursuant to a warrant,
the officer taking the juvenile into custody shall immediately take the
juvenile before the judge of the division of circuit court out of which the
warrant was issued and make every effort possible to notify the custodial
parent, guardian, or custodian of the juvenile's location.
(2) The judge shall decide whether the juvenile should be tried
as a delinquent or as a criminal defendant under § 9-35-412.
(c)(1)(A) A law enforcement officer shall take a juvenile to
detention, immediately make every effort to notify the custodial parent,
guardian, or custodian of the juvenile's location, and notify the juvenile
intake officer within twenty-four (24) hours so that a petition may be filed
if a juvenile is taken into custody for:
(i) Unlawful possession of a handgun, § 5-73-
119(a)(1);
(ii) Possession of a handgun on school property, §
5-73-119(b)(1);
(iii) Unlawful discharge of a firearm from a
vehicle, § 5-74-107;
(iv) Any felony committed while armed with a
firearm; or
(v) Criminal use of prohibited weapons, § 5-73-104.
(B) The authority of a juvenile intake officer to make a
detention decision under § 9-35-416 shall not apply when a juvenile is
detained under subdivision (c)(1)(A) of this section.
(C) The court shall hold a detention hearing under § 9-35-
420 within:
327 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(i) Seventy-two (72) hours after the juvenile is
taken into custody; or
(ii) If the seventy-two (72) hours ends on a
Saturday, Sunday, or holiday, on the next business day after the juvenile is
taken into custody.
(2) If a juvenile is taken into custody for an act that would be
a felony if committed by an adult, other than a felony listed in subdivision
(c)(1)(A) of this section, the law enforcement officer shall immediately make
every effort possible to notify the custodial parent, guardian, or custodian
of the juvenile's location and may:
(A)(i) Take the juvenile to detention.
(ii) The intake officer shall be notified immediately
to make a detention decision under § 9-35-416 within twenty-four (24) hours
of the time the juvenile was first taken into custody, and the prosecuting
attorney shall be notified within twenty-four (24) hours.
(iii) If the juvenile remains in detention, a
detention hearing shall be held no later than seventy-two (72) hours after
the juvenile is taken into custody or if the seventy-two (72) hours ends on a
Saturday, Sunday, or holiday, on the next business day;
(B) Under the Arkansas Rules of Criminal Procedure, issue
a citation for the juvenile and his or her parents to appear for a first
appearance before the court and release the juvenile and within twenty-four
(24) hours notify the juvenile intake officer and the prosecuting attorney so
that a petition may be filed under this subchapter; or
(C) Return the juvenile to his or her home.
(3) If a juvenile is taken into custody for an act that would be
a misdemeanor if committed by an adult, the law enforcement officer shall
immediately make every effort possible to notify the custodial parent,
guardian, or custodian of the juvenile's location and may:
(A) Notify the juvenile intake officer, who shall make a
detention decision under § 9-35-416;
(B)(i) Under the Arkansas Rules of Criminal Procedure,
issue a citation for the juvenile and his or her parents to appear for a
first appearance before the circuit court; and
(ii) Release the juvenile and notify the juvenile
intake officer and the prosecuting attorney within twenty-four (24) hours so
328 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
that a petition may be filed under this subchapter; or
(C) Return the juvenile to his or her home.
(4)(A) In all instances when a juvenile may be detained, the
juvenile may be held in a juvenile detention facility or a seventy-two-hour
holdover if a bed is available in the juvenile detention facility or
holdover.
(B) If a bed is not available under subdivision (c)(4)(A)
of this section, an adult jail or lock-up may be used, as provided under § 9-
35-425.
(5) In all instances when a juvenile may be detained, the intake
officer shall immediately make every effort possible to notify the juvenile's
custodial parent, guardian, or custodian.
(d) When a law enforcement officer takes custody of a juvenile under
this subchapter for reasons other than those specified in subsection (c) of
this section, he or she shall:
(1)(A)(i) Take the juvenile to shelter care, notify the
department and the intake officer of the court, and immediately make every
possible effort to notify the custodial parent, guardian, or custodian of the
juvenile's location.
(ii) The notification to parents shall be in writing
and shall include a notice of the location of the juvenile, of the juvenile's
and parents' rights to receive a copy of any petition filed under this
subchapter, of the location and telephone number of the court, and of the
procedure for obtaining a hearing.
(B)(i) In cases when the parent, guardian, or other person
contacted lives beyond a fifty-mile driving distance or lives out of state
and the juvenile has been absent from his or her home or domicile for more
than twenty-four (24) hours, the juvenile may be held in custody in a
juvenile detention facility for purposes of identification, processing, or
arranging for release or transfer to an alternative facility.
(ii) The holding shall be limited to the minimum
time necessary to complete these actions and shall not occur in any facility
utilized for incarceration of adults.
(iii) A juvenile held under this subdivision
(d)(1)(B) shall be separated from detained juveniles charged or held for
delinquency.
329 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(iv) A juvenile shall not be held under this
subdivision (d)(1)(B) for more than six (6) hours if the parent, guardian, or
other person contacted lives in the state or twenty-four (24) hours,
excluding weekends and holidays, if the parent, guardian, or other person
contacted lives out of state; or
(2) Return the juvenile to his or her home.
(e) If no delinquency petition to adjudicate a juvenile taken into
custody is filed within twenty-four (24) hours after a detention hearing or
ninety-six (96) hours or, if the ninety-six (96) hours ends on a Saturday,
Sunday, or a holiday, at the close of the next business day, after an alleged
delinquent juvenile is taken into custody, whichever is sooner, the alleged
delinquent juvenile shall be discharged from custody, detention, or shelter
care.

9-35-410. Right to counsel.
(a)(1) In a delinquency case, a juvenile and his or her parent,
guardian, or custodian shall be advised by the law enforcement official
taking a juvenile into custody, by the intake officer at the initial intake
interview, and by the court at the juvenile's first appearance before the
circuit court that the juvenile has the right to be represented at all stages
of the proceedings by counsel.
(2) An extended juvenile jurisdiction offender shall have a
right to counsel at every stage of the proceedings, including all reviews.
(b)(1)(A) The inquiry concerning the ability of the juvenile to retain
counsel shall include a consideration of the juvenile's financial resources
and the financial resources of his or her family.
(B) However, the failure of the juvenile's family to
retain counsel for the juvenile shall not deprive the juvenile of the right
to appointed counsel if required under this section.
(2) After review by the court of an affidavit of financial means
completed and verified by the parent of the juvenile and a determination by
the court that the parent or juvenile has the ability to pay, the court may
order financially able juveniles, parents, guardians, or custodians to pay
all or part of reasonable attorney's fees and expenses for representation of
a juvenile.
(3) All moneys collected by the circuit clerk under this
330 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
subsection shall be retained by the circuit clerk and deposited into a
special fund to be known as the “juvenile representation fund”.
(4) The court may direct that money from the juvenile
representation fund be used in providing counsel for juveniles under this
section in a delinquency or family in need of services case and indigent
parents or guardians in dependency-neglect cases as provided by § 9-35-208, §
9-35-311(e), and subsection (e) of this section.
(5) Any money remaining in the juvenile representation fund at
the end of the fiscal year shall not revert to any other fund but shall carry
over into the next fiscal year in the juvenile representation fund.
(c) If counsel is not retained for the juvenile or it does not appear
that counsel will be retained, counsel shall be appointed to represent the
juvenile at all appearances before the court unless the right to counsel is
waived as set forth under § 9-35-411.
(d) In a proceeding in which the judge determines that there is a
reasonable likelihood that the proceeding may result in the juvenile's
commitment to an institution in which the freedom of the juvenile would be
curtailed and counsel has not been retained for the juvenile, the court shall
appoint counsel for the juvenile.
(e) Appointment of counsel shall be made at a time sufficiently in
advance of the court appearance to allow adequate preparation by appointed
counsel and adequate consultation between the appointed counsel and the
client.

9-35-411. Waiver of right to counsel — Detention of juvenile —
Questioning.
(a) Waiver of the right to counsel at a delinquency hearing shall be
accepted only upon a finding by the court from clear and convincing evidence,
after questioning the juvenile, that:
(1) The juvenile understands the full implications of the right
to counsel;
(2) The juvenile freely, voluntarily, and intelligently wishes
to waive the right to counsel; and
(3) The parent, guardian, custodian, or counsel for the juvenile
has agreed with the juvenile's waiver of the right to counsel.
(b) The agreement of the parent, guardian, custodian, or counsel for
331 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
the juvenile to the juvenile's waiver of the right to counsel shall be
accepted by the court only if the court finds:
(1) That the person has freely, voluntarily, and intelligently
made the decision to agree with the juvenile's waiver of the right to
counsel;
(2) That the person has no interest adverse to the juvenile; and
(3) That the person has consulted with the juvenile in regard to
the juvenile's waiver of the right to counsel.
(c) In determining whether a juvenile's waiver of the right to counsel
at any stage of the proceeding was made freely, voluntarily, and
intelligently, the court shall consider all the circumstances of the waiver,
including without limitation:
(1) The juvenile's physical, mental, and emotional maturity;
(2) Whether the juvenile understood the consequences of the
waiver;
(3) In cases in which the custodial parent, guardian, or
custodian agreed with the juvenile's waiver of the right to counsel, whether
the parent, guardian, or custodian understood the consequences of the waiver;
(4) Whether the juvenile and his or her custodial parent,
guardian, or custodian were informed of the alleged delinquent act;
(5) Whether the waiver of the right to counsel was the result of
any coercion, force, or inducement;
(6) Whether the juvenile and his or her custodial parent,
guardian, or custodian had been advised of the juvenile's right to remain
silent and to the appointment of counsel and had waived such rights; and
(7) Whether the juvenile's waiver of the right to counsel was
recorded in audio or video format and the circumstances surrounding the
availability or unavailability of the recorded waiver.
(d) No waiver of the right to counsel shall be accepted in any case in
which the parent, guardian, or custodian has filed a petition against the
juvenile, initiated the filing of a petition against the juvenile, or
requested the removal of the juvenile from the home.
(e) No waiver of the right to counsel shall be accepted in any case in
which counsel was appointed due to the likelihood of the juvenile's
commitment to an institution under § 9-35-410(d).
(f) No waiver of counsel shall be accepted when a juvenile has been
332 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
designated an extended juvenile jurisdiction offender.
(g) No waiver of the right to counsel shall be accepted when a
juvenile is in the custody of the Department of Human Services, including the
Division of Youth Services.
(h)(1) All waivers of the right to counsel under this section, except
those made in the presence of the court under subsection (a) of this section,
shall be:
(A) In writing; and
(B) Signed by the juvenile.
(2)(A) When a custodial parent, guardian, or custodian cannot be
located or is located and refuses to go to the place where the juvenile is
being held, counsel shall be appointed for the juvenile.
(B) Procedures shall then be the same as if the juvenile
had invoked counsel.
(i)(1)(A) When a law enforcement officer has reasonable cause to
believe that a juvenile found at or near the scene of a felony is a witness
to the offense, he or she may stop that juvenile.
(B) After having stopped the juvenile under subdivision
(i)(1)(A) of this section and identified himself or herself, the law
enforcement officer:
(i) Shall advise the juvenile of the purpose of the
stopping; and
(ii) May then demand of the juvenile his or her
name, address, and any information the juvenile may have regarding the
offense.
(C) A detention under this subsection shall in all cases
be reasonable and shall not exceed fifteen (15) minutes, unless the juvenile
refuses to give the information under subdivision (i)(1)(B)(ii) of this
section, in which case the juvenile, if detained further, shall immediately
be brought before any judicial officer or prosecuting attorney to be examined
with reference to his or her name, address, or the information the juvenile
may have regarding the offense.
(2)(A) A law enforcement officer who takes a juvenile into
custody for a delinquent act or criminal offense shall advise the juvenile of
his or her Miranda rights in the juvenile's own language.
(B) A law enforcement officer shall not question a
333 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
juvenile who has been taken into custody for a delinquent act or criminal
offense until the law enforcement officer has advised the juvenile of his or
her Miranda rights under subdivision (i)(2)(C) of this section in the
juvenile's own language.
(C) A law enforcement officer shall not question a
juvenile who has been taken into custody for a delinquent act or criminal
offense if the juvenile has indicated in any manner that he or she:
(i) Does not wish to be questioned;
(ii) Wishes to speak with his or her custodial
parent, guardian, or custodian or to have that person present; or
(iii) Wishes to consult counsel before submitting to
any questioning.
(D) Any waiver of the right to counsel by a juvenile shall
conform to subsection (h) of this section.

9-35-412. Filing and transfer to criminal division of circuit court.
(a) The state may proceed with a case as a delinquency only when the
case involves a juvenile:
(1) Fifteen (15) years of age or younger when the alleged
delinquent act occurred, except as provided under subdivision (c)(2) of this
section; or
(2) Less than eighteen (18) years of age when he or she engages
in conduct that if committed by an adult would be any misdemeanor.
(b) The state may file a motion in the juvenile division of circuit
court to transfer a case to the criminal division of circuit court or to
designate a juvenile as an extended juvenile jurisdiction offender when a
case involves a juvenile:
(1) Fourteen (14) or fifteen (15) years of age when he or she
engages in conduct that if committed by an adult would be:
(A) Murder in the second degree, § 5-10-103;
(B) Battery in the second degree in violation of § 5-13-
202(a)(2), § 5-13-202(a)(3), or § 5-13-202(a)(4);
(C) Possession of a handgun on school property, § 5-73-
119(b)(1)(A);
(D) Aggravated assault, § 5-13-204;
(E) Unlawful discharge of a firearm from a vehicle, § 5-
334 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
74-107;
(F) Any felony committed while armed with a firearm;
(G) Soliciting or recruiting a minor to join or to remain
a member of a criminal gang, organization, or enterprise, § 5-74-203;
(H) Criminal use of prohibited weapons, § 5-73-104;
(I) First degree escape, § 5-54-110;
(J) Second degree escape, § 5-54-111; or
(K) A felony attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to
commit any of the following offenses:
(i) Capital murder, § 5-10-101;
(ii) Murder in the first degree, § 5-10-102;
(iii) Murder in the second degree, § 5-10-103;
(iv) Kidnapping, § 5-11-102;
(v) Aggravated robbery, § 5-12-103;
(vi) Rape, § 5-14-103;
(vii) Battery in the first degree, § 5-13-201;
(viii) First degree escape, § 5-54-110; and
(ix) Second degree escape, § 5-54-111;
(2) At least fourteen (14) years of age when he or she engages
in conduct that constitutes a felony under § 5-73-119(a); or
(3) At least fourteen (14) years of age when he or she:
(A) Engages in conduct that, if committed by an adult,
constitutes a felony; and
(B) Has, within the preceding two (2) years, three (3)
times been adjudicated as a delinquent juvenile for acts that would have
constituted felonies if those acts had been committed by an adult.
(c) A prosecuting attorney may charge a juvenile in either the
juvenile division of circuit court or criminal division of circuit court when
a case involves a juvenile:
(1) At least sixteen (16) years of age when he or she engages in
conduct that, if committed by an adult, would be any felony; or
(2) Fourteen (14) or fifteen (15) years of age when he or she
engages in conduct that, if committed by an adult, would be:
(A) Capital murder, § 5-10-101;
(B) Murder in the first degree, § 5-10-102;
(C) Kidnapping, § 5-11-102;
335 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(D) Aggravated robbery, § 5-12-103;
(E) Rape, § 5-14-103;
(F) Battery in the first degree, § 5-13-201; or
(G) Terroristic act, § 5-13-310.
(d) If a prosecuting attorney can file charges in the criminal
division of circuit court for an act allegedly committed by a juvenile, the
state may file any other criminal charges that arise out of the same act or
course of conduct in the same division of the circuit court case if, after a
hearing before the juvenile division of circuit court, a transfer is so
ordered.
(e) Upon the motion of the court or of any party, the judge of the
division of circuit court in which a delinquency petition or criminal charges
have been filed shall conduct a transfer hearing to determine whether to
transfer the case to another division of circuit court.
(f) The court shall conduct a transfer hearing within thirty (30) days
if the juvenile is detained and no longer than ninety (90) days from the date
of the motion to transfer the case.
(g) In the transfer hearing, the court shall consider all of the
following factors:
(1) The seriousness of the alleged offense and whether the
protection of society requires prosecution in the criminal division of
circuit court;
(2) Whether the alleged offense was committed in an aggressive,
violent, premeditated, or willful manner;
(3) Whether the alleged offense was against a person or
property, with greater weight being given to offenses against persons,
especially if personal injury resulted;
(4) The culpability of the juvenile, including the level of
planning and participation in the alleged offense;
(5) The previous history of the juvenile, including whether the
juvenile had been adjudicated a juvenile offender and, if so, whether the
offenses were against persons or property, and any other previous history of
antisocial behavior or patterns of physical violence;
(6) The sophistication or maturity of the juvenile as determined
by consideration of the juvenile's home, environment, emotional attitude,
pattern of living, or desire to be treated as an adult;
336 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(7) Whether there are facilities or programs available to the
judge of the juvenile division of circuit court that are likely to
rehabilitate the juvenile before the expiration of the juvenile's twenty-
first birthday;
(8) Whether the juvenile acted alone or was part of a group in
the commission of the alleged offense;
(9) Written reports and other materials relating to the
juvenile's mental, physical, educational, and social history; and
(10) Any other factors deemed relevant by the judge.
(h)(1) The court shall make written findings on all of the factors
under subsection (g) of this section.
(2) The judge shall enter an order to transfer a case to another
division of circuit court upon a finding by clear and convincing evidence.
(i) The criminal division of circuit court may enter an order to
transfer as an extended juvenile jurisdiction case upon a finding by the
criminal division of circuit court that a juvenile fourteen (14) through
seventeen (17) years of age and charged with the crimes in subdivision (c)(2)
of this section should be transferred to the juvenile division of circuit
court.
(j) The judge shall enter a juvenile delinquency disposition under §
9-35-423 if a juvenile fourteen (14) or fifteen (15) years of age is found
guilty in the criminal division of circuit court for an offense other than an
offense listed in subsection (b) or subdivision (c)(2) of this section.
(k) If the case is transferred to another division of circuit court,
any bail or appearance bond given for the appearance of the juvenile shall
continue in effect in the division to which the case is transferred.
(l) Any party may appeal from a transfer order.
(m) The circuit court may conduct a transfer hearing and an extended
juvenile jurisdiction designation hearing under § 9-27-503 at the same time.

9-35-413. Double jeopardy.
(a) A juvenile who has been subjected to an adjudication pursuant to a
petition alleging him or her to be delinquent shall not be tried later under
criminal charges based upon facts alleged in the petition to find him or her
delinquent.
(b) A juvenile who has been tried for a violation of the criminal laws
337 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
of this state shall not be later subjected to a delinquency proceeding
arising out of the facts that formed the basis of the criminal charges.

9-35-414. Fingerprinting or photographing.
(a)(1) When a juvenile is arrested for any offense that if committed
by an adult would constitute a Class Y, Class A, or Class B felony, the
juvenile shall be photographed and fingerprinted by the law enforcement
agency.
(2) In the case of an allegation of delinquency, a juvenile
shall not be photographed or fingerprinted under this subchapter by any law
enforcement agency unless he or she has been taken into custody for the
commission of an offense that, if committed by an adult, would constitute a
Class Y, Class A, or Class B felony.
(b)(1) Copies of a juvenile's fingerprints and photographs shall be
made available only to other law enforcement agencies, the Arkansas Crime
Information Center, prosecuting attorneys, and the juvenile division of
circuit court.
(2) Photographs and fingerprints of juveniles adjudicated
delinquent for offenses for which they could have been tried as adults shall
be made available to prosecuting attorneys and circuit courts for use at
sentencing in subsequent adult criminal proceedings against those same
individuals.
(3)(A) When a juvenile departs without authorization from a
youth services center or other facility operated by the Division of Youth
Services for the care of alleged or adjudicated delinquent juveniles, if at
the time of departure the juvenile is committed or detained for an offense
for which the juvenile could have been tried as an adult, the Director of the
Division of Youth Services shall release to the general public the name, age,
and description of the juvenile and any other pertinent information the
Director of the Division of Youth Services deems necessary to aid in the
apprehension of the juvenile and to safeguard the public welfare.
(B) When a juvenile departs without authorization from the
Arkansas State Hospital, if at the time of departure the juvenile is
committed as a result of an acquittal on the grounds of mental disease or
defect for an offense for which the juvenile could have been tried as an
adult, the Director of the Division of Aging, Adult, and Behavioral Health
338 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
Services shall release to the general public the name, age, and description
of the juvenile and any other pertinent information the Director of the
Division of Aging, Adult, and Behavioral Health Services deems necessary to
aid in the apprehension of the juvenile and to safeguard the public welfare.
(C) When a juvenile departs without authorization from a
local juvenile detention facility, if at the time of departure the juvenile
is committed or detained for an offense for which the juvenile could have
been tried as an adult, the director of the juvenile detention facility shall
release to the general public the name, age, and description of the juvenile
and any other pertinent information the director of the juvenile detention
facility deems necessary to aid in the apprehension of the juvenile and to
safeguard the public welfare.
(c) Each law enforcement agency in the state shall keep a separate
file of photographs and fingerprints, it being the intention that the
photographs and fingerprints of juveniles not be kept in the same file with
those of adults.
(d) When a juvenile is adjudicated delinquent for an offense for which
the juvenile could be charged as an adult:
(1) The arresting law enforcement agency shall ensure that the
fingerprints and photograph of the juvenile have been properly taken and
submitted; and
(2) The court shall submit the adjudicated delinquent
information to the center.
(e) If the juvenile is found not to have committed the alleged
delinquent act, the court:
(1) May order a law enforcement agency to return all pictures
and fingerprints to the circuit court; and
(2) Shall order the law enforcement agency that took the
juvenile into custody to mark the arrest record with the notation “found not
to have committed the alleged offense”.
(f) The center shall create a form to be used for the reporting and
expungement of information pertaining to juveniles.
(g) If a juvenile is arrested for a Class Y, Class A, or Class B
felony but not charged, the prosecuting attorney shall submit the information
to the center, and the records regarding the arrest of the juvenile shall be
removed from the center's records.
339 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320

9-35-415. Statements not admissible.
Statements made by a juvenile to the intake officer or probation
officer during the intake process before a hearing on the merits of the
petition filed against the juvenile shall not be used or be admissible
against the juvenile at any stage of any proceedings in circuit court or in
any other court.

9-35-416. Release from custody.
(a) Upon receiving notice that a juvenile has been taken into custody
on an allegation of delinquency, the intake officer shall immediately notify
the juvenile's parent, guardian, or custodian of the location at which the
juvenile is being held and of the reasons for the juvenile's detention if the
notification has not previously taken place and shall:
(1) Unconditionally release the juvenile to the juvenile's
parent, guardian, or custodian;
(2) Release the juvenile to the juvenile's parent, guardian, or
custodian upon the written promise of the parent, guardian, or custodian to
bring the juvenile before the court when summoned;
(3) Release the juvenile to the juvenile's parent, guardian, or
custodian upon written conditions to ensure the juvenile will be brought
before the court;
(4) Pending court review, place the juvenile in shelter care if
unable to locate the juvenile's parent, guardian, or custodian;
(5) Pending court review, place the juvenile on electronic
monitoring; or
(6) Detain the juvenile pending a detention hearing before the
circuit court.
(b) Criteria for Release by Intake Officer.
(1) In determining whether to detain a juvenile who has been
taken into custody on an allegation of delinquency pending a detention
hearing, the intake officer shall consider the following facts:
(A) Ties to the community, including:
(i) Place and length of residence;
(ii) School attendance;
(iii) Present and past employment;
340 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(iv) Family relationships; and
(v) References; and
(B) The nature of the alleged offense, including:
(i) Whether the offense would constitute a felony or
misdemeanor;
(ii) The use of force or violence;
(iii) Prior juvenile or criminal record; and
(iv) Any history of failure to appear for court
appearances.
(2) The intake officer may determine that there is no less
restrictive alternative to detention if detention is necessary:
(A) To prevent imminent bodily harm to the juvenile or to
another; or
(B) To prevent flight when the juvenile is a fugitive or
escapee from another jurisdiction.
(3) Only if a substantial number of the facts considered under
subdivision (b)(1) of this section weigh against the juvenile or one (1) of
the two (2) circumstances in subdivision (b)(2) of this section exists shall
the juvenile be detained pending a detention hearing by the court.
(c) The juvenile and his or her parent, guardian, or custodian shall
not be charged the cost of detention, shelter, or electronic monitoring
authorized by a juvenile officer under subsection (a) of this section.

9-35-417. Diversion — Conditions — Agreement — Completion —
Definition.
(a) If the prosecuting attorney, after consultation with the intake
officer, determines that a diversion of a delinquency case is in the best
interests of the juvenile and the community, the intake officer with the
consent of the juvenile and his or her parent, guardian, or custodian may
attempt to make a satisfactory diversion of a case.
(b) If the intake officer determines that a diversion of a family in
need of services case is in the best interest of the juvenile and the
community, the intake officer with the consent of the petitioner, juvenile,
and his or her parent, guardian, or custodian may attempt to make a
satisfactory diversion of a case.
(c) In addition to the requirements of subsections (a) and (b) of this
341 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
section, a diversion of a case is subject to the following conditions:
(1) The juvenile has admitted his or her involvement in:
(A) A delinquent act for a delinquency diversion; or
(B) A family in need of services act for a family in need
of services diversion;
(2) The intake officer advises the juvenile and his or her
parent, guardian, or custodian that they have the right to refuse a diversion
of the case and demand the filing of a petition and a formal adjudication;
(3) Any diversion agreement is entered into voluntarily and
intelligently by the juvenile with the advice of his or her attorney or by
the juvenile with the consent of a parent, guardian, or custodian if the
juvenile is not represented by counsel;
(4) The diversion agreement provides for the supervision of a
juvenile or the referral of the juvenile to a public or private agency for
services not to exceed six (6) months;
(5) All other terms of a diversion agreement do not exceed nine
(9) months; and
(6) The juvenile and his or her parent, guardian, or custodian
shall have the right to terminate the diversion agreement at any time and to
request the filing of a petition and a formal adjudication.
(d)(1) The terms of the diversion agreement under this section shall:
(A) Be in writing in simple, ordinary, and understandable
language;
(B) State that the diversion agreement was entered into
voluntarily by the juvenile;
(C) Name the attorney or other person who advised the
juvenile upon the juvenile's entering into the diversion agreement; and
(D) Be signed by all parties to the diversion agreement
and by the prosecuting attorney if it is a delinquency case and the offense
would constitute a felony if committed by an adult or a family in need of
services case under § 6-18-222.
(2) A copy of the diversion agreement shall be given to the
juvenile, the counsel for the juvenile, the parent, guardian, or custodian,
and the intake officer, who shall retain the copy in the case file.
(e) Diversion agreements shall be:
(1) Implemented by all juvenile courts based on validated
342 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
assessment tools; and
(2) Used to provide for:
(A) Nonjudicial probation under the supervision of the
intake officer or probation officer for a period during which the juvenile
may be required to comply with specified conditions concerning his or her
conduct and activities;
(B) Participation in a court-approved program of
education, counseling, or treatment;
(C) Participation in a court-approved teen court;
(D) Participation in a juvenile drug court program;
(E) Enrollment in the Regional Educational Career
Alternative School System for Adjudicated Youth; and
(F)(i) Payment of restitution to the victim.
(ii) Payments of restitution under subdivision
(e)(2)(F)(i) of this section shall be paid under § 16-13-326.
(f)(1) If a diversion of a complaint has been made, a petition based
upon the events out of which the original complaint arose may be filed only
during the period for which the diversion agreement was entered into.
(2) If a petition is filed within this period, the juvenile's
compliance with all proper and reasonable terms of the diversion agreement
shall be grounds for dismissal of the petition by the court.
(g) The diversion agreement may be terminated, and the prosecuting
attorney in a delinquency case or the petitioner in a family in need of
services case may file a petition if at any time during the diversion
agreement period:
(1) The juvenile or his or her parent, guardian, or custodian
declines to further participate in the diversion process;
(2) The juvenile fails, without reasonable excuse, to attend a
scheduled conference;
(3) The juvenile appears unable or unwilling to benefit from the
diversion process; or
(4) The intake officer becomes apprised of new or additional
information that indicates that further efforts at diversion would not be in
the best interest of the juvenile or society.
(h) Upon the satisfactory completion of the diversion period:
(1) The juvenile shall be dismissed without further proceedings;
343 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(2) The intake officer shall furnish written notice of the
dismissal to the juvenile and his or her parent, guardian, or custodian; and
(3) The complaint and the diversion agreement, and all
references to the complaint and the diversion agreement, may be expunged by
the court from the juvenile's file.
(i)(1) A juvenile intake officer or probation officer may charge a
diversion fee only after review of an affidavit of financial means and a
determination of the juvenile's or the juvenile's parent's, guardian's, or
custodian's ability to pay the fee.
(2) The diversion fee shall not exceed twenty dollars ($20.00)
per month payable to the juvenile division of circuit court.
(3) The court may direct that the fees be collected by the
juvenile officer, sheriff, or court clerk for the county in which the fees
are charged.
(4) The officer designated by the court to collect diversion
fees shall maintain receipts and account for all incoming fees and shall
deposit the fees at least weekly into the county treasury of the county where
the fees are collected and in which diversion services are provided.
(5) The diversion fees shall be deposited into the account with
the juvenile service fees under § 16-13-326.
(j)(1) In judicial districts having more than one (1) county, the
judge may designate the treasurer of one (1) of the counties in the district
as the depository of all juvenile division of circuit court fees collected in
the district.
(2) The treasurer designated by the court shall maintain a
separate account of the juvenile division of circuit court fees collected and
expended in each county in the district.
(3) Money remaining at the end of the fiscal year shall not
revert to any other fund but shall carry over to the next fiscal year.
(4) The funds derived from the collection of diversion fees
shall be used by agreement of the judge or judges of the circuit court
designated to hear juvenile cases in their district plan pursuant to Supreme
Court Administrative Order No. 14, originally issued on April 6, 2001, and
the quorum court of the county to provide services and supplies to juveniles
at the discretion of the juvenile division of circuit court.
(k)(1) The Department of Human Services shall develop a statewide
344 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
referral protocol for helping to coordinate the delivery of services to a
sexually exploited child.
(2) As used in this section, “sexually exploited child” means a
person less than eighteen (18) years of age who has been subject to sexual
exploitation because the person:
(A) Is a victim of trafficking of persons under § 5-18-
103;
(B) Is a victim of child sex trafficking under 18 U.S.C. §
1591, as it existed on January 1, 2025; or
(C) Engages in an act of prostitution under § 5-70-102 or
sexual solicitation under § 5-70-103.

9-35-418. Preliminary investigation.
(a) The intake officer shall also conduct a preliminary investigation
upon receiving notice that a juvenile has been taken into custody on an
allegation of delinquency.
(b) In the course of a preliminary investigation, the intake officer
may:
(1) Interview the complainant, victim, or witnesses of the act
and circumstances alleged in the complaint;
(2) Review existing records of the court, law enforcement
agencies, and public records of other agencies; and
(3) Hold conferences with the juvenile and his or her parent,
guardian, or custodian for the purpose of interviewing them and discussing
the disposition of the complaint.
(c) Any additional inquiries may be made only with the consent of the
juvenile and his or her parent, guardian, or custodian.
(d)(1) Participation of the juvenile and his or her parent, guardian,
or custodian in a conference with an intake officer shall be voluntary, with
the right to refuse to continue participation at any time.
(2) At the conferences, the juvenile and his or her parent,
guardian, or custodian shall be advised of the juvenile's right to assistance
of counsel and the right to remain silent when questioned by the intake
officer.

9-35-419. Hearings — Generally.
345 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(a)(1)(A) All hearings under this subchapter shall be conducted by the
judge without a jury, except as provided by the Extended Juvenile
Jurisdiction Act, § 9-27-501 et seq.
(B) If a juvenile is designated an extended juvenile
jurisdiction offender, the juvenile shall have a right to a jury trial at the
adjudication.
(2) The juvenile shall be advised of the right to a jury trial
by the court following a determination that the juvenile will be tried as an
extended juvenile jurisdiction offender.
(3) The right to a jury trial may be waived by a juvenile only
after being advised of his or her rights and after consultation with the
juvenile's attorney.
(4) The waiver shall be in writing and signed by the juvenile
and the juvenile's attorney.
(b) The juvenile is not required to file a written responsive pleading
in order to be heard by the court under this subchapter.
(c)(1) At the time set for hearing under this subchapter, the court
may:
(A) Proceed to hear the case only if the juvenile is
present or excused for good cause by the court; or
(B) Continue the case upon determination that the presence
of an adult defendant is necessary.
(2) Upon determining that a necessary party is not present
before the court, the court may:
(A) Issue an order for contempt if the juvenile was served
with an order to appear; or
(B) Issue an order to appear, with a time and place set by
the court for hearing, if the juvenile was served with a notice of hearing.
(d)(1) Hearings under this subchapter shall be in a court of record.
(2) A record of all proceedings shall be kept in the same manner
as other proceedings of circuit court and in accordance with rules
promulgated by the Supreme Court.
(e)(1) Unless otherwise indicated, the Arkansas Rules of Evidence
shall apply.
(2)(A) Upon motion of any party, the court may order that the
father, mother, or juvenile submit to scientific testing for drug or alcohol
346 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
abuse.
(B) A written report of the test results prepared by the
person conducting the test, or by a person under whose supervision or
direction the test and analysis have been performed, certified by an
affidavit subscribed and sworn to by him or her before a notary public, may
be introduced in evidence without calling the person as a witness unless a
motion challenging the test procedures or results has been filed within
thirty (30) days before the hearing and bond is posted in an amount
sufficient to cover the costs of the person's appearance to testify.
(C)(i) If contested, documentation of the chain of custody
of samples taken from a test subject shall be verified by affidavit of one
(1) person's witnessing the procedure or extraction, packaging, and mailing
of the sample and by one (1) person's signing for the sample at the place
where the sample is subject to the testing procedure.
(ii) Submission of the affidavits along with the
submission of the test results shall be competent evidence to establish the
chain of custody of those specimens.
(D) When a court orders scientific testing for drug or
alcohol abuse and one (1) of the parties refuses to submit to the testing,
that refusal shall be disclosed at trial and may be considered civil contempt
of court.
(f) Except as otherwise provided in this subchapter, the Arkansas
Rules of Criminal Procedure shall apply to all proceedings under this
subchapter.
(g) All parties shall have the right to compel attendance of witnesses
in accordance with the Arkansas Rules of Criminal Procedure.
(h)(1) The petitioner in all proceedings under this subchapter shall
bear the burden of presenting the case at hearings.
(2)(A) The following burdens of proof shall apply:
(i) Proof beyond a reasonable doubt in delinquency
hearings;
(ii) Proof by a preponderance of the evidence in a
probation revocation hearing; and
(iii) Proof by clear and convincing evidence in a
transfer hearing.
(i) Except as provided under § 9-27-502, in any juvenile delinquency
347 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
proceeding under this subchapter in which the juvenile's fitness to proceed
is put in issue by any party or the court, § 5-2-301 et seq. shall apply.
(j) In all proceedings under this subchapter, a juvenile is entitled
to all defenses available to a criminal defendant in circuit court.
(k)(1) A court shall set a hearing to address the entry of a written
order under this subchapter if:
(A) The written order is not provided to the court for
entry within the time specified under this subchapter; and
(B) A party files a motion for a hearing to address the
entry of the written order.
(2)(A) The court shall conduct a hearing to address the entry of
the written order within thirty (30) days from the date on which the motion
for a hearing to address the entry of the written order is filed.
(B) A hearing to address the entry of a written order may
be the next scheduled hearing in the proceeding if the hearing to address the
entry of the written order is being held within thirty (30) days from the
date on which the motion for a hearing to address the entry of the written
order is filed.
(C) The court is not required to conduct a hearing to
address the entry of a written order if the written order is submitted to the
court.
(3) The court shall reassign the preparation of the written
order as needed.

9-35-420. Detention hearing.
(a)(1) If a juvenile is taken into custody on an allegation of
delinquency, violation of Division of Youth Services aftercare, violation of
probation, or violation of a court order and not released by the law
enforcement officer or intake officer, a detention hearing shall be held:
(A) As soon as possible but no later than seventy-two (72)
hours after the juvenile was taken into custody; or
(B) The next business day, if the seventy-two (72) hours
ends on a Saturday, Sunday, or holiday.
(2) If a detention hearing is not held within the time frame
under subsection (a)(1) of this section, the juvenile shall be released.
(b) Prior written notice of the time, place, and purpose of the
348 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
detention hearing under this section shall be given to:
(1) The juvenile;
(2) The juvenile's attorney; and
(3)(A) The juvenile's parent, guardian, or custodian.
(B) However, if the court finds after a reasonable,
diligent effort that the petitioner was unable to notify the parent,
guardian, or custodian, the hearing may proceed without notice to that party.
(c) The petitioner in a detention hearing under this section shall
have the burden of proof by clear and convincing evidence that the restraint
on the juvenile's liberty is necessary and that no less restrictive
alternative will reduce the risk of flight, or of serious harm to property,
or to the physical safety of the juvenile or others.
(d) During the detention hearing under this section, the court shall:
(1) Inform the juvenile in custody:
(A) Of the reasons continued detention is being sought;
(B) That he or she is not required to say anything, and
that anything he or she says may be used against him or her;
(C) That he or she has a right to counsel; and
(D) That before the hearing proceeds further he or she has
the right to communicate with his or her attorney, parent, guardian, or
custodian, and that reasonable means will be provided for him or her to do
so;
(2) Admit testimony and evidence relevant only to determination
that probable cause exists that the juvenile committed the offense as alleged
and that detention of the juvenile is necessary; and
(3) Assess the following factors in determining whether to
release the juvenile prior to further hearings in the case:
(A) Place and length of residence;
(B) Family relationships;
(C) References;
(D) School attendance;
(E) Past and present employment;
(F) Juvenile and criminal records;
(G) The juvenile's character and reputation;
(H) Nature of the charge being brought and any mitigating
or aggravating circumstances;
349 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(I) Whether detention is necessary to prevent imminent
bodily harm to the juvenile or to another;
(J) The possibility of additional violations occurring if
the juvenile is released;
(K) Factors that indicate the juvenile is likely to appear
as required; and
(L) Whether conditions should be imposed on the juvenile's
release.
(e)(1) The court shall release the juvenile detained under this
section when there is a finding that no probable cause exists that the
juvenile committed the offense as alleged.
(2) The court, upon a finding that detention is not necessary,
may release the juvenile:
(A) Upon his or her personal recognizance;
(B) Upon an order to appear;
(C) To his or her parent, guardian, or custodian upon
written promise to bring the juvenile before the court when required;
(D)(i) To the care of a qualified person or qualified
agency agreeing to supervise the juvenile and assist him or her in appearing
in court.
(ii) As used in this subdivision (e)(2)(D),
“qualified agency” does not include the Department of Human Services or any
of its divisions;
(E)(i) Under the supervision of the probation officer or
other appropriate public official.
(ii) As used in subdivision (e)(2)(E), “appropriate
public official” does not include the department;
(F) Upon reasonable restrictions on activities, movements,
associations, and residences of the juvenile;
(G) On bond to his or her parent, guardian, or custodian;
or
(H) Under such other reasonable restrictions to ensure the
appearance of the juvenile.
(3) If the court determines that only a money bond will ensure
the appearance of the juvenile, the court may require:
(A) An unsecured bond in an amount set by the judicial
350 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
officer;
(B) A bond accompanied by a deposit of cash or securities
equal to ten percent (10%) of the face amount set by the court that shall be
returned at the conclusion of the proceedings if the juvenile has not
defaulted in the performance of the conditions of the bond; or
(C) A bond secured by deposit of the full amount in cash,
or by other property, or by obligation of qualified securities.
(4) Orders of conditional release may be modified upon notice,
hearing, and good cause shown.
(5)(A) If the court releases a juvenile under subdivision
(e)(2)(D) of this section, the court, if necessary for the best interest of
the juvenile, may request that the department immediately initiate an
investigation as to whether the juvenile is in imminent danger or a situation
exists whereby the juvenile is dependent-neglected.
(B) The court shall not place preadjudicated juveniles in
the custody of the department.
(f)(1) If the juvenile who is being detained under this section is
also in the custody of the department pursuant to a family in need of
services or dependency-neglect petition and the court does not keep the
juvenile in detention, then any issues regarding placement of the juvenile
shall be addressed only in the family in need of services or dependency-
neglect case and shall not be an issue addressed, nor shall any orders be
entered in the delinquency case regarding placement of the juvenile.
(2) Within ten (10) days of the entry of an order in the
delinquency case, the prosecuting attorney shall file a copy of the order in
the juvenile's dependency-neglect or family in need of services case.

9-35-421. Adjudication hearing.
(a)(1)(A) An adjudication hearing shall be held under this subchapter
to determine whether the allegations against a juvenile in a petition are
substantiated by the proof.
(B) On a motion of the court or any party, the court may
continue the adjudication hearing up to sixty (60) days after the removal
for good cause shown.
(C)(i) The court may continue an adjudication hearing
beyond the sixty-day limitation provided in subdivision (a)(1)(B) of this
351 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
section in extraordinary circumstances.
(ii) As used in this subdivision (a)(1)(C),
“extraordinary circumstances” includes without limitation the following
circumstances:
(a) The Supreme Court orders the suspension of
in-person court proceedings; and
(b) One (1) of the following has occurred:
(1) The President of the United States
has declared a national emergency; or
(2) The Governor has declared a state of
emergency or a statewide public health emergency.
(b) If a juvenile is in detention, an adjudication hearing shall be
held, unless the juvenile or a party is seeking an extended juvenile
jurisdiction designation, not later than fourteen (14) days from the date of
the detention hearing unless waived by the juvenile or good cause is shown
for a continuance.
(c) In extended juvenile jurisdiction offender proceedings, the
adjudication shall be held within the time prescribed by the speedy trial
provisions of Rule 28 of the Arkansas Rules of Criminal Procedure.
(d) Following an adjudication in which a juvenile is found to be
delinquent, dependent-neglected, or a member of a family in need of services,
the court may order any studies, evaluations, or predisposition reports, if
needed, that bear on disposition.
(e)(1) All such reports shall be provided in writing to all parties
and counsel at least two (2) days prior to the disposition hearing.
(2) All parties shall be given a fair opportunity to controvert
any parts of such reports.

9-35-422. Disposition hearing.
(a) If the circuit court finds that the petition has been
substantiated by the proof at the adjudication hearing, a disposition hearing
shall be held for the court to enter orders consistent with the disposition
alternatives.
(b) When a juvenile is held in detention after an adjudication hearing
for delinquency pending a disposition hearing, the disposition hearing shall
be held no more than fourteen (14) days following the adjudication hearing.
352 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(c) In initially considering the disposition alternatives and at any
subsequent hearing, the court shall give preference to the least restrictive
disposition consistent with the best interests and welfare of the juvenile
and the public.
(d) At the disposition hearing under this section, the court may admit
into evidence any victim impact statements and studies or reports that have
been ordered, even though they are not admissible at the adjudication
hearing.

9-35-423. Disposition — Alternatives.
(a) If a juvenile is found to be delinquent under this subchapter, the
circuit court may enter an order making any of the following dispositions
based upon the best interest of the juvenile:
(1)(A) Transfer legal custody of the juvenile to any licensed
agency responsible for the care of alleged or adjudicated delinquent
juveniles or to a relative or other individual; or
(B)(i) Commit the juvenile to the Division of Youth
Services using the validated risk assessment system for Arkansas juvenile
offenders selected by the Juvenile Judges Committee of the Arkansas Judicial
Council with the division and distributed and administered by the
Administrative Office of the Courts.
(ii)(a) The validated risk assessment system
selected by the Juvenile Judges Committee of the Arkansas Judicial Council
together with the division shall be:
(1) The only validated risk assessment
used by courts for commitment;
(2) Used throughout the state; and
(3) Applied to all commitment decisions
for all juvenile offenders.
(b) The validated risk assessment may be
changed to another validated risk assessment system by the Juvenile Judges
Committee of the Arkansas Judicial Council together with the division.
(iii)(a) In an order of commitment, the court may
recommend that a juvenile be placed in a treatment program or community-based
program instead of a youth services center and shall make specific findings
in support of such a placement in the order.
353 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(b) The court shall also specify in its
recommendation whether it is requesting a division aftercare plan upon the
juvenile's release from the division.
(c) A court shall not commit a juvenile to the
division if the juvenile is adjudicated delinquent of only a misdemeanor
offense unless the:
(1) Juvenile is determined to be
moderate risk or high risk by the validated risk assessment; and
(2) Court makes specific findings as to
the factors considered for the disposition to be in the juvenile's best
interest.
(d) A court shall not commit a juvenile to the
division if the juvenile is adjudicated delinquent of only a misdemeanor
offense and the juvenile is determined to be low risk by the validated risk
assessment.
(iv) A circuit court committing a juvenile to the
division under subdivision (a)(1)(B)(iii) of this section shall make written
findings and consider the following factors in making its determination to
commit the juvenile to the division:
(a) The previous history of the juvenile,
including without limitation whether:
(1) The juvenile has been adjudicated
delinquent and, if so, whether the alleged offense was against a person or
property; and
(2) Any other previous history of
antisocial behavior or patterns of physical violence exist;
(b) Whether the circuit court has previously
offered less restrictive programs or services to the juvenile and whether
there are less restrictive programs or services available to the court that
are likely to rehabilitate the juvenile before the expiration of the court's
jurisdiction;
(c) Written reports and other materials
relating to the juvenile's mental, physical, educational, and social history;
and
(d) Any other factors deemed relevant by the
circuit court.
354 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(v) Upon receipt of an order of commitment with
recommendations for placement, the division shall consider the
recommendations of the committing court in placing a juvenile in a youth
services facility or a community-based program.
(vi) Upon receipt of an order of commitment, the
division or its contracted provider or designee shall prepare a written
treatment plan that includes the:
(a) Treatment plan for the juvenile, including
the types of programs and services that will be provided to the juvenile;
(b) Anticipated length of the juvenile's
commitment;
(c)(1) Recommendations as to the most
appropriate post-commitment placement for the juvenile.
(2) If the juvenile cannot return to the
custody of his or her parent, guardian, or custodian because of child
maltreatment, which includes the parent's, guardian's, or custodian's
refusing to take responsibility for the juvenile, the division shall
immediately contact the Office of Chief Counsel of the Department of Human
Services.
(3) The Office of Chief Counsel of the
Department of Human Services shall petition the committing court to determine
the issue of custody of the juvenile;
(d) Post-commitment community-based services
that will be offered to the juvenile and to his or her family by the division
or the community-based provider, if any;
(e)(1) Aftercare plan, if recommended,
including an outline specific terms and conditions required of the juvenile
and the community-based provider.
(2) If the juvenile progresses in
treatment and an aftercare plan is no longer recommended or the terms of the
aftercare plan need to be amended as a result of treatment changes, any
change in the terms of the aftercare plan and conditions shall be provided in
writing and shall be explained to the juvenile.
(3) The terms and conditions shall be
provided also to the prosecuting attorney, the juvenile's attorney, and to
the juvenile's legal parent, guardian, or custodian by the division or its
355 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
designee before the juvenile's release from the division.
(4) All aftercare terms shall be
provided to the committing court; and
(f)(1) The treatment plan shall be filed with
the committing court no later than thirty (30) days from the date of the
commitment order or before the juvenile's release, whichever is sooner.
(2) A copy of the written treatment plan
shall be provided and shall be explained to the juvenile.
(3) A copy shall be provided to the
prosecutor, the juvenile's attorney, and to the juvenile's legal parent,
guardian, or custodian and shall be filed in the court files of any circuit
court where a dependency-neglect or family in need of services case
concerning that juvenile is pending.
(C) This transfer of custody shall not include placement
of adjudicated delinquents into the custody of the Department of Human
Services for the purpose of foster care except as under the Child
Maltreatment Act, § 12-18-101 et seq.;
(2) Order the juvenile or members of the juvenile's family to
submit to physical, psychiatric, or psychological evaluations;
(3) Grant permanent custody to an individual upon proof that the
parent or guardian from whom the juvenile has been removed has not complied
with the orders of the court and that no further services or periodic reviews
are required;
(4)(A) Place the juvenile on probation under those conditions
and limitations that the court may prescribe pursuant to § 9-35-426.
(B)(i) In addition, the court may as a term of probation
require the juvenile to attend school or make satisfactory progress toward
attaining a high school equivalency diploma approved by the Adult Education
Section.
(ii) The court may revoke probation if the juvenile
fails to regularly attend school or if satisfactory progress toward attaining
a high school equivalency diploma approved by the Adult Education Section is
not being made;
(5) Order a probation fee, not to exceed twenty dollars ($20.00)
per month, to be deposited, accounted for, and used the same as court costs,
fines, and fees under § 16-13-326(a);
356 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(6) Assess a court cost of no more than thirty-five dollars
($35.00) to be paid by the juvenile, his or her parent, both parents, or his
or her guardian;
(7)(A) Order restitution to be paid by the juvenile, a parent,
both parents, the guardian, or his or her custodian.
(B) If the custodian is the State of Arkansas, both
liability and the amount that may be assessed shall be determined by the
Arkansas State Claims Commission;
(8) Order a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500) to
be paid by the juvenile, a parent, both parents, or the guardian;
(9) Order that the juvenile and his or her parent, both parents,
or the guardian perform court-approved volunteer service in the community
designed to contribute to the rehabilitation of the juvenile or to the
ability of the parent or guardian to provide proper parental care and
supervision of the juvenile, not to exceed one hundred sixty (160) hours;
(10)(A) Order that the parent, both parents, or the guardian of
the juvenile attend a court-approved parental responsibility training program
if available.
(B) The court may make reasonable orders requiring proof
of completion of the training program within a certain time period and
payment of a fee covering the cost of the training program.
(C) The court may provide that any violation of such
orders shall subject the parent, both parents, or the guardian to the
contempt sanctions of the court;
(11)(A)(i) Order that the juvenile remain in a juvenile
detention facility for an indeterminate period not to exceed ninety (90)
days.
(ii) The court may further order that the juvenile
be eligible for work release or to attend school or other educational or
vocational training.
(B) The juvenile detention facility shall afford
opportunities for education, recreation, and other rehabilitative services to
adjudicated delinquents;
(12) Place the juvenile on residential detention with electronic
monitoring, either in the juvenile's home or in another facility as ordered
by the court;
357 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(13)(A) Order the parent, both parents, or the guardian of any
juvenile adjudicated delinquent and committed to a youth services center,
detained in a juvenile detention facility, or placed on electronic monitoring
to be liable for the cost of the commitment, detention, or electronic
monitoring.
(B)(i) The court shall take into account the financial
ability of the parent, both parents, or the guardian to pay for the
commitment, detention, or electronic monitoring.
(ii) The court shall take into account the past
efforts of the parent, both parents, or the guardian to correct the
delinquent juvenile's conduct.
(iii) If the parent is a noncustodial parent, the
court shall take into account the opportunity the parent has had to correct
the delinquent juvenile's conduct.
(iv) The court shall take into account any other
factors the court deems relevant;
(14) When a juvenile is committed to a youth services center or
detained in a juvenile detention facility and the juvenile is covered by
private health insurance, order the parent or guardian to provide information
on the juvenile's health insurance coverage, including a copy of the health
insurance policy and the pharmacy card when available, to the juvenile
detention center or youth services center that has physical custody of the
juvenile; or
(15)(A) Order the Department of Finance and Administration to
suspend the driving privileges of any juvenile adjudicated delinquent.
(B) The order under subdivision (a)(15)(A) of shall be
prepared and transmitted to the Department of Finance and Administration
within twenty-four (24) hours after the juvenile has been found delinquent
and is sentenced to have his or her driving privileges suspended.
(C) The court may provide in the order for the issuance of
a restricted driving permit to allow driving to and from a place of
employment or driving to and from school or for other circumstances.
(b) The court shall specifically retain jurisdiction to amend or
modify any orders entered under this section.
(c)(1) If a juvenile is adjudicated delinquent for possession of a
handgun, as provided in § 5-73-119, or criminal use of prohibited weapons, as
358 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
provided in § 5-73-104, or possession of a defaced firearm, as provided in §
5-73-107, then the court shall commit the juvenile:
(A) To a juvenile detention facility, as provided in
subdivision (a)(11) of this section;
(B) To a youth services center operated by the Department
of Human Services State Institutional System Board, as provided in
subdivision (a)(1) of this section; or
(C) Place the juvenile on residential detention, as
provided in subdivision (a)(12) of this section.
(2) The court may take into consideration any preadjudication
detention period served by the juvenile and sentence the juvenile to time
served.
(d)(1) When the court orders restitution pursuant to subdivision
(a)(7) of this section, the court shall consider the following:
(A) The amount of restitution may be decided:
(i) If the juvenile is to be responsible for the
restitution, by agreement between the juvenile and the victim;
(ii) If the parent or parents are to be responsible
for the restitution, by agreement between the parent or parents and the
victim;
(iii) If the juvenile and the parent or parents are
to be responsible for the restitution, by agreement between the juvenile, his
or her parent or parents, and the victim; or
(iv) At a hearing at which the state must prove the
restitution amount by a preponderance of the evidence;
(B) Restitution shall be made immediately unless the court
determines that the parties should be given a specified time to pay or should
be allowed to pay in specified installments; and
(C)(i) In determining if restitution should be paid and by
whom, as well as the method and amount of payment, the court shall take into
account:
(a) The financial resources of the juvenile,
his or her parent, both parents, or the guardian and the burden the payment
will impose with regard to the other obligations of the paying party;
(b) The ability to pay restitution on an
installment basis or on other conditions to be fixed by the court;
359 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(c) The rehabilitative effect of the payment
of restitution and the method of payment; and
(d) The past efforts of the parent, both
parents, or the guardian to correct the delinquent juvenile's conduct.
(ii)(a) The court shall take into account whether
the parent is a noncustodial parent.
(b) The court may take into consideration the
opportunity the parent has had to correct the delinquent juvenile's conduct.
(iii) The court shall take into account any other
factors the court deems relevant.
(2) If the juvenile is placed on probation, any restitution
ordered under this section may be a condition of the probation.
(e) When an order of restitution is entered under this section, it may
be collected by any means authorized for the enforcement of money judgments
in civil actions, and it shall constitute a lien on the real and personal
property of the persons and entities the order of restitution is directed
upon in the same manner and to the same extent as a money judgment in a civil
action.
(f)(1) The judgment entered by the court under this section may be in
favor of the state, the victim, or any other appropriate beneficiary.
(2) The judgment may be discharged by a settlement between the
parties ordered to pay restitution and the beneficiaries of the judgment.
(g) The court shall determine priority among multiple beneficiaries in
an order of restitution under this section on the basis of the seriousness of
the harm each suffered, their other resources, and other equitable factors.
(h) If more than one (1) juvenile is adjudicated delinquent of an
offense for which there is a judgment under this section, the juveniles are
jointly and severally liable for the judgment, unless the court determines
otherwise.
(i)(1) A judgment under this section does not bar a remedy available
in a civil action under other law.
(2) A payment under this section shall be credited against a
money judgment obtained by the beneficiary of the payment in a civil action.
(3) A determination under this section and the fact that payment
was or was not ordered or made are not admissible in evidence in a civil
action and do not affect the merits of the civil action.
360 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(j) If a juvenile is adjudicated delinquent as an extended juvenile
jurisdiction offender, the court shall enter the following dispositions:
(1) Order any of the juvenile delinquency dispositions
authorized by this section; and
(2) Suspend the imposition of an adult sentence pending court
review.

9-35-424. Disposition — Limitations.
(a)(1) A commitment to the Division of Youth Services is for an
indeterminate period not to exceed the juvenile's twenty-first birthday,
except as otherwise provided by law.
(2) An order of commitment shall remain in effect for an
indeterminate period not exceeding two (2) years from the date entered.
(3) Before the expiration of an order of commitment, the circuit
court may extend the order for additional periods of one (1) year if it finds
that the extension is necessary to safeguard the welfare of the juvenile or
the interest of the public.
(4) The committing court may at any time recommend that a
juvenile be released from the custody of the division by making a written
request for release stating the reasons release is in the best interest of
the juvenile and society.
(5) The length of stay and the final decision to release shall
be the exclusive responsibility of the division, except when the juvenile is
an extended juvenile jurisdiction offender.
(b)(1)(A) Subsection (a) of this section does not apply to an extended
juvenile jurisdiction offender.
(B) The circuit court shall have sole release authority
when an extended juvenile jurisdiction offender is committed to the division.
(2)(A) Upon a determination that the juvenile has been
rehabilitated, the division may petition the court for release.
(B) The court shall conduct a hearing and shall consider
the following factors in making its determination to release the juvenile
from the division:
(i) The experience and character of the juvenile
before and after the juvenile's disposition, including compliance with the
court's orders;
361 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(ii) The nature of the offense or offenses and the
manner in which they were committed;
(iii) The recommendations of the professionals who
have worked with the juvenile;
(iv) The protection of public safety; and
(v) Opportunities provided to the juvenile for
rehabilitation and the juvenile's efforts toward rehabilitation.
(3) The court shall release the juvenile upon a finding by a
preponderance of the evidence that the juvenile's release does not pose a
substantial threat to public safety.
(c)(1) Unless otherwise stated, and excluding extended juvenile
jurisdiction offenders, an order of probation shall remain in effect for an
indeterminate period not exceeding two (2) years.
(2) A juvenile shall be released from probation upon:
(A) Expiration of the order; or
(B) A finding by the court that the purpose of the order
has been achieved.
(3) Before the expiration of an order of probation, the court
may extend the order for an additional period of one (1) year if it that
finds the extension is necessary to safeguard the welfare of the juvenile or
the interest of the public.
(d)(1)(A) The court may enter an order for physical, psychiatric, or
psychological evaluation or counseling or treatment affecting the family of a
juvenile only after finding that the evaluation, counseling, or treatment of
family members is necessary for the treatment or rehabilitation of the
juvenile.
(B) Subdivision (d)(1)(A) of this section does not apply
to the parental responsibility training programs under § 9-35-423(a)(10).
(2) For purposes of this section, if the Department of Human
Services will be the payor, excluding the community-based providers, the
court shall not specify a particular provider for family services.
(e)(1) An order of restitution, not to exceed ten thousand dollars
($10,000) per victim, to be paid by the juvenile, his or her parent, both
parents, the guardian, or the custodian may be entered only after proof by a
preponderance of the evidence that specific damages were caused by the
juvenile and that the juvenile's actions were the proximate cause of the
362 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
damage.
(2)(A) If the amount of restitution determined by the court
exceeds ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for any individual victim, the court
shall enter a restitution order for ten thousand dollars ($10,000) in favor
of the victim.
(B) Nothing in this section shall prevent a person or
entity from seeking recovery for damages in excess of ten thousand dollars
($10,000) available under other law.
(f) Custody of a juvenile may be transferred to a relative or other
individual only after a home study of the placement is conducted by the
department or a licensed certified social worker and submitted to the court
in writing and the court determines that the placement is in the best
interest of the juvenile.
(g)(1) If the juvenile who has been adjudicated delinquent is also in
the custody of the department pursuant to a family in need of services or
dependency-neglect petition and the court does not commit the juvenile to the
division or order the juvenile to detention, the Civilian Student Training
Program, or a facility exclusively for delinquents, then any issues regarding
placement of the juvenile shall be addressed only in the family in need of
services or dependency-neglect case and shall not be an issue addressed, nor
shall any orders be entered in the delinquency case regarding placement of
the juvenile.
(2) Within ten (10) days of the entry of any order in the
delinquency case, the prosecuting attorney shall file a copy of the order in
the juvenile's dependency-neglect case.
(h) Custody of a juvenile shall not be transferred to the department
if a delinquency petition or case is converted to a family in need of
services petition or case.
(i) No court may commit to the division a juvenile found solely in
criminal contempt.

9-35-425. Limitations on detention.
(a) A juvenile who is alleged to be or who has been adjudicated either
dependent-neglected or a member of a family in need of services shall not be
placed or detained in a secure detention facility, in a facility utilized for
the detention of alleged or adjudicated delinquent juveniles, or in a
363 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
facility utilized for the detention of adults held for, charged with, or
convicted of a crime, except that:
(1)(A) A juvenile may be held in a juvenile detention facility
when he or she has been away from home for more than twenty-four (24) hours
and when the parent, guardian, or other person contacted lives beyond a
fifty-mile driving distance or out of state.
(B)(i) The juvenile may be held in custody in a juvenile
detention facility for purposes of identification, processing, or arranging
for release or transfer to an alternative facility.
(ii) The holding under subdivision (a)(1)(B)(i) of
this section shall be limited to the minimum time necessary to complete the
actions under subdivision (a)(1)(B)(i) of this section and shall not occur in
any facility utilized for incarceration of adults.
(C)(i) A juvenile held under this subdivision (a)(1) shall
be separated from detained juveniles charged or held for delinquency.
(ii) A juvenile shall not be held under this
subdivision (a)(1) for more than six (6) hours if the parent, guardian, or
other person contacted lives in the state or for twenty-four (24) hours,
excluding weekends and holidays, if the parent, guardian, or other person
contacted lives out of state; and
(2)(A) An adjudicated-family-in-need-of-services juvenile may be
held in a juvenile detention facility when the court finds that the juvenile
violated a valid court order.
(B)(i) For the purposes of this subdivision (a)(2), a
valid court order shall include any order of a circuit court regarding a
juvenile who has been brought before the court and made subject to a court
order.
(ii) The juvenile who is the subject of the court
order under subdivision (a)(2)(B)(i) of this section shall receive full due
process rights.
(C)(i) A juvenile held under this subdivision (a)(2) shall
be separated from detained juveniles charged or held for delinquency.
(ii) The holding shall not occur in any facility
utilized for incarceration of adults.
(b) A juvenile shall not be placed or confined in a jail or lock-up
used for the detention of adults except under the following circumstances:
364 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(1) A juvenile who has been formally transferred from the
juvenile division of circuit court to the criminal division of circuit court
and against whom felony charges have been filed or a juvenile whom the
prosecuting attorney has the discretion to charge in circuit court and to
prosecute as an adult and against whom the circuit court's jurisdiction has
been invoked by the filing of felony charges may be held in an adult jail or
lock-up;
(2)(A) A juvenile alleged to have committed a delinquent act may
be held in an adult jail or lock-up for up to six (6) hours for purposes of
identification, processing, or arranging for release or transfer to an
alternative facility, provided that he or she is separated by sight and sound
from adults who are pretrial detainees or convicted persons.
(B) A holding under subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this section
shall be limited to the minimum time necessary and shall not include travel
time for transporting the juvenile to the alternative facility; or
(3)(A) A juvenile alleged to have committed a delinquent act who
is awaiting an initial appearance before a judge may be held in an adult jail
or lock-up for up to twenty-four (24) hours, excluding weekends and holidays,
provided the following conditions exist:
(i) The alleged act would be a misdemeanor or a
felony if committed by an adult or is a violation of § 5-73-119;
(ii) The geographical area having jurisdiction over
the juvenile is outside a metropolitan statistical area under the current
designation of the United States Bureau of the Census;
(iii) No acceptable alternative placement for the
juvenile exists; and
(iv) The juvenile is separated by sight and sound
from adults who are pretrial detainees or convicted persons.
(B)(i) A juvenile awaiting an initial appearance and being
held in an adult jail or lock-up pursuant to the twenty-four-hour exception
under subdivision (b)(3)(A) of this section may be held for an additional
period not to exceed twenty-four (24) hours, provided that the following
conditions exist:
(a) The conditions of distance to be traveled
or the lack of highway, road, or other ground transportation does not allow
for court appearances within twenty-four (24) hours; and
365 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(b) All the conditions in subdivision
(b)(3)(A) of this section exist.
(ii) Criteria will be adopted by the Governor or his
or her designee to establish what distance, highway or road conditions, or
ground transportation limitations will provide a basis for holding a juvenile
in an adult jail or lock-up under this exception.
(c) Provided that the facilities are designed and used in accordance
with federal and state guidelines and restrictions, nothing in this
subchapter is intended to prohibit the use of juvenile detention facilities
that are attached to or adjacent to adult jails or lock-ups.
(d) A detention facility shall not release a serious offender for a
less serious offender except by order of the judge who committed the more
serious offender.

9-35-426. Probation reports.
(a) The probation officer shall make and keep a complete history of
each case before disposition and during the course of any probation imposed
by the circuit court.
(b)(1) It is the intention of this section to require an intelligent
and thorough report of each juvenile before probation and during probation as
to heredity, environment, condition, treatment, development, and results.
(2) The report shall contain among other information the age,
sex, nativity, residence, education, mentality, habits, whether married or
single, and employment and income and shall be continued so as to show the
condition of the person during the term of his or her probation and the
results of probation in the case.
(3) The report shall never be disclosed except as required by
law or directed by the court.
(c) The probation officer shall furnish to each person released on
probation a written statement of the terms and conditions of probation and
shall report to the court any violation or breach of the terms and conditions
so imposed.

9-35-427. Proceedings concerning juveniles for whom paternity not
established.
(a) Absent orders of a circuit court or another court of competent
366 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
jurisdiction to the contrary, the biological mother, whether adult or minor,
of a juvenile for whom paternity has not been established is deemed to be the
natural guardian of that juvenile and is entitled to the care, custody, and
control of that juvenile.
(b) The biological mother, the putative father, the juvenile himself
or herself, or the Office of Child Support Enforcement may bring an action to
establish paternity or support of a juvenile for whom paternity has not been
established.
(c)(1) If the juvenile is not born when the parties appear before the
court, the court may hear evidence and issue temporary orders and findings
pending the birth of the juvenile.
(2) If the final order is contrary to the temporary order, the
court shall render judgment for the amount paid under the temporary order
against the petitioner if the petitioner was the biological mother.
(3) If the mother dies before the final order is issued, the
action may be revived in the name of the juvenile, and the mother's testimony
at the temporary hearing may be introduced in the final hearing.
(d)(1) Upon an adjudication by the court that the putative father is
the father of the juvenile, the court shall follow the same guidelines,
procedures, and requirements as established by the laws of this state
applicable to child support orders and judgments entered upon divorce.
(2) The court may award court costs and attorney's fees.
(e)(1) If paternity has been established in a court of competent
jurisdiction, a father may petition the court in the county where the
juvenile resides for custody of the juvenile.
(2) The court may award custody to a father who has had
paternity established if the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence
that:
(A) He is a fit parent to raise the juvenile;
(B) He has assumed his responsibilities toward the
juvenile by providing care, supervision, protection, and financial support
for the juvenile; and
(C) It is in the best interest of the juvenile to award
custody to the father.
(f) At the request of either party in a paternity action, the trial
court shall direct that the putative father, biological mother, and juvenile
367 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
submit to one (1) or more blood tests or other scientific examinations or
tests, including deoxyribonucleic acid typing, to:
(1) Determine whether or not the putative father can be excluded
as being the father of the juvenile; and
(2) Establish the probability of paternity if the test does not
exclude the putative father.
(g) The tests under subsection (f) of this section shall be made by a
duly qualified physician or physicians, or by another duly qualified person
or persons, not to exceed three (3), to be appointed by the court.
(h)(1) The results of the tests under subsection (f) of this section
shall be receivable in evidence.
(2)(A)(i) A written report of the test results by the duly
qualified expert performing the test, or by a duly qualified expert under
whose supervision and direction the test and analysis have been performed,
certified by an affidavit duly subscribed and sworn to by the expert before a
notary public, may be introduced in evidence in illegitimacy actions without
calling the expert as a witness.
(ii) If either party shall desire to question the
expert, the party shall have the expert subpoenaed within a reasonable time
before trial.
(B) If the results of the paternity tests establish a
ninety-five percent (95%) or more probability of inclusion that the putative
father is the biological father of the juvenile and after corroborating
testimony of the mother in regard to access during the probable period of
conception, this shall constitute a prima facie case of establishment of
paternity and the burden of proof shall shift to the putative father to rebut
the proof.
(3) The experts shall be subject to cross-examination by both
parties after the court has caused them to disclose their findings.
(i) When the court orders the blood tests to be taken and one (1) of
the parties refuses to submit to the test, that fact shall be disclosed upon
the trial unless good cause is shown to the contrary.
(j) The costs of the tests and witness fees under this section shall
be taxed by the court as other costs in the case.
(k) When it is relevant to the prosecution or the defense in a
paternity action, blood tests that exclude third parties as the father of the
368 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
juvenile shall be the same as set out in subsections (f) and (g) of this
section.
(l) The refusal of a party to submit to a genetic or other ordered
test is admissible at a hearing to determine paternity only as to the
credibility of the party.
(m) If a male witness offers testimony indicating that his act of
intercourse with the mother may have resulted in the conception of the
juvenile, the court may require the witness to submit to genetic or other
tests to determine whether he is the juvenile's father.

9-35-428. Appeals.
(a) All appeals from juvenile cases shall be made to the Supreme Court
or to the Court of Appeals in the time and manner provided for appeals in the
Arkansas Rules of Appellate Procedure.
(b) The petitioner may appeal only under those circumstances that
would permit the state to appeal in criminal proceedings.

9-35-429. Admissibility of evidence.
(a) Juvenile adjudications of delinquency for offenses for which the
juvenile could have been tried as an adult may be used at the sentencing
phase in subsequent adult criminal proceedings against those same
individuals.
(b)(1) No other evidence adduced against a juvenile in any proceeding
under this subchapter nor the fact of adjudication or disposition shall be
admissible evidence against the juvenile in any civil, criminal, or other
proceeding.
(2) However, the evidence shall be admissible when proper in
subsequent proceedings against the same juvenile under this subchapter.

9-35-430. Probation — Revocation.
(a)(1) After an adjudication of delinquency, the court may place a
juvenile on probation. The conditions of probation shall be given to the
juvenile in writing and shall be explained to him or her and to his or her
parent, guardian, or custodian by the probation officer in the initial
conference following the disposition hearing.
(2) The court shall notify the Division of Youth Services in its
369 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
commitment order of the order of probation including the juvenile's
compliance with the division's aftercare plan, if provided in the treatment
plan.
(b) Any violation of a condition of probation may be reported to the
prosecuting attorney, who may initiate a petition in the court for revocation
of probation. A petition for revocation of probation shall contain specific
factual allegations constituting each violation of a condition of probation.
(c) The petition alleging violation of a condition of probation and
seeking revocation of probation shall be served upon the juvenile, his or her
attorney, and his or her parent, guardian, or custodian.
(d) A revocation hearing shall be set within a reasonable time after
the filing of the petition, or within fourteen (14) days if the juvenile has
been detained as a result of the filing of the petition for revocation.
(e) If the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that the
juvenile violated the terms and conditions of probation, the court may:
(1) Extend probation;
(2) Impose additional conditions of probation; or
(3) Make any disposition that could have been made at the time
probation was imposed under § 9-35-423.
(f)(1) Nonpayment of restitution, fines, or court costs may constitute
a violation of probation, unless the juvenile shows that his or her default
was not attributable to a purposeful refusal to obey the sentence of the
court or was not due to a failure on his or her part to make a good faith
effort to obtain the funds required for payment.
(2) In determining whether to revoke probation, the court shall
consider the juvenile's employment status, earning ability, financial
resources, the willfulness of the juvenile's failure to pay, and any other
special circumstances that may have a bearing on the juvenile's ability to
pay.
(3) If the court determines that the default in payment of a
fine, costs, or restitution is excusable under subdivision (f)(1) of this
section, the court may enter an order allowing the juvenile additional time
for payment, reducing the amount of each installment, or revoking the fine,
costs, or restitution or unpaid portion thereof in whole or in part.

9-35-431. Compliance with federal acts.
370 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
The Division of Youth Services shall have the responsibility for the
collection, review, and reporting of statistical information on detained or
incarcerated juveniles, for adult jails, adult lock-ups, and juvenile
detention facilities to assure compliance with the provisions of Pub. L. No.
93-415, the Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention Act of 1974, as it
existed on January 1, 2025.

9-35-432. Escape considered an act of delinquency.
The escape of a juvenile from the locked portion of a juvenile facility
is an act of delinquency.

9-35-433. Duties and responsibilities of custodian.
(a) A person or agency appointed as the custodian of a juvenile in a
proceeding under this subchapter shall:
(1) Care for and maintain the juvenile; and
(2) See that the juvenile:
(A) Is protected;
(B) Is properly trained and educated; and
(C) Has the opportunity to learn a trade, occupation, or
profession.
(b) The person or agency appointed as the custodian of a juvenile in a
proceeding under this subchapter has the right to obtain medical care for the
juvenile, including giving consent to specific medical, dental, or mental
health treatments and procedures as required in the opinion of a duly
authorized or licensed physician, dentist, surgeon, or psychologist, whether
or not such care is rendered on an emergency, inpatient, or outpatient basis.
(c) The custodian has the right to enroll the juvenile in school upon
the presentation of an order of custody.
(d) The custodian has the right to obtain medical and school records
of any juvenile in his or her custody upon presentation of an order of
custody.
(e) Any agency appointed as the custodian of a juvenile has the right
to consent to the juvenile's travel on vacation or similar trips.
(f)(1) Every person granted custody, guardianship, or adoption of a
juvenile in a proceeding under or arising out of a dependency-neglect action
under this subchapter shall ensure that the juvenile is not returned to the
371 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
care or supervision of any person from whom the child was removed or any
person the court has specifically ordered not to have care, supervision, or
custody of the juvenile.
(2) This section shall not be construed to prohibit these
placements if the person who has been granted custody, guardianship, or
adoption obtains a court order to that effect from the juvenile division of
circuit court that made the award of custody, guardianship, or adoption.
(3) Failure to abide by subdivision (f)(1) of this section is
punishable as a criminal offense under § 5-26-502(a)(3).
(g)(1) The court shall not split custody.
(2) As used in this section, "split custody" means granting
legal custody to one (1) person or agency and granting physical custody to
another person or agency.

9-35-434. Juvenile sex offender assessment and registration.
(a) If a juvenile is adjudicated delinquent for any of the following
offenses, the court shall order a sex offender screening and risk assessment:
(1) Rape, § 5-14-103;
(2) Sexual assault in the first degree, § 5-14-124;
(3) Sexual assault in the second degree, § 5-14-125;
(4) Incest, § 5-26-202; or
(5) Engaging children in sexually explicit conduct for use in
visual or print medium, § 5-27-303.
(b)(1) The court may order a sex offender screening and risk
assessment if a juvenile is adjudicated delinquent for any offense with an
underlying sexually motivated component.
(2) The court may require that a juvenile register as a sex
offender upon recommendation of the Sex Offender Assessment Committee and
following a hearing as set forth in subsection (e) of this section.
(c) The juvenile division of circuit court judge may order
reassessment of the sex offender screening and risk assessment by the
committee at any time while the court has jurisdiction over the juvenile.
(d) Following a sex offender screening and risk assessment, the
prosecutor may file a motion to request that a juvenile register as a sex
offender at any time while the court has jurisdiction of the delinquency case
if a juvenile is found delinquent for any of the offenses listed in
372 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
subsection (a) of this section.
(e)(1) The court shall conduct a hearing within ninety (90) days of
the registration motion under this section.
(2)(A) The juvenile defendant shall be represented by counsel,
and the court shall consider the following factors in making its decision to
require the juvenile to register as a delinquent sex offender:
(i) The seriousness of the offense;
(ii) The protection of society;
(iii) The level of planning and participation in the
alleged offense;
(iv) The previous sex offender history of the
juvenile, including whether the juvenile has been adjudicated delinquent for
prior sex offenses;
(v) Whether there are facilities or programs
available to the court that are likely to rehabilitate the juvenile before
the expiration of the court's jurisdiction;
(vi) The sex offender assessment and any other
relevant written reports and other materials relating to the juvenile's
mental, physical, educational, and social history; and
(vii) Any other factors deemed relevant by the court.
(B) The exercise by the juvenile of the right against
self-incrimination, the right to an adjudication hearing or appeal, the
refusal to admit to an offense for which he or she was adjudicated
delinquent, or the refusal to admit to other offenses in the assessment
process shall not be considered in the decision whether to require
registration.
(f)(1) The court shall make written findings on all the factors under
subsection (e) of this section.
(2) Upon a finding by clear and convincing evidence that a
juvenile should or should not be required to register as a sex offender, the
court shall enter its order.
(g) When the judge of the juvenile division of circuit court orders a
juvenile to register as a sex offender, the judge shall order either the
Division of Youth Services or a juvenile probation officer to complete the
registration process by:
(1) Completing the sex offender registration form;
373 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(2) Providing a copy of the sex offender registration order,
fact sheet, registration form, and the Juvenile Sex Offender Rights and
Responsibilities Form to the juvenile and the juvenile's parent, guardian, or
custodian and explaining this information to the juvenile and the juvenile's
parent, guardian, or custodian;
(3) Mailing a copy of the registration court order, fact sheets,
and registration form to the Arkansas Crime Information Center, Sex Offender
Registry Manager, 322 Main St #615, Little Rock, AR 72201;
(4) Providing local law enforcement agencies where the juvenile
resides a copy of the sex offender registration form; and
(5) Ensuring that copies of all documents are forwarded to the
court for placement in the court file.
(h) The juvenile may petition the court to have his or her name
removed from the Arkansas Sex Offender Registry at any time while the court
has jurisdiction over the juvenile or when the juvenile turns twenty-one (21)
years of age, whichever is later.
(i) The judge of the juvenile division of circuit court shall order
the juvenile's name removed from the registry upon proof by a preponderance
of the evidence that the juvenile does not pose a threat to the safety of
others.
(j) If the court does not order the juvenile's name removed from the
registery, the juvenile shall remain on the registery for ten (10) years from
the last date on which the juvenile was adjudicated a delinquent or found
guilty as an adult for a sex offense or until the juvenile turns twenty-one
(21) years of age, whichever is longer.
(k) Once a juvenile is ordered to register as a sex offender, he or
she shall be subject to the registration requirements set forth in §§ 12-12-
904, 12-12-906, 12-12-908, 12-12-909, and 12-12-912.

9-35-435. Deoxyribonucleic acid samples.
(a) A person who is adjudicated delinquent for the following offenses
shall have a deoxyribonucleic acid sample drawn:
(1) Rape, § 5-14-103;
(2) Sexual assault in the first degree, § 5-14-124;
(3) Sexual assault in the second degree, § 5-14-125;
(4) Incest, § 5-26-202;
374 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(5) Capital murder, § 5-10-101;
(6) Murder in the first degree, § 5-10-102;
(7) Murder in the second degree, § 5-10-103;
(8) Kidnapping, § 5-11-102;
(9) Aggravated robbery, § 5-12-103;
(10) Terroristic act, § 5-13-310; and
(11) Aggravated assault upon a law enforcement officer or an
employee of a correctional facility, § 5-13-211, if a Class Y felony.
(b) The court shall order a fine of two hundred fifty dollars ($250)
under this section unless the court finds that the fine would cause an undue
hardship.
(c)(1) Only a juvenile adjudicated delinquent for one (1) of the
offenses listed in subsection (a) of this section shall have a
deoxyribonucleic acid sample drawn upon intake at a juvenile detention
facility or intake at a Division of Youth Services facility.
(2) If the juvenile is not placed in a facility, the juvenile
probation officer to whom the juvenile is assigned shall ensure that the
deoxyribonucleic acid sample is drawn.
(d) All deoxyribonucleic acid samples taken under this section shall
be taken in accordance with rules promulgated by the State Crime Laboratory.

9-35-436. Division of Youth Services aftercare.
(a)(1) After an adjudication of delinquency and upon commitment to the
Division of Youth Services, the court may order compliance with a division
aftercare plan upon a juvenile's release from the division, if recommended as
part of the treatment plan submitted to the court.
(2) The division or its designee shall provide the:
(A) Terms and conditions of the aftercare plan in writing
to the juvenile before the juvenile's release from the division; and
(B) The aftercare terms and conditions to the juvenile's
attorney and the juvenile's legal parent, guardian, or custodian by the
division or its designee, the prosecutor, and the committing court before the
juvenile's release from the division.
(3) The division or its designee shall explain the terms of the
aftercare plan to the juvenile and his or her legal parent, guardian, or
custodian before the juvenile's release from the division.
375 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(b)(1) Any violation of an aftercare term may be reported to the
prosecuting attorney, who may initiate a petition in the committing court for
violation of the aftercare plan.
(2) The Department of Human Services may also initiate a
petition for a violation with the committing court.
(c) The petition shall contain specific factual allegations
constituting each violation of the aftercare plan and shall be served upon
the juvenile, his or her attorney, his or her parent, guardian, or custodian,
and the prosecuting attorney if filed by the department.
(d) A hearing shall be set within a reasonable time after the filing
of the petition or within fourteen (14) days if the juvenile has been
detained as a result of the filing of the petition for the aftercare
violation.
(e) If the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that the
juvenile violated the terms of the aftercare plan, the court may:
(1) Extend the terms of the aftercare plan, if requested by the
division;
(2) Impose additional conditions to the aftercare plan, if
requested by the division; or
(3) Make any disposition that could have been made at the time
commitment was ordered under § 9-35-423.

9-35-437. Confessions.
In determining whether a juvenile's confession to an alleged delinquent
act was voluntarily, knowingly, and intelligently made, the court shall
consider all circumstances surrounding the confession, including without
limitation:
(1) The juvenile's physical, mental, and emotional maturity;
(2) Whether the juvenile understood the consequences of the
confession;
(3) In cases in which the custodial parent, guardian, or
custodian agreed to the interrogation that led to the confession, whether the
custodial parent, guardian, or custodian understood the consequences of the
confession or has an interest in the matter that is adverse to the juvenile;
(4) Whether the juvenile and his or her custodial parent,
guardian, or custodian were informed of the alleged delinquent act;
376 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(5) Whether the confession was the result of any coercion,
force, or inducement;
(6) Whether the juvenile and his or her custodial parent,
guardian, or custodian had waived the right to counsel or been provided
counsel; and
(7) Whether any of the following occurred:
(A) The oral, written, or sign language confession was
electronically recorded in its entirety;
(B) The entire interrogation was electronically recorded;
(C) The audio or video recordings of the interrogation, if
available, were used; and
(D) All of the voices on the recording are identified and
the names of all persons present during the interrogation are identified.

9-35-438. Court costs, fees, and fines.
(a) The juvenile division of the circuit court may order the following
court costs, fees, and fines to be paid by adjudicated defendants to the
circuit court juvenile division fund as provided under § 16-13-326:
(1) The court may assess an adjudicated delinquent juvenile
court costs not to exceed thirty-five dollars ($35.00) as provided under § 9-
35-423;
(2) The court may order a probation fee for adjudicated
delinquent juveniles not to exceed twenty dollars ($20.00) per month as
provided under § 9-35-423;
(3) The court may order a juvenile service fee for an
adjudicated family in need of services not to exceed twenty dollars ($20.00)
per month as provided under § 9-35-212;
(4) The court may order a fine for adjudicated delinquent
juveniles of not more than five hundred dollars ($500) as provided under § 9-
35-423; and
(5) A juvenile intake or probation officer may charge a
diversion fee limited to no more than twenty dollars ($20.00) per month as
provided under § 9-35-417.
(b) The court shall direct that the juvenile division of circuit court
costs and fees be collected, maintained, and accounted for in the same manner
as juvenile probation and juvenile services fees as provided for in § 16-13-
377 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
326.

9-35-439. Risk and needs assessments.
(a) The Administrative Office of the Courts shall work with the
circuit courts to implement a validated risk and needs assessment that shall
be provided to the juvenile divisions of the circuit courts to be used at
delinquency disposition hearings and to aid in juvenile treatment plans.
(b) A judge of a juvenile division circuit court shall have the
discretion to designate either a trained juvenile intake or probation officer
to conduct the validated risk and needs assessment in the court of the
circuit court judge.
(c)(1) The juvenile intake officer or probation officer conducting the
risk and needs assessment shall interview the juvenile and the juvenile's
parent, guardian, or custodian.
(2) Information gathered by the juvenile intake officer or
probation officer during the intake process implemented to complete the risk
and needs assessment shall be confidential and shall not be used against the
juvenile in the delinquency proceeding.
(3) The juvenile intake officer or probation officer conducting
the risk and needs assessment shall not discuss any offense for which the
juvenile is currently charged during the intake assessment.
(d) A risk and needs assessment prepared for a delinquency disposition
hearing shall be provided to the necessary parties seven (7) days in advance
and presented to the court at the disposition hearing.
(e)(1) The court may order an updated risk and needs assessment that
should be updated when there are significant changes in the juvenile's
treatment plan.
(2) Any revisions or updates to the risk and needs assessment
shall be provided to the necessary parties seven (7) days in advance of a
court hearing in the delinquency proceeding.
(f) Juvenile risk and needs assessments may be provided to the
Division of Youth Services personnel, service providers, and other necessary
persons designated by the court to provide appropriate treatment plan and
case plan services.

9-35-440. Punitive isolation or solitary confinement of juveniles —
378 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
Definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) “Punitive isolation” means the placement of a juvenile in a
location that is separate from the general population as a punishment; and
(2) “Solitary confinement” means the isolation of a juvenile in
a cell separate from the general population as a punishment.
(b) Subject to subsection (c) of this section, a juvenile who has been
placed or detained in a juvenile detention facility shall not be placed in
punitive isolation or solitary confinement as a disciplinary measure for more
than twenty-four (24) hours unless the:
(1) Placement of the juvenile in punitive isolation or solitary
confinement is due to:
(A) A physical or sexual assault committed by the juvenile
while in the juvenile detention facility;
(B) Conduct of the juvenile that poses an imminent threat
of harm to the safety or well-being of the juvenile, the staff, or other
juveniles in the juvenile detention facility; or
(C) The juvenile's escaping or attempting to escape from
the juvenile detention facility; and
(2)(A) Director of the juvenile detention facility provides
written authorization to place the juvenile in punitive isolation or solitary
confinement for more than twenty-four (24) hours.
(B) The director of the juvenile detention facility shall
provide the written authorization described in subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this
section for every twenty-four-hour period during which the juvenile remains
in punitive isolation or solitary confinement after the initial twenty-four
(24) hours.
(c)(1) A juvenile who has been placed or detained in a juvenile
detention facility shall not be placed in solitary confinement if the
juvenile:
(A) Is pregnant;
(B) Has delivered a child before or within thirty (30)
days of being detained;
(C) Is breastfeeding;
(D) Is suffering from postpartum depression or another
medically verifiable postpartum condition; or
379 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(E) Is caring for a child in a juvenile detention
facility.
(2) This subsection does not apply if:
(A) The juvenile has engaged in an act of violence while
incarcerated or detained that either resulted in or was likely to result in
serious physical injury or death to another person; or
(B) There is reasonable cause to believe that the use of
solitary confinement is necessary to reduce a substantial risk of imminent
serious physical injury or death to another person, as evidenced by the
juvenile's recent conduct while incarcerated or detained.

SECTION 45. Arkansas Code § 12-9-113(d)(1), concerning training
provided to law enforcement officers that relates to child abuse victim
interview techniques, is amended to read as follows:
(d) Pertaining to child abuse victim interview techniques, the topics
that shall be covered are:
(1) Current law, including the Child Maltreatment Act, § 12-18-
101 et seq., and the Arkansas Juvenile Code of 1989, § 9-27-301 et seq.
Arkansas Juvenile Code, § 9-35-101 et seq.;
(2) Child sexual abuse; and
(3) Physical and behavioral indicators.

SECTION 46. Arkansas Code § 12-12-1105(b), concerning what DNA records
shall be maintained in the State DNA Data Base, is amended to read as
follows:
(b) The data base shall have the capability provided by computer
software and procedures administered by the laboratory to store and maintain
DNA records related to:
(1) Crime scene evidence and forensic casework;
(2) Convicted offenders and juveniles adjudicated delinquent who
are required to provide a DNA sample under this subchapter;
(3) Offenders who were required to provide a DNA sample under
former § 12-12-1101 et seq.;
(4) Anonymous DNA records used for forensic validation, quality
control, or establishment of a population statistics database;
(5) Unidentified persons or body parts;
380 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(6) Missing persons and biological relatives of missing persons;
(7) Persons arrested for a felony offense who are required to
provide a DNA sample under § 12-12-1006; and
(8) Juveniles adjudicated delinquent who are required to provide
a DNA sample under § 9-27-357 § 9-35-435.

SECTION 47. Arkansas Code § 12-18-309 is amended to read as follows:
12-18-309. Reports alleging that a child is disrupting his or her
adoption or is a dependent juvenile.
The Child Abuse Hotline shall accept telephone calls or other
communications alleging that a child is at risk of disrupting or has
disrupted his or her adoption or that a child is a dependent juvenile, as
defined in § 9-27-303 § 9-35-102, and shall immediately refer this
information to the Department of Human Services.

SECTION 48. Arkansas Code § 12-18-620(f), concerning release of
information in a circuit court child custody case upon a pending
investigation under the Child Maltreatment Act, § 12-18-101 et seq., is
amended to read as follows:
(f) Information on a pending investigation, including protected health
information, may be released to or disclosed in a circuit court child custody
case or similar case if:
(1) No seventy-two-hour hold has been exercised under this
chapter or pleadings filed pursuant to the Arkansas Juvenile Code of 1989, §
9-27-301 et seq. Arkansas Juvenile Code, § 9-35-101 et seq.;
(2) Written notice of intent to request release or disclosure is
provided to the investigating agency at least five (5) days before the date
for release or disclosure;
(3) The investigating agency has the opportunity to appear
before the court and be heard on the issue of release or disclosure;
(4) The information gathered by the investigative agency is
necessary for the determination of an issue before the court;
(5) Waiting until completion of the investigation will
jeopardize the health or safety of the child in the custody case;
(6) A protective order is issued to prevent redisclosure of the
information provided by the investigating agency or the information is
381 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
released or disclosed only to the court in camera; and
(7) Release or disclosure of the information will not compromise
a criminal investigation.

SECTION 49. Arkansas Code § 12-18-710(f)(1), concerning release of
information in a circuit court child custody case upon a true investigative
determination under the Child Maltreatment Act, § 12-18-101 et seq., that is
pending due process, is amended to read as follows:
(f) Information on a true investigative determination, including
protected health information, may be released to or disclosed in a circuit
court child custody case or similar case if:
(1) No seventy-two-hour hold has been exercised under this
chapter or pleadings filed pursuant to the Arkansas Juvenile Code of 1989, §
9-27-301 et seq. Arkansas Juvenile Code, § 9-35-101 et seq.;
(2) Written notice of intent to request release or disclosure is
provided to the investigating agency at least five (5) days before the date
for release or disclosure;
(3) The investigating agency has the opportunity to appear
before the court and be heard on the issue of release or disclosure;
(4) The information gathered by the investigative agency is
necessary for the determination of an issue before the court;
(5) Waiting until completion of due process will jeopardize the
health or safety of the child in the custody case;
(6) A protective order is issued to prevent redisclosure of the
information provided by the investigating agency or the information is
released or disclosed only to the court in camera; and
(7) Release or disclosure of the information will not compromise
a criminal investigation.

SECTION 50. Arkansas Code § 12-18-1001(a), concerning when a child may
be taken into protective custody under the Child Maltreatment Act, § 12-18-
101 et seq., is amended to read as follows:
(a) A police officer, law enforcement, a juvenile division of circuit
court judge during juvenile proceedings concerning the child or a sibling of
the child, or a designated employee of the Department of Human Services may
take a child into custody or any person in charge of a hospital or similar
382 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
institution or any physician treating a child may keep that child in his or
her custody without the consent of the parent or the guardian, whether or not
additional medical treatment is required, if:
(1) The child is subjected to neglect as defined under § 12-18-
103(14)(B) and the department assesses the family and determines that the
newborn and any other children, including siblings, under the custody or care
of the mother are at substantial risk of serious harm such that the children
need to be removed from the custody or care of the mother;
(2) The child is a dependent juvenile as defined in the Arkansas
Juvenile Code of 1989, § 9-27-301 et seq. Arkansas Juvenile Code, § 9-35-101
et seq.; or
(3) Circumstances or conditions of the child are such that
continuing in his or her place of residence or in the care and custody of the
parent, guardian, custodian, or caretaker presents an immediate danger to the
health or physical well-being of the child.

SECTION 51. Arkansas Code § 12-18-1005(a), concerning when a written
order is not required for the Department of Human Services to take a seventy-
two-hour hold of a child, is amended to read as follows:
(a) A school, residential facility, hospital, or similar institution
where a child may be located shall not require a written order for the
Department of Human Services to take a seventy-two-hour hold under this
section, or § 9-27-313 § 9-35-308, or § 9-35-409.

SECTION 52. Arkansas Code § 12-18-1008(a), concerning when the
Department of Human Services is required to remove a child from his or her
home, is amended to read as follows:
(a) If the Department of Human Services determines that custody under
this subchapter is required, the Department of Human Services shall take
steps to remove the child under custody as outlined in this chapter or
pursuant to under the Arkansas Juvenile Code of 1989, § 9-27-301 et seq.
Arkansas Juvenile Code, § 9-35-101 et seq.

SECTION 53. Arkansas Code § 12-18-1010(c), concerning when a child
cannot remain safely in his or her home and must be removed from his or her
home by the Department of Human Services, is amended to read as follows:
383 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(c) If at any time during the protective services case the department
determines that the child cannot safely remain at home, it shall take steps
to remove the child under custody as outlined in this chapter or under the
Arkansas Juvenile Code of 1989, § 9-27-301 et seq. Arkansas Juvenile Code, §
9-35-101 et seq.

SECTION 54. Arkansas Code § 12-27-151 is amended to read as follows:
12-27-151. Juvenile sex offender assessments.
The Division of Correction may enter into a cooperative agreement with
a qualified state treatment and assessment agency to conduct assessments of
juveniles in the custody of the division who are required to register as sex
offenders under § 9-27-356 § 9-35-434 and pay for services upon receipt of
invoice.

SECTION 55. Arkansas Code § 12-41-809(a), concerning when a juvenile
detention center or juvenile detention facility shall provide pretrial
detention and short term sanctions, is amended to read as follows:
(a) Juvenile detention centers or juvenile detention facilities shall
operate to provide pretrial detention and short term sanctions as provided
for in § 9-27-330 § 9-35-423.

SECTION 56. Arkansas Code § 13-4-302(1)(B), concerning the maintenance
of juvenile division court records by a county, is amended to read as
follows:
(B) The county shall maintain records of the juvenile
division of circuit court, in accordance with § 9-27-309 § 9-35-204, § 9-35-
304, § 9-35-405, and other provisions of Title 9 and the Arkansas Juvenile
Code of 1989, § 9-27-301 et seq. Arkansas Juvenile Code, § 9-35-101 et seq.;

SECTION 57. Arkansas Code § 16-13-326 is amended to read as follows:
16-13-326. Circuit court juvenile division funds.
(a)(1) All court costs, payments of restitution, fines, and fees
assessed by the juvenile division of circuit court shall be deposited and
accounted for by the county in which they are received.
(2) The court shall have the authority to direct that the fees,
court costs, payments of restitution, fees, and fines shall be collected by
384 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
either the juvenile officer, the sheriff, or the clerk of the juvenile
division of circuit court or other person designated by the court for the
county in which the fees, court costs, payments of restitution, fees, and
fines are charged.
(b)(1) The officer designated by the court to collect juvenile fees,
court costs, payments of restitution, fees, and fines shall deposit the fees,
court costs, payments of restitution, fees, and fines into the appropriate
fund and monthly deposit the fees, court costs, payments of restitution,
fees, and fines into the fund in the county treasury of the county where the
court costs, payment of restitution, fees, and fines are collected.
(2)(A) In a judicial district with multiple judges designated to
hear juvenile cases in the district plan under Supreme Court Administrative
Order No. 14, the majority of the judges shall determine who is to be in
charge of the collection and accounting of fees, court costs, payments of
restitution, fees, and fines.
(B) If there is no majority, the administrative judge is
to determine who shall be in charge of the collection and accounting of fees,
court costs, payments of restitution, fees, and fines as provided by this
section.
(3)(A) However, in judicial districts having more than one (1)
county, the majority of the judges or the administrative judge may designate
the treasurer of one (1) of the counties in the district as the depository of
all juvenile and diversion fees, court costs, payments of restitution, fees,
and fines collected in the district.
(B) The treasurer so designated by the court shall
maintain a separate account of the juvenile fees, court costs, payments of
restitution, fees, and fines collected in each county in the district so that
fees, court costs, payments of restitution, fees, and fines collected in a
county are spent to support the juveniles and juvenile division court
services and programs in that county.
(C) Money remaining at the end of the fiscal year shall
not revert to any other fund but shall remain in the circuit court juvenile
division fund and carry over to the next fiscal year.
(c) The funds derived from the collection of juvenile fees, court
costs, fees, and fines shall be used by agreement of the judge or judges of
the circuit court designated to hear juvenile cases in the district plan
385 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
under Supreme Court Administrative Order No. 14, originally issued April 6,
2001, and the quorum court of the county to provide services and supplies to
juveniles and support court programs at the discretion of the juvenile
division of circuit court, including without limitation:
(1) Juvenile drug courts;
(2) Teen courts;
(3) Volunteer probation programs;
(4) Court-appointed special advocates; and
(5) After-school and community-based programs.
(d) The funds derived from the collection of payments of restitution
shall be remitted to the respective victims of those cases.

SECTION 58. Arkansas Code § 16-98-303(a)(3)(C), concerning the use of
a juvenile drug court program or services in a dependency-neglect case, is
amended to read as follows:
(C) A juvenile drug court program or services may be used
in a dependency-neglect case under § 9-27-334 § 9-35-320.

SECTION 59. Arkansas Code § 16-122-102(d), concerning exceptions to
the application of § 16-122-102, is amended to read as follows:
(d) This section does not apply to juveniles subject to the Arkansas
Juvenile Code of 1989, § 9-27-301 et seq. Arkansas Juvenile Code, § 9-35-101
et seq.

SECTION 60. Arkansas Code § 20-6-102(5), concerning the definition of
"emancipated minor" under the Arkansas Healthcare Decisions Act, § 20-6-101
et seq., is amended to read as follows:
(5) “Emancipated minor” means a minor who has been emancipated
under § 9-27-362 § 9-35-109;

SECTION 61. Arkansas Code § 20-18-409(c)(2), concerning the
identification of a parent in a dependency-neglect proceeding and the
establishment of paternity, is amended to read as follows:
(2) Information obtained by the Division of Children and Family
Services of the Department of Human Services under subdivision (c)(1)(A) of
this section may be used in an action before a circuit court for the purpose
386 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
of identifying a parent in a dependency-neglect proceeding under § 9-27-303 §
9-35-102.

SECTION 62. Arkansas Code § 20-82-211(a)(5)—(b), concerning powers and
duties of the Child Welfare Ombudsman, is amended to read as follows:
(5) The Child Welfare Ombudsman shall have the following powers
and duties:
(A) The duty to work independently of the:
(i) Department of Human Services;
(ii) Administrative Office of the Courts;
(iii) Commission for Parent Counsel;
(iv) Attorney Ad Litem Program;
(v) Arkansas Public Defender Commission; and
(vi) Arkansas Court Appointed Special Advocates
program;
(B) The duty to communicate with a:
(i) Juvenile after the approval of, and subject to
the conditions set by, the:
(a) Dependency-neglect attorney ad litem
appointed to the juvenile; or
(b) Attorney for the juvenile if the juvenile
has an attorney other than a dependency-neglect attorney ad litem; and
(ii) Parent of a juvenile after the approval of, and
subject to the conditions set by, the attorney for the parent if the parent
has an attorney;
(C) The authority to access a record as allowed by law;
(D) The duty to review and recommend necessary changes to
procedures under the Arkansas Juvenile Code of 1989, § 9-27-301 et seq.
Arkansas Juvenile Code, § 9-35-101 et seq., the Child Maltreatment Act, § 12-
18-101 et seq., and other laws relevant to the operation of the child welfare
system that are applicable to the:
(i) Department of Human Services;
(ii) Division of Arkansas State Police;
(iii) Administrative Office of the Courts;
(iv) Attorney Ad Litem Program;
(v) Commission for Parent Counsel;
387 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(vi) Arkansas Public Defender Commission; and
(vii) Arkansas Court Appointed Special Advocates
program;
(E) The duty to review an issue or concern related to a
court case or investigation of a juvenile if it appears that the juvenile,
parent of the juvenile, foster parent of the juvenile, relative of the
juvenile, or fictive kin of the juvenile may need assistance from the child
welfare ombudsman;
(F) The duty to provide training and technical assistance
if a request is received from:
(i) A member of the child welfare system;
(ii) The General Assembly; or
(iii) The office of the Governor;
(G) The duty to make the public aware of the Child Welfare
Ombudsman Division and the contact information for the Child Welfare
Ombudsman Division; and
(H)(i) The duty to prepare an annual report concerning the
work of the Child Welfare Ombudsman Division, the operation of the child
welfare system, and any recommendations related to the operation of the child
welfare system.
(ii) The Child Welfare Ombudsman Division shall
submit the annual report to the:
(a) Governor;
(b) Secretary of the Department of Human
Services;
(c) Director of the Division of Arkansas State
Police;
(d) Director of the Division of Children and
Family Services;
(e) Director of the Administrative Office of
the Courts;
(f) Commission for Parent Counsel;
(g) House Committee on Aging, Children and
Youth, Legislative and Military Affairs; and
(h) Senate Interim Committee on Children and
Youth.
388 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(iii) The annual report shall not contain information
that would identify a juvenile or the family of a juvenile.
(b) As used in this section, “juvenile” means a juvenile as defined in
§ 9-27-303 § 9-35-102 who is:
(1) A respondent in a dependency-neglect proceeding held under
the Arkansas Juvenile Code of 1989, § 9-27-301 et seq. Arkansas Juvenile
Code, § 9-35-101 et seq.; or
(2) The subject of a child maltreatment investigation under the
Child Maltreatment Act, § 12-18-101 et seq.

SECTION 63. Arkansas Code § 21-6-416(f), concerning when technology
fees shall not be charged by a circuit court clerk, is amended to read as
follows:
(f) Fees under this section shall not be charged or collected in cases
brought in the circuit court under the Arkansas Juvenile Code of 1989, § 9-
27-301 et seq. Arkansas Juvenile Code, § 9-35-101 et seq., by a governmental
entity or nonprofit corporation, including without limitation an attorney ad
litem appointed in a dependency-neglect case or the Department of Human
Services.

SECTION 64. Arkansas Code § 28-65-107(c)(1), concerning jurisdiction
over a guardianship petition when a juvenile is the subject matter of an open
case under the Arkansas Juvenile Code of 1989, § 9-27-301 et seq., is amended
to read as follows:
(c)(1) If a juvenile is the subject matter of an open case filed under
the Arkansas Juvenile Code of 1989, § 9-27-301 et seq. Arkansas Juvenile
Code, § 9-35-101 et seq., the guardianship petition shall be filed in that
case if the juvenile resides in Arkansas.

SECTION 65. Arkansas Code § 28-65-203(a)(2), concerning qualifications
of a potential guardian for a minor when the potential guardian is a
convicted and unpardoned felon, is amended to read as follows:
(2) Subject to the requirements in subdivision (a)(1) of this
section, a convicted and unpardoned felon may:
(A) Be the guardian of the person for an adult;
(B) Be the guardian of the person for a minor who is not
389 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
subject to a dependency-neglect proceeding under the Arkansas Juvenile Code
of 1989, § 9-27-301 et seq. Arkansas Juvenile Code, § 9-35-101 et seq., if
the convicted and unpardoned felon is a relative or fictive kin as defined in
§ 9-28-402;
(C) Be the guardian of the person for a minor who is
subject to a dependency-neglect proceeding under the Arkansas Juvenile Code
of 1989, § 9-27-301 et seq. Arkansas Juvenile Code, § 9-35-101 et seq., if
the convicted and unpardoned felon qualifies for guardianship under
subsection (b) of this section; and
(D) Not be the guardian of the estate for any person.

SECTION 66. DO NOT CODIFY. Construction.
(a) The enactment and adoption of this act shall not expressly or
impliedly repeal an act passed during the regular session of the Ninety-Fifth
General Assembly.
(b) To the extent that a conflict exists between an act of the regular
session of the Ninety-Fifth General Assembly and this act:
(1) The act of the regular session of the Ninety-Fifth General
Assembly shall be treated as a subsequent act passed by the General Assembly
for the purposes of:
(A) Giving the act of the regular session of the Ninety-
Fifth General Assembly its full force and effect; and
(B) Amending or repealing the appropriate parts of the
Arkansas Code of 1987; and
(2) Section 1-2-107 shall not apply.

SECTION 67. DO NOT CODIFY. Incorporation of legislation into
recodified Arkansas Juvenile Code and related amendments.
(a) For purposes of incorporation into the recodified Arkansas
Juvenile Code created by this act and related amendments to the Arkansas Code
made in connection with the recodification of the Arkansas Juvenile Code, all
references in the acts passed at the regular session of the Ninety-Fifth
General Assembly to the Arkansas Juvenile Code of 1989 or to provisions of
the Arkansas Code amended by this act in connection with the recodification
of the Arkansas Juvenile Code shall be deemed to refer to the applicable or
corresponding provisions contained in the recodified Arkansas Juvenile Code
390 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
and related amendments to the Arkansas Code made in connection with the
recodification of the Arkansas Juvenile Code.
(b) The Bureau of Legislative Research, while assisting the Arkansas
Code Revision Commission with the commission's powers and duties, shall:
(1) Incorporate acts passed in the regular session of the
Ninety-Fifth General Assembly amending the Arkansas Juvenile Code of 1989 or
to provisions of the Arkansas Code amended by this act in connection with the
recodification of the Arkansas Juvenile Code into the appropriate provisions
of the Arkansas Code so long as those revisions do not result in a change in
the substance or meaning of a provision of the act; and
(2) Make technical changes to the Arkansas Code necessary to
implement this act, including without limitation changes to citations in the
Arkansas Code referencing provisions of Arkansas law amended by this act.

SECTION 68. DO NOT CODIFY. Technical revisions to Code of Arkansas
Rules.
(a) The General Assembly finds that, as a result of the recodification
of the Arkansas Juvenile Code and other amendments to the Arkansas Code under
this act, multiple statutory references to the Arkansas Juvenile Code or
other provisions of Arkansas law in the Code of Arkansas Rules will be
incorrect and require revision to reflect the changes implemented by this
act.
(b) It is the intent of the General Assembly that these provisions of
the Code of Arkansas Rules be updated by the Bureau of Legislative Research
as part of its maintenance of the Code of Arkansas Rules.
(c) The bureau shall update statutory references to the Arkansas
Juvenile Code of 1989 or other provisions of Arkansas law in the Code of
Arkansas Rules to reflect the proper citations under this act.
(d) Any person or state entity identifying one (1) or more citations
contained in the Code of Arkansas Rules that require revision to implement
this act may notify the Director of the Bureau of Legislative Research or his
or her designee of the citations at issue.

SECTION 69. DO NOT CODIFY. Correction of technical errors related to
implementation of recodification of the Arkansas Juvenile Code.
(a)(1) The General Assembly finds that:
391 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(A) The implementation of this act involves a multitude of
changes to existing Arkansas law;
(B) Many of the changes implemented by this act are highly
technical and require careful study of the purpose and context of each
Arkansas Code section, with the need for some of the changes not becoming
apparent until after the implementation of this act;
(C) When implementing revisions as large and comprehensive
as the changes under this act, it is inevitable that certain sections of the
Arkansas Code requiring technical changes to follow the intent of this act
will be either omitted or amended in a manner that is later found to be
erroneous and unintentional;
(D) It is likewise inevitable that other acts enacted by
the Ninety-Fifth General Assembly will not take into account the changes in
this act, resulting in technical inconsistencies between newly passed laws;
and
(E) If the correct statutory change to remedy an
unintentional error or an inconsistency between this act and another act of
the Ninety-Fifth General Assembly is readily apparent and consistent with the
intent of this act, the unintentional error or inconsistency should be
corrected as part of the codification process due to the technical nature of
the unintentional error or inconsistency.
(2) It is the intent of the General Assembly to empower the
Arkansas Code Revision Commission to correct technical errors identified in
the Arkansas Code during the implementation of this act to allow this act to
be fully implemented.
(b)(1)(A) Any person or state entity identifying one (1) or more
sections of the Arkansas Code that require revision to implement the intent
of this act may notify the Director of the Bureau of Legislative Research or
his or her designee of the section or sections at issue.
(B) If the Bureau of Legislative Research, while assisting
the commission with the commission's powers and duties, becomes aware of one
(1) or more sections of the Arkansas Code that require revision to implement
the intent of this act for which it appears that the bureau and the
commission do not have authority to make the necessary revision under § 1-2-
303(d), the bureau may notify the commission of the section or sections at
issue.
392 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 SB320
(2) If the commission determines that the revision necessary to
one (1) or more sections of the Arkansas Code under subdivision (b)(1) of
this section is technical in nature, germane to the intent of this act, and
consistent with this act's policy and purposes, the commission may make the
revision to the Arkansas Code.
(3) The commission shall notify the publisher of the Arkansas
Code of a revision to the Arkansas Code under subdivision (b)(2) of this
section as soon as possible so that the revision may be reflected in the
official hard copy version of the Arkansas Code and the official electronic
version of the Arkansas Code.
(4)(A) Except as provided in subdivision (b)(4)(B) of this
section, when the commission approves a revision to the Arkansas Code under
subdivision (b)(2) of this section, the commission shall notify the following
of the revision within thirty (30) days:
(i) The Speaker of the House of Representatives;
(ii) The President Pro Tempore of the Senate; and
(iii) The Legislative Council.
(B) The commission is not required to make a notification
under subdivision (b)(4)(A) of this section if the revision is made under §
1-2-303(d).
(c) The authority granted to the commission under this section is
supplemental to the commission's authority under § 1-2-303.
(d) This section shall expire on December 31, 2026.

/s/Irvin











393 03-19-2025 12:14:20 LJH010